Summary
SUPERB SHEDDOCKSLEY! Click the Virtual Tour link. This two-bedroom bedroom end terraced house lies in the popular area of Woodend. Of classic character and individual style and waiting to become your new home. The property benefits from a spacious living/dining room and a kitchen that opens into ...
"Exceptional Care Home, Retirement Living and Retail Development Opportunity"
"Spectacular mansion house set on a south facing site, with sheltered grounds, a small lake, tennis court and woodlands. Spa complex, swimming pool & housekeeper’s accommodation."
Prime residential development opportunity on the former site of Aberdeen Exhibition and Conference Centre in the popular Bridge of Don area.
"A magnificent residence set in about 3.47 acres of stunning private grounds with swimming pool/leisure complex, gym, tennis court and large garage block."
"Magnificent residence versatile for multi generational living in about two and half acres with garden and mountain views, luxury triple garage block, orangery and tennis court. "
"This prestigious six bedroomed family home is in a prime location. The property is in an elevated position, facing south and enjoys timeless views of the landscaped garden and mature woodlands. A rare opportunity to own a prestigious family home."
Set in mature and secluded garden grounds this superb residence is one of Cults' best kept secrets.
"Unique, fully renovated traditional granite property dating back to 1830, on south facing aspect with superb views over the Dee Valley and gardens of about 1.4 acres."
Outstanding Victorian detached property in 1.75 acres of beautiful garden grounds in the desirable village of Cults.
Detached granite townhouse with highly desirable period features in the picturesque West End district of Aberdeen City.
Superb late Georgian townhouse for flexible family living.
A fabulous opportunity to acquire a stunning country house in the heart of Aberdeen.
Superior five bedroom detached family home in the desirable village of Cults.
DELIGHTFUL 4/5 BEDROOM HOME. SOUGHT AFTER ABERDEEN SUBURB OF BIELDSIDE. OFFERING PRIVACY AND VIEWS ACROSS ROYAL DEESIDE. HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLS. Call Gary on to arrange a viewing. We are delighted to have been instructed to market this excellent 4/5 bedroom home in a very ...
"Situated within a desirable street in Aberdeen we are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful townhouse, which is on three levels, and has been thoughtfully upgraded by the present owners. The house retains many traditional features such as cornicing, picture rails, sash and case windows and ..."
"Enjoy PART EXCHANGE XTRA AND HALF OF YOUR LBTT PAID WORTH £13,249 OR £26,499 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! On the ground floor you will find a generous OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, with adjacent utility, and a breakfast and family area leading to the garden via a GLAZED BAY. A separate lounge, dining room an..."
"We are pleased to present this beautiful four bedroom detached house located in Bridge of Don. This spacious family home is offered unfurnished and is conveniently located for the Dyce industrial estate, Aberdeen Airport, excellent schools and recreational facilities, this property is ideal for f..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE XTRA AND HALF OF YOUR LBTT PAID WORTH £10,174 OR CHOOSE £23,499 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! This 4 bedroom home in Countesswells is a stylish detached family home with double garage. Downstairs there is a sizeable lounge with an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC and uti..."
"Versatile 4 Bedroom Home, Exclusive Garden and Off Street Parking."
" RARE OPPORTUNITY !!! 252sqm 4 BEDROOM ARCHITECT BUILT FAMILY HOME NEAR ABERDEEN'S KINGS GATE. Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available RE/MAX Aberdeen City & Shire are delighted to bring to market this finished to a superior standard, FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED house in the exclusive We..."
Considerable potential in a highly desirable setting.
Prestigious West End residential suburb.
"GET £20,299 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS AND FLOORING INCLUDED WORTH OVER £4,800! A practical family home designed for modern living where light and space rule. An open-plan kitchen with adjacent utility room has bright dining and family areas leading to the garde..."
An exciting opportunity to acquire a 4 bedroom detached family home with sea and tree lined views along with a neighbouring plot of land with planning permission for a similar sized dwelling with driveway access.
"Get £7,999 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS when you make the move to a spacious 2 bedroom first floor apartment, READY NOW, at Riverside Quarter in Bucksburn. You'll get a £5,000 FURNITURE PACK AND FREE FLOORING WORTH OVER £1,000 AND UPGRADES INCLUDED. Just a short d..."
This 3 bedroom home in COUNTESSWELLS is ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS or if you're looking to move up the Property Ladder. On the ground floor you will find a sizeable lounge and an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN with plenty of space for a dining table. There is a PATIO DOOR leading out into the garden and also...
"Move to Countesswells for Summer with Part Exchange or a huge contribution to your deposit or mortgage or bills, plus flooring. This property with detached single garage has impressive lounge and kitchen/family room there's also a utility space and handy study. Upstairs, a main bedroom with en su..."
"Get £19,749 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS OR CHOOSE PART EXCHANGE & £12,849 PAID LBTT! What's more, FLOORING WORTH OVER £4,681 IS INCLUDED. This 4 bedroom home in Countesswells is a stylish detached family home with integral garage for added security. Downstairs th..."
"GET £19,499 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION AND FREE FLOORING WORTH £4,681 OR WARDROBES INCLUDED! OR IF YOU HAVE A HOME TO SELL, PART EXCHANGE! This 4 bedroom home in Countesswells is a fantastic home. Downstairs there is a sizeable lounge with an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC. Upstairs, there..."
"Town house, country house... This property can be described as both. Located in Pitfodels surrounded by woodland."
"Charming detached cottage with beautiful gardens, garage & detached office."
Stunning South Anderson Drive! Martin and Co are very proud to offer for sale this beautiful refurbished three-bedroom detached house. The property is built of traditional solid granite and has been refurbished on the ground and upper floors. There is also a full-height basement and garage access...
"This impressive 4 bedroom home benefits from fantastic location OVERLOOKING GREEN SPACE and with a LARGE SOUTH FACING GARDEN within walking distance to the Charleston Primary School. Get £10,349 LBTT paid or Part Exchange Xtra and make the move in Summer/Autumn 2023. You will be amazed by the LAR..."
"The Balloch is a beautifully presented 4 BEDROOM DETACHED home with a lARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY AREA with FRENCH DOORS leading onto the rear garden. The ground floor also features a SPACIOUS LOUNGE, WC, utility area and a HANDY STUDY.
Upstairs you will find FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, the m..."
"Fantastic development potential for investors to convert building into a series of flats or perhaps a bed and breakfast or holiday lets. The building is currently set up as three flats 18B, 18C AND 18D with a large basement used as an office which offers potential to be converted into two further..."
"Get £17,999 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS OR, IF YOU HAVE A HOME TO SELL, CHOOSE PART EXCHANGE! What's more, FLOORING WORTH OVER £4,546 INCLUDED. Move to Bucksburn into an energy efficient new home for you and your family at Hopecroft. This 4 bedroom property with ..."
"We’re delighted to Welcome this well presented five bedroom detached home to the market in the Cove Bay area of Aberdeen. The main features of the property include: Ground Floor - A modern style kitchen with table and stools, connected is a small utility room with space for washer/dryer. A spaci..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this well presented FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW, situated in the popular residential area of Kingswells that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. Upon entering the property via the vestibule the..."
"With OVER £10,000 SAVINGS, you can CHOOSE PART EXCHANGE OR A 5% DEPOSIT BOOST to help you move to Countesswells into this Dean family home. Located within the cul de sac of contemporary homes, it offers 4 bedrooms, an en suite, WC and family bathroom, and generous living spaces for family gatheri..."
"***£20,000 below home report value*** We are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful THREE/FOUR BEDROOM SEMI -DETACHED HOUSE situated in the quiet street of Cranford Road. The spacious property comprises of a welcoming hallway, lounge/ diner, three/four double bedrooms, bathroom, show..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE XTRA OR PAID LBTT WORTH £6,849! This popular 4 bedroom property in Cove is an ideal family home just 5 miles from Aberdeen city centre. Ask about our offers to help you move. Downstairs, you will find a large lounge, an open-plan kitchen/dining room ideal for entertaining and a ..."
"This is a rare opportunity to acquire a sizeable traditional family home in a quiet, private, secluded cul-de-sac."
Heads turn for Hazelbank. Click on Virtual Tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this beautifully four-bedroom semi-detached house. The property spans three floors and is stylishly finished throughout. It also offers a self-contained business office. Viewing is highly recommended to apricate thi...
" ***£50,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this impressive FIVE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE which is conveniently located near the city centre and close to local amenities. The ground floor comprises: entrance hall with downstairs t..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE, £5,849 LBTT PAID & FLOORING WORTH £4,289! This detached 4 bedroom home in Bucksburn, has UPGRADES INCLUDED WORTH OVER £3,000 and it is ideal for family living. Downstairs there is an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC. Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroom with an ..."
"Enjoy PART EXCHANGE XTRA & £5,849 LBTT PAID OR BOOST YOUR DEPOSIT BY £16,249 when you move into this stylish 4 double bedroom family home in Countesswells. Downstairs there is a sizeable lounge with an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC and utility room. Upstairs, there is a spacious main..."
"Step into Springfield place. Click on the virtual tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this 4-bedroom semi-detached house in the West End area of Aberdeen. This property offers 3-bedrooms and a bathroom on the top floor, and a bedroom with ensuite, as well as a kitchen and large living/dining r..."
"Get £15,499 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS at this spacious end-terraced townhouse in Bucksburn - OR PART EXCHANGE. Flexible living space over three levels, downstairs provides an open-plan area with kitchen positioned to the front of the property and a living and d..."
"You can PART EXCHANGE AND GET FREE FLOORING WORTH £2,500! IF NO HOME TO SELL, GET £10,499 TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE INSTEAD. With a stunning design and high-quality finish, the Glenlair is a perfect home for modern living in Bucksburn. It offers 3 bedrooms, an en suite, WC and family bathroom, and ge..."
"GET £15,499 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS WITH FLOORING INCLUDED WORTH OVER £4,289! OR IF YOU HAVE A HOME TO SELL, GET PART EXCHANGE & £5,099 LBTT PAID. With a stunning design and high-quality finish, the Dean is a perfect home for modern living in Bucksburn. Locat..."
"UNIQUE SUPERB 2/3 BEDROOM PROPERTY IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Virtual Tour Available - Video Tour Available This property is a masterclass in modern living. On the ground floor, you'll find a light-filled dining room/kitchen and formal lounge, the upper level has 2 double bedrooms and a famil..."
"Choose a £15,249 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS OR PART EXCHANGE & £4,849 LBTT PAID. FURTHERMORE YOU WILL GET FREE FLOORING WORTH £4,137! Make the move into a beautifully presented family home in Bucksburn. The Mey is a unique 4 bed detached home with a spacious ope..."
"Home report available, house valued at £300,000 For sale bright and sunny 3-bedroom semi-detached house with a forest outlook in a highly desirable location. House was built in 2021 as part of the Dandara Hazelwood development to the highest of specifications. Beautifully located with sou..."
"GET PART EXCHANGE & £4,599 LBTT PAID OR WE WILL PAY A £14,999 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS, when you move into This popular 4 bedroom family home close to Dyce. Downstairs, the lounge leads through to a spacious kitchen/dining room with access to the rear garden. ..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to bring to the market for sale this immaculate and modern family home in the popular Charleston Cove area of Aberdeen providing easy access to the City and benefitting from single garage, two allocated parking spaces and front and rear private gardens. The prop..."
Stylishly presented and in show home condition we offer for sale this beautiful four bedroom town house situated in the family friendly village of Kingswells. The property offers versatile accommodation for a growing family and consists of welcoming hallway giving access to the sizeable utility ...
"An impressive conversion of a traditional granite building, the centrepiece of the Morningfield Mews Development."
"Start your new home journey at Charleston Green. Ready for Summer 2023, you can get £14,749 TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT, or if you have a home to sell ask us about PART EXCHANGE XTRA AND GET YOUR LBTT PAID TOO. Discover how close walking distance your new home is to the Charleston Primary School. Book a..."
Executive Self Contained Five Bedroom Apartment with current HMO licence with a yield of 9.4%. Desirable location minutes from University & City Centre. The property comes with a Sitting Tenant who will be in the property until July.
SUPERB FOUR BEDROOM HOUSE VERY POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available This property would make a great Family Home. To Arrange a Viewing Please Call Lee-Ann Low on . For a Copy of The Home Report Email Lee-Ann Low ...
"A brilliant family home only a few miles from the hustle and bustle of the city centre but with stunning park and sea views. There is also the option to buy a plot to the right of the current dwelling which has planning permission to build on, the price of this is available on request."
"NEW HOUSETYPE RELEASED IN BUCKSBURN COULD BE YOURS WITH A £14.499 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION PLUS FREE FLOORING WORTH £4,300! OR IF YOU HAVE A HOME TO SELL, PART EXCHANGE AND GET £4,099 PAID LBTT. Set over three storeys, this home features a bright and open-plan kitchen, dining and lounge. The lounge ..."
"This 3 bedroom home a short journey to Aberdeen city centre is fantastic for growing families in Countesswells, ready for summer 2023. Get a CONTRIBUTION WORTH £14,499 TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS, PLUS move with FLOORING INCLUDED. Downstairs, you will be impressed by the..."
"A lovely four-bedroom terraced house in the desirable area of Belmont Road, this property has lovely original features, situated in a central location with all the benefits of city centre living."
"Within the sought after coastal suburb of Cove Bay we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this immaculate four bedroom, two public room, two bathroom detached dwelling house with garage and off street parking. Offering spacious accommodation throughout this property is certain to appea..."
"With its dual frontage, this is an impressive three bedroom home that is both highly functional and very comfortable for family living."
"If you have a home to sell, you can get PART EXCHANGE & £3,099 LBTT PAID! OR CHOOSE £13,499 DEPOSIT BOOST. What's more, we will include FLOORING WORTH OVER £3,378. The Craigend is a fantastic 3 bedroom semi-detached home in Countesswells with a modern open plan kitchen/dining room with family are..."
"CHOOSE A £13,249 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS & FLOORING WORTH £3,300 OR GET PART EXCHANGE! This 3 bedroom home in Bucksburn is ideal for a growing family. Downstairs there is an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC. Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroo..."
"We are delighted to bring to market a modern 4 bedroom detached house with garage at the recently completed Riverside Quarter development in Bucksburn. The development is located close to Bridge of Don, Dyce and 3 miles from the city centre. Click on EPC for Home Report. The property has be..."
"Spacious four bedroom, self-contained upper apartment is situated in a very popular location in the Ferryhill area of Aberdeen City. This well-presented apartment forms two upper floors of a traditional granite building enjoys benefits such as gas heating, double glazing and would be a great purc..."
"Enjoy up to £16,227 SAVINGS, popular walking trails and an EASY COMMUTE to Aberdeen city centre when you move to this popular 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH DRIVEWAY at Riverside Quarter. Downstairs, the living room provides a great space for relaxing and the sociable kitchen is ideal for ente..."
"Choose from PART EXCHANGE OR £2,499 LBTT PAID! This 3 bedroom home in Cove is ideal for a growing family. Downstairs there is an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC. Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroom with an en suite, 2 further bedrooms and a family bathroom. Make the move into a ..."
"GET £12,749 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS and make the move to this popular 3 bedroom semi-detached home in a new development in Bucksburn, Aberdeen which offers plenty of space for a growing family. Downstairs, the living room provides a great space for relaxing a..."
"This thoughtfully designed 1 bedroom apartment situated on the top floor offers you a spacious kitchen/dining/living room, a double bedroom with built in wardrobe and a handy utility room and convenient shower room."
"GOT A HOME TO SELL? Ask us how you can move to Charleston Green with a GUARANTEED BUYER FOR YOUR EXISTING HOME WITH PART EXCHANGE XTRA. No home to sell? Get your LBTT PAID WORTH £2,349! Book an appointment and start your new home journey at Charleston Green. This 3 BED HOME IN COVE offers a spaci..."
"IMMACULATE 2 BEDROOM, GROUND FLOOR, APARTMENT IN DESIRABLE WEST END. A PERFECT MIX OF PERIOD FEATURES AND MODERN AMENITIES Call Gary on to arrange your viewing. We are delighted to bring to the market this superb 2 bedroom ground floor apartment in the very sought after west ..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this modern and well presented four bedroom, three bathroom detached family home with single garage, driveway parking and enclosed rear garden in the popular new development of Charleston, Cove. The property is on a spacious corner plot, is in ..."
"GET PART EXCHANGE, LBTT PAID WORTH £2,099 & FREE FLOORING WORTH £3,194 OR A MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION WORTH £12,499 at this 3 bedroom home in Bucksburn is fantastic for growing families or those looking to step up the property ladder in Aberdeen. Downstairs, you will be impressed by the spacious loun..."
"Enjoy a SOUTHWEST FACING GARDEN and OPEN GREEN SPACE CLOSE BY this 3 BEDROOM END-TERRACED home in Bucksburn, fantastic for growing families. Move with £12,499 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS PLUS FLOORING INCLUDED WORTH OVER £3,000. Downstairs, you will be impressed ..."
This beautifully presented granite 3 bed 2 reception semi detached property with large driveway and garage in Rosehill Drive Aberdeen is packed with gorgeous period features and wonderful gardens will make an ideal family home for you.
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £245,000 - £265,000*"
"Get PART EXCHANGE AND £1,999 LBTT PAID OR CHOOSE £12,249 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! This 3 bed home at Hopecroft View in Bucksburn offers a spacious kitchen/dining area with French doors leading out to your garden, as well as a separate lounge. You’ll also find a handy downstairs WC and plenty o..."
"AVAILABLE AT £240,000 - Semi-detached house,Full vacant possession,TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY IN OUR NEXT AUCTION CALL US NOW"
"Looking for your FIRST HOME? Start your new home journey at King's Gallop and move in 2023 with FREE FLOORING and a choice of an £11,999 DEPOSIT BOOST OR PART EXCHANGE. This 3 bedroom home in Countesswells is great for those looking to join or move up the property ladder. Downstairs, you will fin..."
"ENJOY PART EXCHANGE XTRA AND FLOORING WORTH OVER £2,000 OR YOU COULD BOOST YOUR DEPOSIT BY £11,999 when you move into this bright and spacious 2 bedroom apartment in Aberdeen. With lift access up to the third floor you'll find open-plan living, a main bedroom with en suite, a flexible double bedr..."
"Move to Riverside Quarter with an £11,999 DEPOSIT BOOST PLUS FLOORING ON US, or if you have a home to sell ask us about PART EXCHANGE AND LBTT PAID. and move in 2023 to your ENERGY EFFICIENT new home at Riverside Quarter. This 3 BEDROOM END-TERRACED home in Bucksburn is great for those looking to..."
"Newly installed kitchen! 3 bedroom property within the catchment area of the highly regarded Mile End Primary School and Aberdeen Grammar School, catchment area maps are included in this listing. Virtual Tour Available - Video Tour Available RE/MAX Aberdeen City & Shire are delighted to ha..."
Within the popular suburb of Bridge of Don we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this superb three bedroom semi detached dwelling house with conservatory and large integral garage. Presented to walk-in standard throughout to include newly fitted kitchen and modern tasteful decor throug...
"Home to sell? You can PART EXCHANGE AND GET £1,799 LBTT PAID OR CHOOSE £11,749 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! Start your new home journey at Hopecroft and move into an energy efficient new home for 2023. This 3 bedroom end-terraced home in Bucksburn is great for those looking to join or move up the ..."
Within a sought after location close to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary and the University of Aberdeen we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious three bedroom semi detached dwelling house. Benefiting from the modern comforts of gas central heating & double glazing this...
"Now available with PART EXCHANGE or a 5% MORTGAGE DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WORTH £11,625!"
20K BELOW VALUATION* This large well presented FOUR double bedroom end terraced house in Bridge of Don makes an ideal home for both first-time buyers or those looking to upsize from an apartment to a house.The property has had an extension and comes with gas central heating and double glazing
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this lovely FOUR BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE, situated in a popular residential and convenient area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. Upon entering the hallway via the vestibule, the spacious extent ..."
"Move to Westburn Gardens into this first floor corner apartment with free flooring included, in a prime city centre location in Aberdeen. A bright and open-plan design provides the perfect space to entertain guests. The main bedroom features built-in wardrobes and an en suite shower room, the fle..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to bring to the sales market this well presented and spacious three bedroom, two bathroom detached bungalow with large garden, private driveway and garage in a quiet cul de sac location in the popular coastal town of Cove. The property is neutrally decorated, in..."
A fine three-bedroom home combining a practical layout with attractive features to create a very amenable living space.
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this lovely THREE BEDROOM DETACHED property situated in Old Aberdeen and is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and Universities The property comprises open plan lounge/kitchen and a double bedroom on the ground floor..."
"K Allan Properties are delighted to present this second floor apartment to the market. The property is positioned in the centre of Aberdeen, which is within walking distance to Aberdeen Grammar School, North East College, Robert Gordon's College and several local amenities. The property compr..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to bring to the sales market this fantastic self-contained double upper apartment with five double bedrooms, two receptions, modern kitchen and two modern bathrooms. This spacious and well-maintained family home benefits from period feature working fireplace in ..."
"Spacious, three/ four bedroom, mid terraced house is situated in a very popular location in the West-End of Aberdeen City. Spanning over two floors with a large front garden and enjoys benefits of gas heating, double glazing, this would be a great purchase for professionals or families. The acco..."
"Within the ever popular suburb of Bridge of Don we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this spacious three bedroom semi detached dwelling house. Presented to walk-in condition throughout to include contemporary dining kitchen, modern bathroom and tasteful decor throughout this is certai..."
"Enjoy being close to the River Don walking trails in your new home in Aberdeen at Riverside Quarter. Move with a 5% deposit boost or Part Exchange. This 3 bedroom home, in a popular new community in Bucksburn, is great for families looking to join or move up the property ladder. Downstairs, you w..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment situated within the Kepplestone Development just off Queens Road in Aberdeen. The property offers spacious and comfortable accommodation and comprises of beautifully appointed lounge, modern kitc..."
"CRACKING CLIFTON ROAD. Click on VIRTUAL TOUR! This three bedroom semi-detached house with garage property is located in the Hilton area. The property spans two levels of spacious accommodation, enjoying the comforts of gas central heating and double glazed windows. The accommodation has been deco..."
"Boyd Property are delighted to present to the market this charming 3-bedroom semi-detached house set within in a highly desirable residential area, located close to Aberdeen Royal ..."
"Home to sell? You can PART EXCHANGE XTRA OR GET FLOORING WORTH £1,000. OR YOU CAN CHOOSE £10,449 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! Book your appointment at Westburn Gardens and start your journey to a new 5-star apartment in Aberdeen. This spacious 2 bedroom apartment with lift access is ideal for city..."
Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to bring to the sales market this bright and spacious semi-detached family home in the popular suburb of Altens with easy access into the City Centre and around the City with the Aberdeen By-Pass Route and A92 just a short distance away. The property has a brigh...
"This modern first floor city apartment with lift access in Aberdeen provides plenty of light and space throughout. An open-plan living area with kitchen and dining space is flooded with natural light from the large dual-aspect windows. There are 2 double bedrooms, a family bathroom and additional..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE XTRA OR FLOORING WORTH £1,000. OR, YOU CAN GET £10,199 BOOST TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT! Book your appointment at Westburn Gardens and start your journey to a new 5-star apartment in Aberdeen. This spacious 2 bedroom apartment with lift access is ideal for city living. You will find a..."
"Northwood Aberdeen are delighted to offer for sale this stunning, modern three bedroom, three bathroom family home in the popular area of Mugiemoss, Bucksburn and gives easy access to Aberdeen City Centre, Dyce and amenities. The property was built in 2016 by Persimmon Homes and benefits from ..."
"Situated within the popular residential area of Bridge of Don, this well kept four bedroom family home is a must see. The two story accommodation benefits from the modern comforts of gas central heating and double glazing, as well as a generous driveway and well sized garden."
"Come and View Corunna Place! Martin and Co are proud to offer for sale this high-end, three-bedroom top-floor apartment in the bridge of don area of Aberdeen. This listed building originally served as Military Barracks but has been converted and is stylishly finished throughout while maintaining ..."
" Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available Riverside Quarter 84 Mugiemoss Road, Bucksburn, Aberdeen RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire are delighted to offer this immaculately presented modern THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE in the Riverside Quarter of Aberdeen. The property is situate..."
"The property is freshly decorated, carpeted, and in immaculate walk-in condition;"
"Within the sought after suburb of Bridge of Don we are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom end terraced dwelling house. Presented to walk-in condition throughout this home is certain to appeal to families, professionals and first time buyers alike. The property is fully serviced ..."
"Well presented, five bedroom Terraced House is available for sale in the Ashgrove area of Aberdeen City. Spanning over three floors this spacious accommodation is ready to move into and comprises of: entrance hallway with under stair cupboard; good sized living room; fitted dining kitchen with ac..."
"Reserve with PART EXCHANGE OR A £9,749 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION and start your new home journey in the country yet close to Aberdeen city at Riverside Quarter. This terrific 2 bedroom property in Bucksburn is an ideal starter home to get you on the property ladder. Downstairs, you will find a good-s..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM, SELF CONTAINED GROUND FLOOR FLAT situated in the popular and sought after area of Cults. The ready to move into property comprises lounge, kitchen, shower room and two double bedrooms with a further sin..."
" Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available RE/MAX Aberdeen City & Shire are delighted to offer for sale this impressive mid terrace villa which is situated in the quiet suburb of Stoneywood. Spanning two floors of generous accommodation, the property has been superbly upgraded and exten..."
"Sitting within large secluded garden grounds we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this superb two bedroom detached bungalow with garage and BBQ hut. Offering spacious accommodation throughout this is the perfect purchase for downsizers, professionals and families alike. This property..."
"Newly released with a choice of free flooring included, this 2 bedroom ground floor apartment is ideal for city living in Aberdeen. It could be yours with a 5% Deposit Boost or Part Exchange! You will find an open-plan kitchen/dining/family room, a spacious main bedroom with built-in wardrobes, a..."
1a Marywell is a top-quality spacious (circa 94m2) park home situated on a superb plot (which is not overlooked) finished to the highest standards.
"Being Sold by Online Auction Starting Bids from £185,000 Buy it now option available Please call or visit Purplebricks Online Auctions for more information. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction. The Modern Method of Auction is a flexible buyer friendly method of purchase. The..."
"This homely 3 BED SEMI is offered for sale in the ever popular area of Bridge of Don / Danestone. Situated at the end of a quiet Cul-de-Sac, the generous and flexible living accommodation make this peaceful property a delight for all.
Early viewing is essential.
WELCOME HOME."
"If you are wanting to live within walking distance of the city centre and all its amenities but with the volume turned down then look no further, this stunning 2 Bed Grd Floor Apartment, set within a private courtyard and secure underground parking is ready for you to move straight in and unpack."
"Well presented end terrace bungalow in Danestone, Bridge of Don, situated at the end of a cul-de-sac, close to local amenities, transportation links, primary school and academy."
"A hidden gem, Ideal first time buyer property for young families. 50 Donald Dewar Court, Aberdeen, AB16 5JB Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire are delighted to offer this modern THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE in the Donald Dewar Drive Aberdeen..."
"Dee street has this exclusive flat in the city centre with much sought-after private parking, a gym, leisure area; this 2-bed flat provides everything a city-dweller could want including two en-suites. Only a few minutes walk from Aberdeen train station, and only a 25 minute drive to the airport."
" ***£15,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION*** Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this lovely THREE BEDROOM FLAT situated in the city centre and ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links, schooling and Aberdeen Harbour.
This well kept..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this spacious three bedroom double upper home in close proximity to Aberdeen University campus and City Centre. The accommodation has excellent storage, is in ready to move in condition and having recently obtained a HMO license, this property ..."
"*** Putting the ZING into AMAZING...*** This Amazing 3 BED PENTHOUSE FLAT, occupying the whole of the top floor and offering spectacular views from the large curved window to the lounge.
So if you are looking for somewhere close to the city but with the volume turned down...
WELCOME HOME."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this lovely TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE situated in a convenient and well established residential area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The accommodation comprises on the ground floor: entr..."
"We are truly delighted to offer to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious two bedroom, two bathroom apartment with lift access in the heart of Aberdeen City Centre. This is the flagship apartment of the sought after Fraser House development on the corner of Union Street & Market Street a..."
"Part of an exclusive complex in the city centre with much sought-after private parking and a communal gym; this freshly painted high end 2-bed flat provides everything a city-dweller could want. Only a three minute walk from Aberdeen train station, and only a 25 minute drive to the airport."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this SELF CONTAINED ONE/TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT, situated close the West end of the city centre and ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links, ARI and schooling. The property comprises living room, modern fitted kitchen..."
"Chain Free and Move In Ready! We are delighted to offer this immaculate two-bedroom property for sale in the popular area of Bridge of Don. Featuring contemporary neutral tones, the property is equipped with modern gas central heating and double glazing, this is the ideal purchase for a young c"
"Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire is delighted to offer this well presented Three Bedroom granite semi-detached house in a well established residential area. A great family home property purchase, the home benefits from Upvc double glazing an..."
"Ask us about the £5K FURNITURE PACK. Get £8,649 TOWARDS your deposit, mortgage, moving costs or bills, PLUS, GET FREE FLOORING throughout. Enjoy a short walk to the River Don and with great bus routes into town. This popular two bedroom apartment with balcony and parking space is great for first ..."
Superb one bedroom apartment with a Juliet balcony on the first floor within a prestigious retirement development located within the Craigiebuckler area of Aberdeen
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this executive first floor apartment with private allocated parking in the popular area of Rubislaw, allowing easy access to the City Centre and commute around the City. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, excellent storage and a mo..."
"** Priced £10,000 below home report valuation** We are delighted to present for sale this spacious, contemporary two bedroom, two bathroom, upper apartment with lift access situated within the prestigious Ocean Development by Barratt Homes. The property is in move-in condition throughout and ha..."
Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well-presented self-contained ground floor double bedroom apartment with two reception rooms in the popular Mid Stocket area of Aberdeen and easy access to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary and the City Centre. The property has been fr...
"Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to bring to the market this Two-Bedroom Semi-Detached house nestled in an idyllic cul-de-sac of Bridge of Don. It has all the comforts of modern living with gas central heating, double-glazing and spaci..."
"Great Grandholm Crescent! Click on Virtual Tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this beautiful 3 bedroom flat in the bridge of don area of Aberdeen. This property is a top-floor flat with 3 large bedrooms, one of which offers an en-suite. A large open plan kitchen/dining and living room area. V..."
 VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENCED FOR THIS SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOMED MID TERRACED FAMILY HOME. CONTACT NORAH NESLAND TO ARRANGE TO VIEW. Description Norah Nesland and Re/Max are delighted to present this immaculate 3 bedroom family home in the well established residential area of Mastr...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this lovely THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE situated in a convenient and well established residential area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. This well presented property comprises lounge, kitchen, ..."
****REDUCED**** Fantastic opportunity to purchase a modern top floor two bedroom apartment with sun terrace situated within the Ocean Apartments development. The bright and spacious property consists of Lounge/Kitchen/Diner on open plan with access to the terrace where you can relax after a hec...
"Get over £8,000 TOWARDS YOUR DEPOSIT or choose free flooring included in your new home worth over £1,000 and get £699 LBTT paid. This spacious 2 bedroom top floor apartment in the Riverside Quarter community in Bucksburn is just a short drive from Aberdeen city centre. You will find courtyard par..."
"PRICE REDUCTION OF £10,000 Located in the ever popular and well established residential area of Danestone Bridge of Don RE/MAX are delighted to offer for sale this 3 bedroomed semi detached dwellinghouse set within a quiet location. Danestone is a popular residential area to the north of A..."
"Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire is delighted to offer this FABULOUS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE HOUSE, in a lovely residential area of Aberdeen. Situated in a quiet street and finished in a high standard this property has just been newly ref..."
"Occupying an enviable plot within the sought after suburb of Bridge of Don, we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this two bedroom end of terrace house with off street parking. Perhaps one of the finest examples of this style, these subjects are certain to appeal to first time buyers, ..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this beautiful and spacious top floor TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT ideally located within a prestigious development in the sought after area of Mannofield, west of the city centre. The well-presented property comprises of a welcoming hallway, bright and airy lounge to..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market for sale this immaculate two bedroom, two bathroom top floor apartment which is set within an exclusive purpose built development. Benefiting from state-of-the-art kitchen, newly fitted shower room, en-suite and presented to walk-in condition throughout thi..."
"*Listed £15,000 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase a two-bedroom flat in a prestigious secure gated factored development in excellent proximity to the city centre, local amenities and parks. Off-street dedicated parking, we are delighted to offer for sale this well proport..."
"***LISTED £5K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this well presented TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW situated in the convenient and sought after area of Cove. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The pro..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious two-bedroom end-terrace property with a full-size basement with a separate entry at the property's rear, offering exceptional storage options and conversion possibilities."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £175,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. This beautiful end-terrace cottage requires minimal work to make this lovely home move-in ready. Featuring a very generous layout and located very close to the c..."
"Within a modern purpose built development a short walking distance from Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Royal Cornhill Hospital, The University of Aberdeen and North East Scotland College we are delighted to offer to the market for sale this three bedroom, two bathroom top floor apartment with exclusiv..."
This excellent value and spacious three bed semi detached is perfect for first time buyers looking for their first family home or an ideal buy to let for investors due to its location so near to RGU .
"Well presented, three-bedroom Terraced House is available for sale in the Northfield area of Aberdeen City. The spacious accommodation is ready to move into and comprises of: entrance hallway; large lounge with large window to the front, kitchen diner with a range of wall and base units; three do..."
"Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available Riverside Quarter 108 Mugiemoss Road, Bucksburn, Aberdeen RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire are delighted to offer this well presented modern TWO BEDROOM MID-TERRACED HOUSE in the Riverside Quarter of Aberdeen. The property is situated over two f..."
"Within a sought after location close to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary and the University of Aberdeen we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious two bedroom, two public room, ground floor self contained apartment. Offering generous living space throughout this is certa..."
"MQ Estate Agents are proud to present to the open market this seldom available two-bedroom top floor flat in a highly sought-after residential area. MQ Assisted Move and part exchange is available. The generously proportioned accommodation comprises: open plan lounge and kitchen, two bedrooms a..."
 ***£40000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*** Enjoying a picturesque outlook across the harbour channel and North Sea this spacious two bedroom self-contained flat is located within the charming and tranquil area of Footdee. The property offers a rare opportunity to p...
Spacious three-bedroom double upper self-contained apartment.
"SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS, WELL-PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT An ideal starter home or great for students near to the University. Centrally located to shops/bus/train with easy parking, this flat is in a nice block with shared garden & basement storage unit. Viewing is a must to appreciate!"
"Investment Opportunity! Must-see Middlefield! Martin & Co are delighted to present this modern two bedroom property located in the Hilton area. The property comes complete with Off Road Parking, Gas Central Heating and Garden access. Spacious property and is conveniently located for the city ..."
"Come and view Cove Circle. Click on virtual tour. Modern two bedroom mid terraced house situated to the south of the city, in the coastal village of Cove. Cove has a host of amenities including shops, schools and other recreational facilities. The community village is just minutes away from the C..."
This beautifully presented One-bedroom semi-detached house will make an ideal home for a first-time buyer or those looking to make the move from an apartment to a house. With gas central heating and double glazing and a sunroom with a private back garden really makes it a relaxing place to be.
"Are you looking for somewhere with off street parking? ...with a great sized lounge and 3 double bedrooms? easily maintained garden and walking distance to shops, schools, doctors, library and swimming pool...then this 3 BED END TERRACE needs to be top of your viewing list.
WELCOME HOME."
Spacious Two Bedroom Second Floor Apartment.
"McEwan Fraser Legal is delighted to present this substantial three-bedroom mid-terraced house, sold with a sitting tenant, currently achieving approximately £9000 per annum rental income. The property has been maintained to a high standard and would make an excellent investment / buy-to-let oppor..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this two bedroom, upper floor apartment with single garage to the Aberdeenshire market. This apartment which is fully double glazed with gas central heating provides exceptionally spacious accommodation throughout. Comprising of an entrance hallway, brig..."
"Price reduction, £15k below Home Report valuation Virtual Tour Available – Video Tour Available. Spacious 3 bedroom end terraced house located on Cornhill Gardens, Aberdeen. RE/MAX Coast & Country are delighted to have been instructed to market this spacious three bedroom end te..."
"*Listed Below Home Report Value* Spacious two bedroom, second floor apartment in a central location with an allocated parking space is available for sale. The property consists of large lounge, 2 double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes, a good size kitchen and shower room. The property benefit fr..."
"Northwood Aberdeen are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and partly renovated semi-detached home in Woodside, allowing an easy commute to Aberdeen City Centre, Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Dyce and Aberdeen Airport. The property is set over two floors, has two double bedrooms, two bathroo..."
A two-bedroom with an extended kitchen/diner Mid Terrace property offering spacious living accommodation over two floors.
"Within a thriving established community we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this three bedroom mid terrace dwelling house with attic room. Offering generously proportioned accommodation this is certain to be a popular choice amongst families, first time buyers and investors alike. U..."
"Positioned within a sought after development in the Dyce area of the City we are delighted to offer to the market for sale this exceptional two bedroom, two bathroom mid floor apartment with allocated parking space. Perhaps one of the finest examples of its kind the property is easily positioned ..."
We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Top Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
Are you looking for that modern apartment with high specification and nothing to do but just unpack your boxes and make it your own... whether it's your first purchase or for investment then No. 2 is the property for you. WELCOME HOME
PRICE REDUCED 15K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to offer this two bedroom end terraced dwellinghouse with driveway. Offering contemporary accommodation spanning over two floo...
"Northwood Aberdeen are delighted to bring to the sales market this spacious two double bedroom first floor apartment in the popular Ferryhill area of Aberdeen. Located in a quiet cul-de-sac location in a popular city centre location, this charming property is located in a block of three p..."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Ground Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £140,000 - £150,000*"
"Desirable executive apartment, in a historic listed building."
This property is being sold by public auction pre auction offers will be considered. Please contact Auction House Scotland for further information.
upgraded walk-in condition available for immediate possession
Available with a sitting tenant! Immaculate self-contained three bedroom ground floor apartment.
BRIGHT & SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM UPPER APARTMENT PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY/BUY TO LET Call Gary on to arrange your viewing. We are delighted to offer to the market this very spacious and excellent value three bedroom upper apartment within a very attractive detached granite prope...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, situated in a convenient and sought after area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The property comprises living room, kitchen, bathroom, two double bedrooms,..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market for sale this two bedroom upper apartment with lift access and secure allocated parking space situated within a sought after exclusive residential development. Presented to walk in condition throughout this is a perfect purchase for professionals, first tim..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom Mid Terrace – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price - £135,000 - £145,000*"
"Immaculate, spacious three bedroom end terrace."
"Within a popular residential location close to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, The University of Aberdeen and public transport routes we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this well presented three bedroom dwelling house. Presented to walk in condition throughout to include contemporary kitc..."
"Within a thriving established community, we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this TWO BEDROOM MID TERRACED DWELLING HOUSE. Offering generously proportioned accommodation this is certain to be a popular choice amongst small families, first time buyers and investors alike. Upon enteri..."
"Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire is delighted to offer this opportunity to purchase this superior, one bedroom, executive apartment in the heart of the city centre. Forming many original features and character, this former bank offers perio..."
"RE/MAX Aberdeen are delighted to have been instructed to market this spacious 3 bedroom mid-terraced house in need of upgrading. Although in need of modernisation the double glazing, electrics and gas central heating are all of good condition as reflected in the home report meaning all upgrades a..."
Beautifully presented three bedroom maisonette flat in walk in condition.
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this well presented TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR SELF CONTAINED MAISONETTE situated in the popular and central area of Ferryhill. The accommodation comprises on the ground floor: entrance hall with front facing lounge to the right, storage cupboard a..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom First Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £135,000 - £145,000*"
" ***LISTED £5000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE *** Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this lovely THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, situated in a popular residential area ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. This we..."
"Set within a popular, established residential location we are delighted to bring to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious three bedroom mid terrace dwelling house with off street parking and large fully enclosed garden. Combining the comforts of gas central heating & double glazing with..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this bright and very spacious  apartment occupying the full top floor in this well-maintained factored development, ideally located with easy access to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, City Centre and local amenities. The property benefits from t..."
"We are delighted to welcome to market this stunning two bed apartment in the City Centre of Aberdeen. The property has been upgraded by the current owner and it’s main features include two double bedrooms with plentiful storage space. A spacious living room, with ample space for dining room tab..."
"Top floor two-bedroom flat located on Pittodrie Place.Pittodrie Place is located off King Street, near to Aberdeen University, transportation links into and out with the city, local amenities, and the promenade which offers access to the North Sea, dining and entertainment options. ..."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom First Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £130,000 - £150,000*"
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £130,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. This fantastic terraced bungalow offers a spacious reception room, a modern fitted kitchen/diner, a three-piece shower room with mobility access and a sizeable be..."
**Under Home Report Valuation** Modern spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment.
Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to bring to offer this charming One Bedroom End Terrace Bungalow situated in a peaceful residential cul-de-sac and offers a host of excellent features. Benefiting from a generous allocated parking spa...
Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to offer for sale this lovely Two Bedroom Self Contained Apartment that forms part of the Stewart Milne Homes development in Bucksburn. Enjoying the modern comforts of gas central heating and double-glaz...
"Sweet Caroline Apartments! Click on the virtual tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this modern 2 bedroom, second-floor apartment in the Rosemount area. The flat is part of an end-terraced block and therefore offers windows on 3-sides which flood the large rooms with light. The property also b..."
"*Listed £10,000 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom, self-contained ground floor apartment in the Garden Estate, a sought-after residential area of Kincorth. The entrance porch leads to a central hallway and the spacious lounge/diner draws you to..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market this well presented two bedroom flat situated within the Pittodrie area of Aberdeen. The modern flat consists of bright and spacious lounge, fully fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms and bathroom. There is private parking available and the property is enter..."
"***10K BELOW THE HOME REPORT VALUE!!!*** MQ Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this exceptionally spacious three bedroom upper floor apartment with private entrance, located within a popular residential area in Bucksburn, Aberdeen. The property comprises of lounge area, dining ..."
***SUPERB OFFER - SIX MONTHS SERVICE CHARGE PAID - INCLUDED IN PRICE*** Nicely decorated one bedroom with Juliet balcony located on the second floor of a McCarthy Stone retirement living plus development.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this two bedroom mid terraced house in Kincorth area of Aberdeen. Accommodation comprises ~ Entrance hall, Living room with feature fireplace and wood effect flooring. Modern kitchen with ample base and wall units which leads to a back porch with large storag..."
"Within a prime city centre location we are delighted to offer to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious immaculate ground floor apartment with exclusive garden and allocated parking space. Finished to the highest of standards throughout, while benefiting from the modern comforts of gas c..."
"A stunning fully refurbished 2 bedroom apartment in Aberdeen city centre, ready to just move in and enjoy with no work to do whatsoever."
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS WELL MAINTAINED PROPERTY Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to bring to the market, in the popular residential area of Heathryfold, this end-terraced 3 bedroom property. In great condition throughout this ..."
Lovely one bedroom apartment with balcony on the second floor overlooking the attractive entrance courtyard. The local town of Cults offers excellent amenities and transport links within a short walking distance from the development
INVESTORS ONLY - TENANTED INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY YIELDING ABOVE 6% NET! A well kept two-bedroom end terraced property in popular area of Sheddocksley close to Aberdeen city centre.
"We’re delighted to welcome this well presented two bedroom end of terrace house to the market in the Cove Bay area of southern Aberdeen. The main features of the property include; two spacious double bedrooms with ample storage space, a living room and kitchen area with neutral tones throughout p..."
"CCL are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom flat in the ideal city centre location of Trinity Street, Aberdeen. The property offers spacious accommodation all on one floor, with lovely light and neutral décor, a spacious and modern kitchen/living room, two bedrooms and bathroom..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market well presented second floor TWO BEDROOM FLAT situated in the city centre. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling located in-between Union Street and Union Square, overlooking The Green in the desirable ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this lovely TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT situated in the Bucksburn area and is conveniently located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling.
This well kept flat comprises living room, kitchen, bathroom, two bedrooms, electric heat..."
Spacious two bedroom apartment in a central location.
Fully renovated immaculate spacious two-bedroom apartment.
"
Located in a quiet residential street with many great amenities nearby, we offer for sale this two bedroom terrace villa. Spanning 2 floors of accommodation, the property has been well maintained throughout and would provide the ideal first home. Benefiting from gas central heating and double gl..."
Northwood Aberdeen are delighted to bring to the sales market this spacious two double bedroom top floor apartment with private parking in a factored development off Eday Road and allowing easy access around the City. The property is neutrally decorated and well presented and would be an ideal...
"This property is being sold by public auction, pre auction offers will be considered. Please contact Auction House Scotland for further information."
"Located in a quiet residential area we are pleased to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom, ground floor, self-contained flat in the Hilton area. The property offers bright, airy accommodation throughout and enjoys the comforts of gas central heating, double glazing, side, front, rear gardens..."
Good size traditional granite two bedroom first floor flat WITH PRIVATE PARKING situated in the Frederick Street area of Aberdeen. The property has been freshly decorated throughout with a new kitchen and bathroom with separate walk in shower having recently been installed. There are two double...
"Plot of land available on Hilton Road, Aberdeen, planning permission in principle for a detached dwelling with driveway parking"
Exceptionally Spacious Two Bedroom Second Floor Flat
Great Goodhope Park! Click on Virtual Tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this modern 2 bedroom ground floor flat in the Bucksburn area of Aberdeen. The property is beautifully finished throughout with neutral tones with the added benefit of a completely clean home report. This property would ...
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this bright and spacious, recently upgraded two double bedroom top floor apartment in the City Centre and in walking distance to many amenities or a short walk to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary. The property has modern kitchen and bathrooms and new f..."
"
***£8600 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE *** Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this lovely TWO BEDROOM TERRACED PROPERTY, situated in a popular residential area ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links, hospitals and schooling. The property comprises living room, ki..."
"Mid-Terrace, 3-bedroom house located on Chapman Way.Chapman Way is towards the outskirts of Aberdeen, and positioned off Provost Rust Drive, near local amenities, transportation links, schools, and is situated approximately 4 miles north-west of the city centre."
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present an Attractive Tenanted 3 Bedroom Terraced House located in popular location within Aberdeen. Home Report Value: £140,000 - PRICED TO SELL.   *** 80, Mastrick Road, Aberdeen, Aberdeenshire AB16 5PN previously sold for £190,000 in March..."
"Immaculate two bedroom first floor flat, close to hospitals and universities."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this spacious one bedroom bungalow within a popular residential location. Presented to walk-in condition throughout this is the perfect purchase for downsizers, first time buyers and buy to-let investors. With a wide range of local amenities close buy suc..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom Flat– all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £115,000 - £125,000*"
"Enjoying a quiet location in a well established residential area this spacious TWO BED MID TERRACE PROPERTY offers excellent value for money and also enjoys the benefits from Gas Central Heating and Double Glazing.
Early viewing is essential to appreciate the space this family home has to offer."
"MQ Estate Agents are delighted to present to the open market this rarely available two bedroom ground floor flat. This particular property will suit a multitude of buyers from first time buyers, down sizers to the discerning buy to let investor. The generously proportioned accommodation compris..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this rare opportunity to purchase a TWO BEDROOM FLAT within a granite church, which has been sub-divided into residential accommodation. It is situated in a central residential area in the North side of Aberdeen and is ideally located for access t..."
"****NEWLY REDUCED**** Stylishly presented for the new owner to move into with the minimum of fuss, we offer for sale this spacious two bedroom first floor flat with private parking situated in a modern purpose built development on Society Lane in Aberdeen. The property consists of good size lou..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom End Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £115,000 - £125,000*"
"Spacious two-bedroom, ground floor apartment available for sale in the Rosemount area of Aberdeen. The property enjoys benefits of gas heating, double glazing, private barriered non-allocated parking, security entry and a communal drying area.  The accommodation would benefit from some upgrading ..."
### INVESTMENT PROPERTY ###
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR FLAT.
The property is situated in the city centre and ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling.
The well presented flat comprises lounge, kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom, gas..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE situated in a convenient and popular residential area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The accommodation comprises on the ground floor: entrance hall with the lo..."
"We are proud to offer this One Bedroom Top Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £110,000 - £115,000*"
"Are you looking to 'size down ' or maybe it's your first home? then this 1 BED BUNGALOW is just for you.
Lovingly maintained, inside and out, bright, fresh and ready for its new owners...could this be you?
WELCOME HOME"
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £140,000 by a qualified Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) If you are seeking a straightforward refurbishment project in a suburb of Aberdeen, this property should be at the top of your list. Featuring two good-sized bedrooms, one..."
"We are proud to offer this One Bedroom First Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £110,000 - £120,000*"
"This newly refurbished, modern TWO BEDROOM ground floor flat, presented in immaculate condition is the perfect first time buy/buy to let investment. Perfectly located close to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, a bus route providing public transport to the city centre and local amenities."
"***LISTED £15000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this ONE BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT.
The property is situated in the West end of city centre and ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling.
The well presented flat compris..."
"*Listed £35,000 Below Home Report Value* We are delighted to present this spacious ground floor two bed self-contained property with private entrance and exclusive workshop in the sought after location of Rosemount. This property is decorated in neutral tones throughout and would make a fantastic..."
"Spacious two bedroom, mid-terrace house is available for sale in the north of Aberdeen City. The accommodation comprises of: entrance hallway with 1 storage cupboards; large lounge with front and rear windows, fitted kitchen with access to the rear garden; two double bedrooms with built-in wardro..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this unique two bedroom self-contained maisonette located in the City Centre, just off Holburn Street and providing easy access to public transport to Robert Gordon University and Aberdeen University. The property is bright and spacious, neutra..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market for sale this two bedroom end terrace dwelling house within a quiet yet established residential location. Although a degree of cosmetic redecoration is required, this property offers spacious accommodation throughout and is certain to appeal to investors, f..."
"Excellent opportunity for first time buyer or buy to let investor. 5F Rosebank Gardens, AberdeenViewing highly recommendedNorah Nesland and Re/max Aberdeen City & Shire are delighted to bring to market this spacious 2-bedroom top floor flat. Forming part of a modern and very central developmen..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this REALISTICALLY PRICED opportunity – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.  *GUIDE PRICE - £100,000-£110,000* "
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £110,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. ATTRACTIVELY PRICED - FREEHOLD - Investment Or Project Opportunity - COUNCIL TAX BAND B - Three Generously Sized Bedrooms - Wet Room Design - Prime Location - Cl..."
"Are you looking for a stylish and sleek 2 BED APARTMENT with the benefit of living in the city but with the volume turned down?
Then look no further FLAT C here on Holburn Street is ready and waiting for you to move straight in... unpack and relax...no more long commutes WELCOME HOME."
"MUST SELL highly motivated seller open to offers around £45,000 under home report value - Executive 1 bedroom apartment on the 3rd floor of a Cala homes built modern development. This is highly attractive to investors and first time buyers wanting to take steps on to the ladder."
"Spacious two bedroom, first floor flat is available for sale in the ever popular King Street area. The property forms part of this traditional granite building which benefits from security entry, well-kept communal garden, exclusive cellar, double glazing, gas heating and on street. Ideal opportu..."
"Prominently situated within the heart of King Street, AMAZING RESULTS!™ offers to the market this impressive traditional granite and stone built 2 bedroom tenement flat with its distinctive two level layout offering an ideal proposition to the discerning first time buyers stepping onto the proper..."
"Located in an extremely convenient and central location within a well maintained tenement building, we are please to offer for sale this well proportioned two bedroom first floor flat with breakfasting kitchen. It benefits from neutral decor throughout as well as gas central heating and double gl..."
"A two-bedroom top floor flat in a traditional building on Union Street, this property is ideal for those who want to be in the heart of the city with all that is has to offer on their doorstep."
"A great opportunity to purchase a spacious second floor flat situated in the Pittodrie area of Aberdeen. The flat is neutrally decorated and offers excellent space throughout and comprises of good size lounge with double windows, allowing plenty of natural light to flow through. There is a full..."
"We are delighted to offer the opportunity to purchase this two bedroomed flat located in the Bucksburn area, situated within an easy commute to Bridge of Don, Aberdeen City and Dyce Airport. With amenities including shopping, hotels and leisure facilities close by, equally riverside walks and Cra..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this bright and spacious top floor two bedroom apartment with private parking located in the City Centre, just minutes from Union Street, Bon Accord and Union Square Shopping Centres, North East Scotland College and Aberdeen University. The pro..."
"We are delighted to the present for sale this attractive 2 bedroom 1st floor flat with garage. The property is an ideal purchase for first time buyers and couples as it is well placed for access into the city, Bridge Of Don, Dyce Industrial Estates and the University & ARI. WELCOME HOME"
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this executive and modern ground floor studio apartment in the popular suburb of Stoneywood, ideally located for those working at Aberdeen Airport or commuting into the City. The property has been freshly painted with neutral decoration, ready ..."
"Are you looking for your first home or maybe a property to add to your portfolio...then this 2-bed ground floor flat is
the perfect purchase. Great price...great location... close to the University Campus, the Beach and the city with all its amenities.
What's not to love?
WELCOME HOME"
"INVEST IN RESIDENTIAL ACCOMODATION YIELDING NEAR 7% NET WITH SCOPE TO INCREASE! Two bedroom apartments with parking, just a few miles from Aberdeen's vibrant city centre."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this immaculately presented and recently renovated first floor traditional granite apartment with large shared rear garden and shed in Holburn, minutes to City Centre amenities. The property has a double bedroom, box room/home office, spacious ..."
"HELLO...are you looking for a lovely 2nd floor 2 BED APARTMENT situated within a modern development with all the benefits of city living but with the volume turned down. Private gated parking and only minutes from the beach, this spacious and well loved apartment is just waiting for you to move in."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this REALISTICALLY PRICED opportunity - ALL OFFERS AND INTEREST are INVITED.     **GUIDE PRICE - £95,000 - £105,000** "
"360 Virtual Tour and Video Tour Available PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET IN TORRY, ABERDEEN Yvette and RE/MAX Aberdeenare delighted to have been instructed to market this spacious twobedroom top floor apartment. The propertybenefits from two double bedrooms with built in..."
1 bedroom investment opportunity in Aberdeen city centre
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Beautiful First Floor 2 Bedroom Flat located in popular location within Aberdeen. Home Report of £120,000. 20% DISCOUNT - PRICED TO SELL.       *** 33F, Seaforth Road, Aberdeen, Aberdeenshire AB24 5PG previously sold..."
Immaculate three-bedroom first-floor flat in a tenement block of six.
"****NEW PRICE**** A fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom spacious first floor flat situated within Dyce in Aberdeen. The property consists of spacious modern lounge, on semi open plan with the beautifully appointed kitchen. There are three double bedrooms along with the bathroom w..."
" ***LISTED £15,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE*** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this two bed first floor flat in the West End of Aberdeen City. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The accommodation compris..."
"Top floor one-bedroom flat located in the Park Road Court development on Park Road.Park Road Court is located between King Street and the Beachfront. The location is close to transportation links, local amenities, Pittodrie Stadium, local amusements, and dining options."
"We offer for sale this two bedroom self contained flat situated on Middlefield Place in Aberdeen. The property has been freshly painted, has had new grey carpets fitted throughout and a new gas boiler installed with a 10 year warranty, certificate available. The accommodation comprises of loun..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market for sale this exceptionally spacious three bedroom mid floor flat in a popular residential location with panoramic views over the City and benefiting from full sunlight to front and rear. Within easy walking distance to The University of Aberdeen, North E..."
" Recently refurbished, immaculately presented Tenanted 1 bedroom Property. Excellent Investment Opportunity and Turnkey Investment, located in the popular location of Aberdeen. *** 13 Great Western Place, Aberdeen, AB10 6QN sold for £125,000 September 2021, 18 Ashley Road, Aberdeen, AB10 6R..."
Bright and spacious two bedroom second floor flat available for sale. The flat is situated in the popular residential area of Bridge of Don.
"This spacious (65m2), modern two-bedroom flat is partially furnished and ready for immediate occupation."
"This is an excellent opportunity to purchase a two bedroom second floor flat situated on Whitehall Place within the sought after Rosemount area of Aberdeen. Due to the recently reduced price, this is certain to be a popular choice. The property consists of bright and spacious lounge, two bedroom..."
Northwood is delighted to offer for sale this bright and spacious two bedroom self-contained upper flat with large rear garden in the Kittybrewster area of Aberdeen. Recently renovated this property is in a ready to move in condition and viewing is essential to appreciate the acco...
"Situated within an established residential area, we offer for sale this two bedroom top floor flat, with views over looking the harbour and city. The property offers well proportioned accommodation and would be ideally suited to a first time buyer or buy to let investor."
"Spacious two bedroom first floor flat in a purpose built modern development within the Woodside area of Aberdeen. This would be an ideal first time buy or a buy to let investment. The property consists of good size bright lounge with feature fireplace, two double bedrooms each with built-in ward..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM FLAT, conveniently situated in a quiet residential development of Aberdeen city centre. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, also transport links and Robert Gordons University. The ground floor flat..."
"Northwood Aberdeen are delighted to bring to the sales market this bright and spacious two double bedroom top floor apartment in a quiet and popular residential area of Bridge of Don, around a ten minute commute to the City Centre and with with plenty of amenities in the area. The property is ..."
"Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available This attractive property would make a perfect first time purchase and buy to let investment Please Call Lee-Ann Low on to arrange a viewing. For a Copy of The Home Report Email Lee-Ann Low, and RE/MAX Abe..."
Spacious two bedroom first floor flat in a highly desirable location only minutes from city centre with private parking.
We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Ground Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
At 42m2 this one-bed ultra-modern property is immaculate and in walk-in condition.
"*Listed £8,000 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase a self contained, one bedroom upper flat in the Danestone area of Aberdeen. The property consists of spacious lounge, decorated in neutral tones and with a peaceful outlook over the front of the property. The functional ki..."
Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom first floor flat which is in walk-in condition. The property has been upgraded with a new kitchen and bathroom and benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. There is an open plan Living Room / Kitchen overlooking the f...
Tenanted Aberdeen buy-to-let investment property with 8.6% yield. 
We’re delighted to welcome this stunning two bedroom flat to the market in the city centre of Aberdeen. The property is a part of a recent development which was converted only 3 years ago. This flat is in excellent condition with neutral decor and laminate flooring throughout ensuring the new o...
"*Listed £7,000 Below Home Report Value*
Spacious first floor two bedroom apartment is available for sale in the Torry area of Aberdeen. This property boosts excellent space and storage. The accommodation has been decorated in neutral tones throughout. Torry is located to the south of Aberdeen ci..."
"Well-presented one bedroom, self-contained, maisonette is situated in a very popular location of cove in Aberdeen City. Recently decorated throughout with a fully enclosed rear garden, this would be a great purchase for professionals, first time purchase or for an investment. The accommodation c..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £75,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. With minimal renovation required, this ideally situated apartment presents a great opportunity for anyone planning to add value to a superb property in the heart o..."
Immaculate basement/garden two-bedroom must be viewed.
"Are you looking for your first home or maybe a property to add to your portfolio...then this 2-bed selfcontained ground floor flat is
the perfect purchase. Great price...great location and free on street parking, No464 is just waiting for you to move in and unpack.
So don't miss out WELCOME HOME"
One/Two Bedroom Top Floor Flat
"Self-contained two bedroom flat in walk-in condition in the Auchmill Road area of Aberdeen. The property consists of spacious lounge with feature fireplace, two double bedrooms, a fully fitted functional kitchen and a shower room with walk-in shower. There is a large L shaped hallway giving ac..."
"Spacious two-bedroom, ground floor apartment available for sale in the Bucksburn area of Aberdeen. The property enjoys benefits of gas heating, double glazing, on street parking and an exclusive are in the rear garden. The accommodation is ready to move into and comprises of: entrance hallway; ge..."
This property is being sold by public auction pre auction offers will be considered. Please contact Auction House Scotland for further information
"Tenanted 1 bedroom property within historic building conveniently located halfway between the University of Aberdeen and the City Centre. This 1st-floor property has been recently refurbished and comprises a bright 3 window living room, spacious dining kitchen, double bedroom with built-in war..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. **GUIDE PRICE - £85,000 - £90,000**"
"Well-presented one bedroom, self-contained, ground floor flat is situated in a very popular location of cove in Aberdeen City.  Recently decorated and new carpets throughout with a fully enclosed rear garden, this would be a great purchase for professionals, first time purchase or for an investme..."
"2nd floor one-bedroom flat located on Guild Street.Guild Street is in the heart of Aberdeen and a stones throw from the Bus and Train stations as well as a short distance to the ferry terminal. The property is located near local amenities, transportation links, and schools."
"Video Tour Available PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET IN UNION GROVE, ABERDEEN CITY CENTRE Yvette and RE/MAX Aberdeenare delighted to have been instructed to market this immaculate well presented onebedroom ground floor apartment. The propertyis in a traditional granite bu..."
"Virtual Tour and Video Tour Available Lee-Ann Low ) and RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire are delighted to offer this THREE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR FLAT in Aberdeen City. The property comprises a large lounge, kitchen, bathroom and three double bedrooms. Access is via a phone entry ..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market for sale this well presented ground floor tenement flat within the sought after Rosemount area of the city. Decorated to walk in condition throughout this is a perfect purchase for first time buyers, professionals and buy to let investors. The block is set ..."
Video and 360 degree Tour Available Lee-Ann Low with RE/MAX Aberdeen City and Shire is delighted to offer this generously proportioned two bedroom first floor flat that Internally benefits from extensive storage and externally benefits from a communal residents car park. Location Located w...
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to bring to the sales market this recently renovated ground floor double bedroom apartment in a traditional granite tenement located just off Rosemount Place, where many local amenities can be accessed. The property benefits from a period feature working fire, n..."
"Bonnyview Drive is a pleasant two bedroom fully renovated apartment which is well placed for a range of local shops and amenities. The property is close to Aberdeen’s main arterial route enabling quick and easy access to most parts of the city, in particular, Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Aberdeen A..."
"Forming part of a substantial, tenement block in a convenient location within easy reach of local amenities, Aberdeen University and North East Scotland College, this bright and spacious TWO BEDROOM ground floor flat is offered for sale."
Get down to Gladstone Place! Click on virtual tour! Martin and Co are proud to offer this modern 1 bedroom property in the woodside area of Aberdeen. Beautiful throughout. This property also a private garage to offer. Viewing is highly recommended.
Huge potential two-bedroom self-contained ground floor dwelling.
"Ferryhill Terrace in Aberdeen is located in the popular suburb of Ferryhill.Accommodation comprises; Living Room, Kitchen, 2 Double Bedroom, bathroom.The property further benefits from Gas Central Heating, Double Glazing, Shared Rear Garden, On-Street Parking."
We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Top Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. 
"Situated in a well maintained purpose built block of only three flats, we are pleased to present this spacious two bed first floor flat with large exclusive gardens and fantastic storage throughout in the popular residential area of Torry, just minutes walk from many local amenities, including To..."
"*Listed £5,000 Below Home Report Value* This first floor apartment is well located within the Rosemount area of Aberdeen. The well presented and tastefully decorated accommodation comprises of: common Entrance, Hallway, bright and spacious Lounge, well designed modern Kitchen, Double Bedroom, a..."
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.GUIDE PRICE - £80,000-90,000"
"Located in the Hilton area of Aberdeen, we are pleased to offer for sale this granite built, 2-bedroom ground floor property."
We are proud to present this One Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. 
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented one bedroom, top-floor flat on Aberdeen Harbour. A central hallway welcomes you into the property, and the bright double bedroom with built in storage welcomes you in first. The adjacent shower room has been tastefully decorated with ne..."
Exceptionally Spacious One Bedroom Second Floor Flat
"THIS SPACIOUS, WELL LOVED, TOP FLOOR 2 BED FLAT, SET ON A QUIET STREET, JUST 3 MILES SOUTH OF THE CITY OF ABERDEEN. IDEAL FOR THE FIRST TIME BUYER WHO WANTS THE BENEFITS OF LIVING NEAR THE CITY BUT WITH THE VOLUME TURNED DOWN. BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT NOW TO VIEW SO YOU DON'T MISS OUT."
"Northwood Aberdeen are pleased to offer for sale this bright and spacious upper apartment located in Torry, just a short walk from the City Centre. The property has two double bedrooms, is neutrally decorated throughout and has a large rear garden, an ideal purchase for first time buyers, prof..."
£5000 below Survey Value Spacious one bedroom second floor apartment in Aberdeen’s city centre on Langstane Place. Virtual Tour Available – Video Tour Available. RE/MAX Coast & Country are delighted to have been instructed to market this spacious one bedroom second floor ap...
Very Well Presented exceptionally spacious first floor one bedroom flat within walking distance of ARI with amazing storage and beautiful garden at the rear
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM FLAT situated in a popular and central residential area in the South side of Aberdeen. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The property comprises of open plan..."
"*Listed £20,000 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious two/three bedroom flat in the residential area of Mastrick. A central hall welcomes you into the property and a spacious lounge draws you to the rear of the property with its natural light highlighting the pa..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat  – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.GUIDE PRICE - £75,000-85,000"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this attractive ONE BEDROOM flat forming part of traditional granite building within the city centre.
The property is conveniently located off Holburn Street, offering local amenities, schools and transport links within a short walking distance.
W..."
For sale via National Online Auction. Bidding opens on Monday 13th March at 1pm and closes Tuesday 14th March from 1pm. Register to Bid.
The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. 
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this well presented and tastefully decorated one bedroom, second floor flat in the heart of Rosemount in Central Aberdeen. Enter into the property into a bright central hallway, freshly decorated with natural light oak flooring. A bright, generously proportioned..."
"Forming part of a traditional two storey granite building, Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT, situated in a popular and central residential area in the South side of Aberdeen. It is ideally located for access to local amenitie..."
This well finished smart one-bedroom flat for sale is perfectly situated for access to the city centre and the nearby Beach and University of Aberdeen. With only three flats in the block It makes a perfect first time buy or buy to rent investment. It has had lots of sensible improvements done on it.
" Prime Buy to Let investment Opportunity Property. Great sized 1 bedroom flat currently tenanted at £550 pcm. Sold with tenant in situ. Perfect Investment, set in popular Rosemount area. ***Flat E, Skene Terrace, Aberdeen, Abn AB10 1RP sold for £120,000 April 2022, 34g, Maberly Street, Aber..."
"PART OF PORTFOLIO SALE - TENANTED INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY • Recently refurbished, immaculately presented, 1 bedroom flat located in the popular Rosemount area of Aberdeen. Currently Tenanted at £475 pcm. • ***212b, Rosemount Place, Aberdeen, Abn AB25 2XR, Sold for £105,000 May 2018, 214, Rosem..."
"Spacious two bedroom, first floor apartment available for sale in the Bucksburn area of Aberdeen. The property enjoys benefits of gas heating, double glazing, ample on street parking and a communal laundry room.  The accommodation is ready to move into and comprises of: entrance hallway with thre..."
"Recently refurbished, one bedroom ground floor flat is available for sale in an extremely popular area located a stone throw away from Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Westburn and Victoria Parks. The spacious accommodation comprises of entrance hallway with large storage cupboards; large lounge; Newly ..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this bright and spacious top floor apartment in Cornhill, providing easy access to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Cornhill hospital and the City Centre. This neutrally decorated, ready to move in apartment has two double bedrooms, ample storage thro..."
"**£20,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE** O'Malley Property are delighted to present to the market this lovely 2 bedroom first floor apartment situated in a popular location of Aberdeen. The property comprises an open plan lounge/kitchen, one double bedroom and a single bedroom, a kitchen and ..."
Two bedroom home Traditional granite built property Walk in condition Modern décor and presentation Neat and well maintained communal areas and garden Ideal first home 
 Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available Great opportunity with a sitting tenant. To Arrange a Viewing Please Call Lee-Ann Low on . For a Copy of The Home Report Email Lee-Ann Low and RE/MAX Aberdeen City and shire are delighted to bring to the...
"*Listed £7,200 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious one bedroom, first floor flat in Central Aberdeen. A large central hallway welcomes you into the property, drawing you first into the spacious lounge. Light fills the room through a large front aspect window h..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £85,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. This traditional tenement flat has a huge amount to offer it's new owners. With one double bedroom, a living room, a fitted kitchen, a bathroom, double glazing, c..."
"Spacious two bedroom apartment is available for sale in the Cornhill area of Aberdeen with local amenities close by and excellent transport links to other parts of the city. The property offers the buyer a chance to makeover to their own taste and consists of large living/dining room, kitchen, tw..."
"** SALE BY AUCTION - 17 March 2022, Deadline for Offers ** The property comprises a purpose-built THREE BEDROOM third floor (top) flat within a corner four storey tenement building containing seven flats on the upper levels...."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom first floor flat situated within the Northfield Area of Aberdeen on at a price that reflects the work required. The property does require a degree of upgrading and consists of spacious lounge, three double bedrooms, fully fitted kitchen and fam..."
"Large (for a one-bed) ultra-modern property, which is immaculate and in walk-in condition."
"*Listed £18,000 Below Home Report Value* Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious first floor, one bedroom flat situated on sought-after George Street in the heart of Aberdeen. A central entrance hall welcomes you into the property, and the bright and spacious lounge draws you in first. Na..."
An ideal 1st time purchase or buy to let! A bright and spacious apartment which is centrally located in Rosemount.
"We offer for sale a one bedroom first floor flat in a traditional granite building situated in the King Street area of Aberdeen. The large communal hallway is protected by a security entry system. The property consists of spacious lounge with feature fireplace, a double bedroom with the added b..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £65,000 - £75,000*"
"Located in the desirable Cove Bay area of Aberdeen, this 1-bedroom on Earns Heugh Circle is close to costal trails, local business parks, the Tullos industrial estate, and transportation links.Accommodation comprises; Living Room, Kitchen, Double Bedroom, bathroom.The property fu..."
Spacious two-bedroom top-floor flat
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £65,000 - £70,000*"
"Enjoying a pleasant location this spacious one bedroom ground floor flat is located within a quiet, well established residential area of Aberdeen. Decorated in neutral tones and finished with laminate flooring the property also benefits from gas fired central heating and double glazing. The acco..."
"Area of land for sale at Wellside Circle, Kingswells, Aberdeen - 628 Square Metres. Planning permission in principle for two semi-detached properties was refused for this area of ..."
"House Sales Direct are delighted to present this 1 bedroom first floor, flat to the market in Aberdeen, Scotland, perfect for a first-time buyer or beginner landlord looking to start their property profile. Homereport Value £75,000"
 Norah Nesland and Re/Max Aberdeenshire are delighted to offer for sale this spacious TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT part of a 4 in a block. It benefits from gas central heating and double glazing along with kitchen off the living area and bathroom. This generously sized property is in need of a ...
"One-bedroom, 1st floor apartment in Rutheriston Circle.Rutheriston Circle is located a short distance from Holburn Street, Robert Gordon University, Duthie Park, the River Dee and is near local amenities, transportation links, and schools."
"A lovely renovated one bedroom flat situated in central George Street in Aberdeen. The top floor flat consists of spacious and bright lounge with 2 windows, double bedroom, modern bathroom with shower over bath and fully fitted kitchen with all appliances. It is double glazed and benefits from ..."
"VIRTUAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE Recently decorated, two bedroom top floor flat is available for sale in a very popular area located a stone throw away from Aberdeen Royal Infirmary, Westburn and Victoria Parks. The spacious accommodation comprises of: entrance hallway with large storage cupboard; lar..."
Virtual Tour Available and Video Tour Available Great opportunity with sitting tenant. To Arrange a Viewing Please Call Lee-Ann Low on . For a Copy of The Home Report Email Lee-Ann Low and RE/MAX Aberdeen City and shire are delighted to bring to the mar...
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Beautiful Flat 2 Bedroom Flat located in popular location of Mastrick in Aberdeen. Home Report of £75,000. 13% DISCOUNT - PRICED TO SELL.       *** 5, Findhorn Place, Aberdeen, AB16 6TL previously sold for £99,000, 4..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £60,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. With minimal renovation required, this ideally situated first-floor flat presents a great opportunity for anyone planning to add value to a superb property in the ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT, conveniently situated in Aberdeen city centre. It is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and Robert Gordons University. Upon entering, the hallway leads to the full acc..."
"*Listed £5,000 Below Home Report Value* This delightful one bedroom flat has been fully renovated throughout to create an ideal buy to let or first time buy opportunity. This property is in a ready to move into condition with double glazing, electric heating and is tastefully decorated throughout..."
Spacious Two Bedroom Top Floor (Second) in Walk in Condition
"***GOING TO AUCTION***Brighton & Beck are pleased to offer to online auction this well proportioned flat in the ever popular locale of Aberdeen. Offered over one level, the property comprises of large open plan lounge with kitchenette, two bedrooms and bathroom. Further benefits include washing ..."
"*Listed £7,000 Below Home Report Value* With sea views and generously proportioned rooms, we are pleased to offer for sale this exceptionally bright and airy self-contained first floor flat in the popular residential area of Torry. Pentland Road is ideally located close to Torry Battery which is ..."
"Northwood Aberdeen is delighted to offer for sale this bright and spacious ground floor self-contained apartment with shared rear garden in Torry, allowing easy access to the City Centre and South of Aberdeen. The property has it’s own entrance door, free on street parking and is in read..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this ONE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT, situated in a central and convenient area that is ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. Forming part of a traditional granite building, the property is entered upon from a ..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this lovely ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT situated in the city centre area and is conveniently located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling.
This well kept flat comprises living room, kitchen, bathroom, double bedroom, electri..."
We are proud to present this One Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
a large two-bedroom first floor flat introduced to the market in good condition and is available for occupation immediately.
Tenanted 1 bedroom buy-to-let investment in Aberdeen with 8.3% yield.
" The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this One Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. **GUIDE PRICE - £50,000 - £55,000**"
"Representing an ideal first time buy or buy to let investment, we are pleased to offer for sale this attractive ground floor studio flat located next to a wealth of local amenities. Boasting gas central heating and double glazing this property is neutrally decorated throughout, ideal for the disc..."
ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS OR BUY TO LET INVESTORS Video and 360 degree Tour Available RE/MAX Coast and Country is delighted to bring to the market this studio apartment set within a popular residential area of Woodside. The property is well serviced with electric storage heating and double ...
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Vacant 1 Bedroom 1st Floor Flat located in popular location within Bridge of Don, Aberdeen. PRICED TO SELL.   *** 66, Lee Crescent North, Bridge Of Don, Aberdeen, Aberdeenshire AB22 8FP previously sold for £100,000 in November 2021,..."
"easy walking distance of Aberdeen City Centre, the property is in good condition, vacant and available for immediate occupation"
"***LISTED £7000 BELOW HOM EREPORT VALUE*** In the popular Torry area of the city, this one bedroomed first floor flat forms part of a traditional granite building with the communal areas protected by a security entry system. An ideal first time purchase being sold inclusive of all furniture, the..."
"We are proud to present this One Bedroom Flat - CHAIN FREE*GUIDE PRICE - £47,500 - 52,500*"
"Are you looking for an investment or maybe a property while you are at university, well look no further, this immaculate studio flat has been totally refurbished and is ready to move in.
On a quiet street, close to Aberdeen University but also close to the beach and city centre...
WELCOME HOME"
"Two bedroom apartment in the thriving area of Torry, an ideal buy to let investment."
Modern Spacious Ground Floor Studio Flat.
"****NEW FIXED PRICE**** We offer for sale this BUILDING PLOT with lapsed outline planning permission for a three bedroom house with garage in the popular area of Dyce, Aberdeen. This building plot Is approximately 215m2 and offers good access with off street parking. Services are situated close..."
"Excellent opportunity for the buy to let investor to purchase this one bedroom first floor flat in the Torry area of Aberdeen, offered to the market £30,000 below home report value."
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Large Flat 1 Bedroom Cottage Flat located in popular location of Aberdeen. Home Report of £55,000. 18% DISCOUNT - PRICED TO SELL.   *** 12, Western Road, Aberdeen AB24 2QQ previously sold for £130,000, 32, Western Road, Aberdeen AB2..."
" EXCELLENT FIRST TIME BUY, BUY TO LET OPPORTUNITY OR SECOND HOME. Viewing recommended on the ground floor flat. CALL Norah to view. This ground floor apartment is an ideal purchase for a city centre home. Benefiting from double glazing and electric panel heating along wi..."
"** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** Tenanted ONE BEDROOM UPPER FLAT close to University Campus. Currently tenanted at Â£320 per month. Allied RICS Home Report - Â£40,000. Secure main door entry at ground level. Communal rear gardens.."
"This property is being sold by Public Auction on Thursday 23rd March at 2.00pm in the Radisson Red, 25 Tunnel Street, Glasgow G3 8HL. Register Now!"
Norah Nesland and Re/Max Aberdeen City and Shire are delighted to bring to market this one bedroom ground floor property. Call Norah to view. This property is part of a traditional granite building protected by a secure entry system. Complete with double glazing and gas central...
"SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION THURSDAY 30TH MARCH 2023 AT 9.00AM. Tenanted one bedroom flat in Torry, Aberdeen. Currently let for £320pcm, providing a rental yield of 9.6% at Guide Price - a turnkey purchase for a Buy-to-Let Investment with immediate income."
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Tenanted 1 Bedroom flat in popular street within Torry, Aberdeen: HOME REPORT £60,000 - PRICED TO SELL.   *** 61, Menzies Road, Aberdeen AB11 9AS previously sold for £80,000, 51 Menzies Road, Aberdeen, AB11 9AS previously sold for £..."
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Tenanted 1 Bedroom flat in popular street within Torry, Aberdeen: HOME REPORT £77,000, 50% DISCOUNT - PRICED TO SELL.   *** 219 Flat B, Victoria Road, Torry, Aberdeen, Kincardine AB11 9NH previously sold for £112,000, 221, Victoria ..."
"  Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Tenanted 1 Bedroom 1st Floor flat in popular street within Torry, Aberdeen: HOME REPORT: £90,000, PRICED TO SELL.     *** 61, Menzies Road, Aberdeen AB11 9AS previously sold for £80,000, 51, Menzies Road, Aberdeen AB..."
"** Timed Online Auction - 23 March 2023 ** Traditional Tenement Flat in popular residential area of Ferryhill, Aberdeen City Centre. Rental Potential Â£475PCM - Â£5,700 per year. Vacant Possession Property. RICS HOME REPORT - Â£55,000.."
"The flat enters into an entrance hallway that leads through to an open plan living room with kitchen area, bedroom and shower room with W.C. This property benefits from UPVC double glazing and well maintained garden grounds to the rear. This property would benefit from some TLC which will allow a..."
OpenHouse Dundee and Angus is excited to bring to the market this well presented 2 Bedroom mid-terraced villa. This two-bedroom property is situated within a popular location in Dundee and is perfectly positioned for accessing local amenities and public transport links to surrounding (cont.)
Well-established and profitable Christmas Tree and Firewood business. About 584 Acres (236 Ha) in all Available as a whole
Surely one of the finest modern country houses in Angus.
Stunning Arts and Crafts house.
"Outstanding executive home forming part of an exclusive development. Open plan sitting/family room, kitchen/dining room, 5 bedrooms (3 en-suite), bathroom. Integral double garage. Detached double garage with workshop. Mono block driveway. Extensive gardens. Garden room with deck and outdoor hot tub."
- Prime mixed use development opportunity - Planning granted for 28 residential units and 3 retail units (18/00988/full) - Central location opposite Dundee waterfront - Potential GDV of residential units c. £5.6-5.9m (Subject to Spec & Market Conditions....
"Offering a wonderfully flexible and spacious family home, with four bedrooms, multiple reception rooms, and three bathrooms, enhanced by tasteful décor and characterful features, this generous detached house is situated in Broughty Ferry, close to all the town has to offer. The house is accompani..."
"Outstanding Arts & Crafts house, conveniently located and well presented, with good views."
"This is an exceptional opportunity to purchase an extensive detached villa situated in the heart of Broughty Ferry. Monifieth Road offers immediate access to a wide range of local amenities including: boutique shops, cafés, bars, restaurants, beach, harbour, train station and commuter transport l..."
"Fully furnished home with a SUNROOM and integrated GARAGE, as well as TWO EN-SUITE BEDROOMS, a UTILITY ROOM, spare downstairs room which can be used as HOME OFFICE or FAMILY SNUG. Open plan KITCHEN, dining and sunroom area. INTEGRATED KITCHEN APPLIANCES are included. FITTED WARDROBES in all bedrooms"
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this exceptional five-bedroom detached property in Elcho Drive Broughty Ferry. 
"Immaculately presented five bedroom, six public room and four bathroom luxury home. With horses grazing the fields to the North; Woods to the East; Ponds to the South; Centred around Claverhouse Equestrian Centre, and a large community green space, and an award winning on-site private nursary, it..."
Wonderful four bedroom bungalow in a highly desirable area
"SUPERIOR BRAND-NEW BUILD 4 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW 145m2 + GARAGE Strathmore Homes are building this select development of 6 high quality, energy efficient detached bungalows now & the first one will be ready to move into by Spring 2023. Reservations are being taken for Plots 1, 2 & 3 (4,5,6 SOLD)"
"Situated in the heart of Dundee city by the River Tay, The Old Rope Works is a prestigious new development from award-winning developer, Carriden Homes. The exclusive site occupies the historic Tay Rope Works, incorporating the stylish, C-listed, Graeco-Egyptian façade, and transforming..."
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this exceptional five-bedroom, detached family home set within a large corner plot with stunning views overlooking the golf course and pond beyond. "
"An Impressive Detached Family Home With Generous Gardens, Driveway And Double Garage. The Spacious Accommodation Comprises 4 Double Bedrooms With 2 En-Suites, An Open-Plan Living/Dining Area And Kitchen, Lounge, Family Area, Bathroom, Utility And Wc. Move-In Condition, Must Be Viewed!"
"Need impressing? This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living, DESIGNER KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE."
"FOUR bedroom, three storey DETACHED home with DESIGNER kitchen, UTILITY room. Stunning TOP FLOOR MAIN bedroom with ensuite and Velux windows."
Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £3600! Experience exceptional living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. Integral garage and driveway.
"A Superbly Spacious Detached Family Home In A Highly Sought-After Location On The Fringe Of Dundee. The Accommodation Comprises 4 Bedrooms With Master En-Suite, A Stunning Open-Plan Living Area/Kitchen, A Family Room, Bathroom, Utility And Wc. Garage, Driveway And Lovely Gardens. Must Be Viewed!"
"Get PART EXCHANGE XTRA OR £8,349 LBTT PAID! This popular 4 bedroom property in Dundee is an ideal family home. Downstairs, you will find a large lounge, an open-plan kitchen/dining room ideal for entertaining and a handy utility room. Upstairs, you will find a spacious main bedroom with en suite,..."
Experience exceptional living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. Integral garage and driveway.
"Set within a highly desirable, quiet and charming central Ferry cul-de-sac, this detached one and a half storey bungalow offers exceptional accommodation set within a generous plot. Albert Gardens has long been admired for offering the perfect blend of bustling Broughty Ferry living combined with..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £68,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. A highly desirable move-in-ready apartment ideally situated in the coastal city of Dundee. With one double bedroom, one spacious reception room, and one stylish t..."
"An exceptional one and a half storey bungalow, set at the end of a private no through road, with outstanding views over the wild flower park and Claypotts castle. Offering the perfect blend of charming outlooks, excellent garden space and beautiful modern interiors, this versatile home is a rare ..."
"Thorntons are delighted to offer to the market four dwellings, designed by award-winning Jon Frullani Architects and built by West Developments which is an established developer firm renowned for building high-quality bespoke houses. There are three apartments and an attached 4-bedroom house, ..."
"NEW BUILD with DETACHED GARAGE. Grand FAMILY HOME - kitchen includes INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and has PATIO DOORS to the GARDEN, and a UTILITY ROOM. Downstairs W.C. An EN-SUITE off the master bedroom. Four large DOUBLE BEDROOMS, all with a FITTED WARDROBE. Bathroom, en-suite and W.C TILING INCLUDED!"
"Jack Easson and RE/MAX Real Estate Centre are bringing to market this luxurious four bedroom plus fifth bedroom/study detached family home in the popular West End of Dundee, situated in a cul-de-sac very close to Ninewells Hospital. The property benefits from the quiet suburban life which familie..."
"DETACHED villa home with GARAGE. Open plan kitchen dining area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and PATIO DOORS to the garden. Off this area, is a UTILITY ROOM. Separate lounge and W.C complete the ground floor. Four spacious DOUBLE BEDROOMS, all with FITTED WARDOROBES, and an EN-SUITE off bedroom 1."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this immaculate 5 bedroom detached family home on Claverhouse Road.
"Experience exceptional. This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. Downstairs WC, UTILITY room and EN SUITE."
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. Downstairs WC, UTILITY room and EN SUITE."
"New build DETACHED home with GARAGE. Open plan kitchen/dining area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, and French doors to the TURFED GARDEN. Four spacious DOUBLE BEDROOMS, all with FITTED WARDROBES, and an EN-SUITE off the master. Bathroom, en-suite and W.C - all include tiling."
"***For Show Home Opening hours please contact Thorntons New Build team *** Block G Milton Mill is the last phase of this impressive apartment development which is located on the waterfront of Monifieth. This block, which is spread over 5 floors, consists of a mixture of 2 and 3..."
"Home to sell? Enjoy PART EXCHANGE XTRA & FLOORING WORTH £3,362 at this 4 bed home in Dundee! Ideal for a growing family, this home has a single integral garage and a beautiful view of the pond from the front of the property. Downstairs, a large lounge leads through to an open-plan kitchen/dining ..."
Experience exceptional. This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and both FRENCH and BI-FOLD doors. Downstairs WC and EN SUITE.
Experience exceptional. This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. Downstairs WC and EN SUITE.
 **Price reduction for Five Double Bedroom Split Villa Apartment in Dundee West** This five bedroom period split villa is located in the Dundee West end under half a mile walking distance to the popular Perth road and Dundee University. The villa is set over two levels. The lower level compris...
Rosie Fraser Real Esate are delighted to bring to the market this exceptional four bedroom massionette with stunning views over the river Tay.
Rosie Fraser is delighted to bring to the market this well presented 3 bedroom family home on John Huband Drive in Birkhill. 
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this exceptional home which is spread over three levels within the B listed building of Greystanes House. 
"Enjoying a desirable location in the West End of Dundee, this traditional semi-detached cottage lies enviably close to shops, schools, both universities, excellent road and rail links, and picturesque open green space. Arranged over two levels, the five-bedroom two-bathroom property offers well-d..."
"A RARE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! A Traditional Terraced Townhouse In A Prime West End Location Requiring Some Upgrading. There is 215 Square Meters Of Accommodation Over 3 Levels Comprising 5 Bedrooms, Lounge, Kitchen, Bathroom And A Basement Comprising 2 Further Rooms, A Shower Room And Utility."
"Located in the very heart of Broughty Ferry, less than 100m from the beautiful new beachfront promenade, 75 St.Vincent street is a charming Victorian mid-terraced villa boasting retained period features and a floor area in excess of 160m2. Homes in central Broughty Ferry have long been coveted fo..."
"OPEN HOUSE - Every Friday between 5pm and 7pm - Show home is 5 Cairn Avenue - if these times don't suit, get in touch to arrange your private viewing 14 Luxury Semi-Detached New Builds – Dighty Estates FINAL PHASE - 6 AVAILABLE - 8 RESERVED ** Some Plots Available For Entry Now ** ..."
"NEW BUILD semi-detached home with DRIVEWAY and GARDEN. Modern throughout with INTEGRATED KITCHEN APPLIANCES and a versatile open plan layout. FITTED WARDROBES provide great storage in all bedrooms. TILING is included in the bathroom, en-suite and W.C. "
"New Build Apartment block comprising two-bedroom apartments with En-suite, built-in wardrobes, good storage facilities, and designated car parking space. High amenity location with good public transport links to surrounding towns & Dundee City Centre."
*** Christmas Offer - All Flooring Included - ends 1st of January 2023 *** Andy Henderson and Remax Real Estate Centre are bringing to the market this spacious three bedroom detached home in the popular residential area of Downfield. This home will be available for entry around March/April 20...
"Thorntons are delighted to bring to the market another quality development by H & H Properties (UK) Ltd situated on the site of the former Macalpine Primary School St Leonards Place, Dundee. These stylish detached houses offer the astute buyer the opportunity to purchase a property in a much soug..."
This extraordinary home boasts LIVING ROOM with BI-FOLD doors. DESIGNER KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM.
Exciting new development of 7 executive apartments in sought after West Ferry loc. 2 bed apartments.   ONLY ONE REMAINING
"This is an outstanding opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented semi-detached villa situated in a highly sought-after Broughty Ferry location. Dawson Road is ideally placed for a wide range of local amenities including: boutique shops, cafés, bars, restaurants, beach front, Dawson Park, tr..."
Spacious family villa with exceptionally large kitchen and diner recently fitted. There are some surprises too such as the concealed entrance to the home study or pantry as desired. The drive is neatly laid and perfect to hold several vehicles leaving the garage free for any other purpose. The co...
"A Superb Development of ECO Homes With Outstanding Quality And Low Running Costs, Within Easy Walking Distance Of The City Centre. 10 Properties Available, 4 Detached Three Bedroom Detached Houses, 4 Semi-Detached Three Bedroom Houses, And 2 Detached Two Bedroom Bungalows. Prices From £220000."
"An Excellent Family Home In A Highly Sought-After Location On The Fringe Of Dundee. The Accommodation Is Bright And Spacious Comprising 3 Double Bedrooms With Master En-Suite, Lounge, Dining Kitchen With Patio Doors To The Rear, Bathroom and Wc. 2 Allocated Parking Spaces, Gardens With Decked Area."
"*** LAST REMAINING PLOT AVAILABLE *** ** New Development Of 9 Homes In The Downfield Area ** Garry Terrace Development 8 Semi-Detached - £240,000 - 7 RESERVED (1 Available) 1 Detached - £250,000 - RESERVED New development of 9 houses (1 Available) in the popular residential ..."
"Semi-detached NEW BUILD with DRIVEWAY. Great family home, FULL HEIGHT WINDOWS in the lounge, and INTEGRATED APPLIANCES in the kitchen, with FRENCH DOORS leading out to the garden. Downstairs W.C off the large entrance hallway. EN-SUITE off the master bedroom, and FITTED WARDROBES included."
"We are delighted to present to the market ""Crombielea"" a spacious Detached Bungalow with great potential and adaptable accommodation. The accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, access to the floored attic storage and eaves by Ramsay ladder, with double glazed window, the attic could eas..."
"** Home Report Value - £260,000 ** Andy Henderson and Remax Real Estate Centre are bringing to the market this spacious three bedroom detached home in a sought after location in Broughty Ferry. The property has an abundance of potential and is ready for someone to set their own stamp on ..."
"Purplebricks are excited to bring to the market this spacious three-bedroom detached villa situated within a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after Strathmartine area in the city of Dundee. This is an excellent opportunity which will appeal to a broad range of potential buyers, especially famili..."
"A Superb Semi-Detached Family Home In A Highly Sought-After Location Within Broughty Ferry. The Accommodation Comprises 3 Bedrooms, Lounge, Dining/Family Area, Kitchen And Bathroom. Excellent Garden With Decked Area And Outbuilding, Driveway, Garage/Sun Room. Viewing Essential!"
AN EXTREMELY WELL PRESENTED BRIGHT AND SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT SET WITHIN THE HEART OF DUNDEE IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYER OR BUY TO LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ACCOMMODATION OVER ABOUT 90 SQ M COMPRISES: 3 BEDROOMS - LOUNGE - KITCHEN AND SHOWER ROOM 
"Tastefully-presented and spacious, three-bedroom, southerly-facing, semi-detached home, with gardens and two allocated parking spaces. With an end-of-cul-sac plot, in the highly sought-after residential area Broughty Ferry, east of Dundee city centre. A bright, welcoming hallway is finished wi..."
"An Extended Semi-Detached Family House Located In A Sought-After Residential Area On The Fringe Of Dundee. The Accommodation Comprises 3 Bedrooms (One Of Which Is Downstairs), A Lounge, Kitchen, Downstairs Bathroom And A Shower Room Upstairs. Private Garden, Driveway."
Semi-detached Bungalow with three bedrooms and a garage with a drive. Be quick.
"Ask us about Part Exchange for this great family-sized home. Ashton Terrace presents a fantastic opportunity for a growing family to build a future here with many attractive features to enjoy. Cleverly extended, this home offers elegant proportions for family living with two public rooms, two bat..."
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this delightful three-bedroom villa in the highly sought-after west end of Dundee. The property is spread over two levels with the downstairs comprising of a spacious Livingroom with a large window that floods the room with light, a ..."
"A Stunning First-Floor Apartment With Deceptively Spacious Accommodation (Approx 135 Square Metres). 3 Double Bedrooms With Master En-Suite, Lounge And Open-Plan Kitchen/Dining Room, Bathroom. Lovely Views Of The River Tay. Private Parking Space In The Secure Underground Garage. Must Be Viewed!"
CLOSING DATE SET - FRIDAY 10TH MARCH AT 1PM This is a rare opportunity to acquire a superior executive apartment set in a most desirable West End location boasting residents parking and a feature balcony with stunning river views. Ideally placed for access to the Universities and city centr...
"A charming, spacious and bright semi-detached villa set in a popular residential location. Owned by the same family for almost a century, the property represents a rare and exciting opportunity for the lucky new owners. No.343 boasts generous room sizes, a sizeable plot and potential to create a ..."
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this 3 bedroom first floor apartment with real wooden flooring, period features and cornicing throughout."
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this well presented, two-bedroom ground floor west end apartment."
"Nicely appointed second floor apartment having magnificent views over the Tay estuary and towards Fife . The property benefits from double glazing, gas heating , modern kitchen , bathroom and en suite and is available for immediate entry ."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this immaculate semi datched family home in a saught after residential area of Broughty Ferry.
"This is an outstanding opportunity to purchase a spacious maisonette apartment within the impressive Gowrie House. Set in approximately 50 acres of stunning landscaped garden grounds, this beautifully converted mansion house offers swift access to a wide range of local amenities including shops, ..."
"Jack Easson and Remax Real Estate Centre are bringing to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home in the popular residential suburb of Strathmartine. The property is located in a quiet street on the northern edge of the city, with easy transport and local bus routes flowin..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this well presented 2 bedroom first floor apartment with amazing views of the river Tay. 
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this well presented, two bedroom massioette within the B listed building of Greystanes House set within 50 acres of beautifully manicured grounds. "
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom, semi detached family home on Earlston Avenue."
"Immaculately presented, two-bedroom, semi-detached villa, with gardens and a driveway. Conveniently located in the established residential area of Craigie, east of Dundee city centre. A welcoming entrance hall affords access throughout the ground floor and to the stairs leading to the upp..."
"A charming, stone built cottage within a desirable Broughty Ferry address set a short distance from the bustling high street, beach front and excellent public transport links. The home, offering spacious accommodation over a single level, is located off a quiet footpath blending perfect peacefuln..."
"Julie Mitchell of Open House Estate Agents is delighted to bring this well presented semi-detached house in a popular sought after area and ideally located for access to local amenities, transport links and schooling. The property comprises of: entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two double bedr (cont.)"
 Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this immaculate two bedroom home in a quiet residential area. 
"Urban chic living in a converted church in the city centre. Immaculate, secure entry and lovely features for this top-floor flat with two bedrooms and an open plan lounge and kitchen."
"Purplebricks offer to the market this beautifully presented two-bedroom home in a quiet residential area. This family home comprises: well proportioned living room, stylish handless kitchen with built in kitchen appliances including fridge/freezer, oven, gas hob and extractor fan. The kitchen h..."
"Ideally suited to the growing family this wonderful mid terraced townhouse is situated within easy reach of the city centre and offers spacious and versatile accommodation over three levels with private gardens to the rear. EPC = C , Council Tax Band = B."
"A Second-Floor Flat In A Prime Location Within Broughty Ferry, Close To The Beach, Shops, Restaurants And Amenities. There Are 2 Double Bedrooms, A Spacious Lounge, Kitchen And Shower Room. Double Glazing And Gas Central Heating. Shared Rear Garden. Ideal First-Time Buy."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate two-bedroom property close to Dundee's city centre. 
"We are delighted to introduce this immaculately presented, two double bedroom, semi detached family home which comes to market in truly move in condition. With UPVC Double Glazing and external doors, gas central heating with a Worcester combi boiler which is still under the manufacturers warranty..."
"Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this central, two bedroom Broughty Ferry appartment."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is excited to bring to the market this well presented three double bedroom end terrace family home located in a popular residential area of Fintry in Dundee.  
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this spacious and well presented flat on Queen Street to the residential market. This bright and modern apartment comes to the market in move-in condition and has been decorated in tasteful, neutral tones throughout, offering the perfect purchase for any ..."
"A charming mid-terraced bungalow enjoying a prime position within a quiet residential cul-de-sac. The home has seen significant upgrade now boasting a neutral contemporary interior - a true turn key move for the new owner. Located in the desirable village of Muirhead, the home offers the perfect ..."
"This wonderful mid-terraced villa boasting off street parking and great south facing private gardens offers an excellent opportunity for the first time buyer or young family to purchase an great home at an affordable price. EPC = D, Council Tax Band = B."
"An Excellent Ground Floor Apartment With Private Courtyard/Garden Area. 2 Double Bedrooms, A Spacious, Bright Lounge, Kitchen And Bathroom. Good Storage Space. Double Glazing And Modern Electric Heaters. Underground Parking Space And Secure Entry. Convenient For The City Centre, Viewing Essential."
"Desirable 4 Bed Terraced Family Home Over 3 Levels Situated In A Popular Residential Area. Close to local amenities, schools and public transport this property makes an ideal family home. Accommodation comprises: entrance with carpeted stair rising to first floor. Spacious lounge with window to t..."
"Spacious 2 Bed Family Home Situated In A Popular Residential Area. Close to local amenities schools and public transport with both the City Centre and Broughty Ferry within easy reach. The accommodation comprises: Welcoming entrance hallway allowing access to all accommodation, carpeted stairway ..."
"This is a opporunity to purchase a two-bedroom, ground-floor corner flat, situated close to baxter park and within walking distance to dundee city centre attractions. The property is an ideal first time buyer propostion as well as buy to let"
"Ashley Redford at Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this three-bedroom, mid terrace property located in a popular residential area."
"This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious top floor apartment situated in a sought-after Dundee location. West Court is just a short distance from Dundee City Centre and offers immediate access to a wide range of local amenities including shops, schools, leisure facilities and excell..."
"Prime city centre flat situated within easy walking distance to the V&A Museum and Universities making it an ideal alternative to student accommodation or great buy to let investment. EPC = D, Council Tax Band = A"
"Spacious, three-bedroom, end-terrace home, with private gardens. Located in the popular Douglas area, northeast of Dundee city centre. A bright entrance hall opens into a well-proportioned, dual-aspect living/dining room, fitted with modern, wood-effect flooring and offering plenty of fle..."
"Desirable 3 Bed Semi Detached Family Home Situated In A Popular Residential Area. Close to local amenities, schools and public transport. The property is in good decorative order throughout and accommodation comprises; Welcoming entrance hallway with carpeted stairway rising to first floor landin..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this spacious two-bedroom family home. 
"This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a two bedroom apartment situated in the highly sought-after West End of Dundee. Blackness Road is just a short distance from a wide range of local amenities including shops, bars, restaurants, universities, leisure facilities and excellent commuter tran..."
"This three-bedroom mid-terrace house in Dundee offers bright and spacious accommodation and a convenient setting, located near amenities, schooling, and public transport links. With aprivate driveway and a fully-enclosed garden, it represents an ideal residence for families and city professionals..."
 Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to market this immaculately presented one-bedroom apartment with stunning views overlooking Baxter Park.
This is an outstanding opportunity to purchase a spacious two bedroom apartment with fantastic river views. Forebank Terrace is situated in Dundee City Centre and offers immediate access to a wide range of local amenities. Dundee is Scotlands fourth largest city and features all the amenities exp...
Excellent traditional sandstone top floor flat. Fully refurbished to a great standard with fantastic views. This is sold with a tenant in situ and would make an excellent buy-to-let / investment opportunity.
Dawn Brankin at Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented two bedroom terraced home in the residential area of Happyhillock. This property is a perfect opportunity for a first-time buyer or a buy to let investor.
"This attractive and recently refurbished 2nd floor flat is brought to market in move in condition and offers great affordable family sized accommodation. Also ideally suited to first time buyers or those looking for a buy to let opportunity with excellent yield potential. EPC = E, Council T..."
"Jack Easson and Remax Real Estate Centre bring to market this well presented and lively three bedroom flat, located within the heart of the city and walking distance to the City Centre. The flat is set on the third floor with easy access to major bus routes and local amenities throughout the city..."
"Dawn Crosby at Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this well presented two bedroom terraced property located on Denmore Street, Dundee."
"Spacious two-bedroom maisonette in a popular location within easy reach of the city centre and all the universities. Large lounge, modern kitchen and bathroom, this property is ready to walk-into."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £88,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. With minimal renovation required, this ideally situated traditional tenement flat presents a great opportunity for anyone planning to add value to a superb propert..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this one bedroom bungalow in a saught after residential area. 
"Situated within easy reach of the city centre and Universities this beautifully presented Maisonette apartment has been lovingly upgraded by the current owner and boasts stunning views across the city. EPC = C , Council Tax Band = B"
This spacious 2nd floor traditional tenement flat boasts two really good sized double bedrooms and will make an ideal purchase for a range of buyers from those seeking their first time home to those looking for an attractive buy to let investment. EPC = D. Council Tax Band B
"Bright 3rd floor one bedroom flat in traditional tenement block. The flat is close to the city centre and universities with transport links close by. The property benefits from a large bedroom, bright lounge and kitchen and bathroom. Recently refurbished in 2021 the interiors are modern and brigh..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this 1 bedroom ground floor flat on Abernethy road. 
"Spacious one bedroom flat set over two floors offering great accommodation, a wonderful purchase for first time buyer or buy to let investor."
" A great opportunity to purchase this superb one bedroom maisonette apartment. This unique second floor apartment is located in a popular residential area of Dundee. Entered via a secure door entry system, this accommodation comprises of a welcoming hallway with large walk in storage c..."
"This attractive main door ground floor flat offers spacious 2 bedroom accommodation all on the one level with both private and communal gardens. Buyers should note that the property is of non standard construction and not suitable for mortgage purposes. EPC = C, Council Tax Band = A."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this one bedroom first floor flat on Arklay Street.
"Great opportunity to purchase this one bedroom, top floor apartment, forming part of a block of similar apartments, located within this popular residential area of Dundee. This well proportioned apartment consists of a welcoming hallway leading to a bright spacious lounge which enjoys natura..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate are delighted to bring to the market this one-bedroom first floor flat  situated on Strathmartine Road. 
"This spacious ground floor garden flat will appeal to a wide range of buyers from those seeking an ideal buy to let investment with excellent potential, to first time buyers, or those seeking an easily managed retirement home. EPC = C , Council Tax Band = A"
Dawn Crosby at Rosie Fraser Real Estate brings to the market this two bedroom ground floor flat with a private garden in the popular residential area of Balunie Avenue in the Douglas area of Dundee
Rosie Fraser Real Estate brings to the market this 1 bedroom ground floor flat on Fleming Gardens.
"Simple Approach are pleased to welcome Dexys Bar on the Arbroath Road to the Dundee sales market. This property comes to the market in good condition throughout and is an excellent opportunity. The property benefits from a fully functioning spacious bar area, ample seating space, two WC's and a b..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this 1 bedroom flat on Dens road just a 5 minute drive from the city centre.
"Situated just a mile from Dundee city centre, with a pleasant residential setting, this traditional top/third-floor tenement flat enjoys a bright and spacious living room, a rear-facing double bedroom with outstanding storage, a modern kitchen and shower room, as well as access to a communal gard..."
"Highly desirable two bedroom top floor flat in walk-in condition, perfect for first time buyers or Buy-to-Let investors at an impressive 9.4% yield"
"Fantastic one bedroom, ground floor apartment, forming part of a block of similar apartments, located within this popular residential area of Dundee. This well proportioned apartment consists of a welcoming hallway leading to a bright spacious lounge which enjoys natural light pouring into t..."
"One Bed Ground Floor Flat In A Central Location In Dundee. Close to local amenities and public transport a short distance from the City Centre. Approx. 38m2 the accommodation comprises, Entrance hallway allowing access to all accommodation. Spacious lounge with wall mounted electric fire, wood e..."
" **Two Double Bedroom Flat in Sought After Location** This two bedroom top floor flat is located within 0.3miles of Ninewells Hospital and close to major bus routes offering easy access to all necessary amenities. The flat comprises of two double bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. The ..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to bring to the market this 1 bedroom third floor flat on Park Avenue. 
"Martin and Co (Dundee) Are pleaseded to bring this 1 bedroom ground floor property to the sales market the property comprises of Hall, Lounge, Kitchen , Bathroom And Bedroom the property is close to aminitys and good transport links "
"A bright spacious first floor flat situated just off Strathmartine Road. The property offers easy access to local shops and facilities, easy access to Ninewells Hospital and the Universities of Dundee. The property comprises a spacious lounge, two double bedrooms, dining kitchen and a bathroom ..."
"**One Bedroom, Third Floor Flat in Convenient Location** This one bedroom third floor flat is conveniently located in the Coldside area within one mile of the Wellgate Shopping Centre and the Dundee High Street. Universities and bus routes are in close proximity. The flat comprises of a small..."
Rosie Fraser Real Estate bring to market this one bedroom appartment close to Dundee's city centre.
** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** Main door ONE BEDROOM ground floor flat with private front garden area. Communal parking area. Open aspects. Opportunity for landlords to expand a BUY TO LET PORTFOLIO. Affordable Investment..
"Lucy Morrison and RE/MAX Real Estate Centre are bringing to the market this great opportunity for a buy-to-let investor. This 1 bed ground floor flat is being sold with a sitting tenant who has lived in the property for 20 years.This property consists of lounge, kitchen, double bedroom and bathro..."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** *Modern throughout - no DIY required* The Victoria is a 4-bedroom property offering a large kitchen and dining space, an integral garage, and an en suite to bedroom 1. *BRAND NEW and CHAIN FREE* *10 years NHBC warranty*"
"A fine example of a classical villa, offering three floors of spacious accommodation, set-apart by its collection of elegant period features & exceptional, elevated views to the South, towards the Firth of Forth. The house stands in a generous plot within a sought-after pocket of D..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this exceptional end terraced townhouse spread over four levels providing substantial accommodation in one of the city’s most sought after locations, with stunning views over the public park adjacent and a few minutes walk to the railway station and city ce..."
"The Burgess is a 4-bedroom family home which presents an open-plan kitchen, breakfast and dining area, four spacious double bedroom and two en suite shower rooms. The home also benefits from an integral double garage. *Modern throughout* "
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** *SELECTED PLOTS READY TO MOVE INTO WITH PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE* The Avondale is a 4-bedroom family home which presents an open-plan kitchen and dining area with an adjoining utility room, a front-facing living room"
"The Avondale is a 4-bedroom family home which presents an open-plan kitchen and dining area with adjoining utility room, a front-facing living room, and an integral garage. Upstairs, there are two en-suite shower rooms, a Juliette balcony to bedroom 2, and modern family bathroom"
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Pinehurst is an elegant 4-bedroom detached home with generous ground floor living accommodation and an integral garage with power and light. *BRAND NEW & CHAIN FREE* Call us today! "
"This rarely available stunning duplex apartment forms part of one of Dunfermline’s most exclusive residential developments, a conversion centred on a beautiful Victorian mansion house. The size and flexibility of the apartment will appeal to a variety of buyers to suit their needs ranging from pr..."
"DESIRABLE AND EXCEPTIONALLY SPACIOUS DETACHED 5 BED SPLIT LEVEL HOUSE IN HEART OF DUNFERMLINE WITH ATTRACTIVE GARDEN GROUNDS, DRIVEWAY AND DOUBLE GARAGE. GCH & DG."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** This attractive, detached family home includes an integral garage, an OPEN-PLAN kitchen and dining area, and four generous double bedrooms, with ENSUITE to the master bedroom and MODERN family bathroom"
"The Warriston is the perfect home for larger families, with five bedrooms, three bathrooms, plenty of living space and the bonus of an integral garage. The Warriston features a front-aspect lounge, a large kitchen/dining room with direct access to the garden, a utility room and a useful cloakroom."
"We are delighted to bring to the market these exclusive four bed townhouses built by Amerio Homes within an exclusive gated community, offering luxury homes to families and couples. Situated in the heart of town this exciting development gives discerning buyers the opportunity to buy off plan and..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Oakmont is an impressive, detached family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with four spacious double bedrooms to the upper floor. "
"The Whithorn is a lovely four-bedroom family home that features a bright lounge with a triple window, a kitchen/dining room with French doors, a utility room and a downstairs cloakroom. Bedroom one is en suite, bedrooms two and three share a Jack and Jill bathroom and there's a family bathroom too."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Oakmont is an impressive, detached family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with four SPACIOUS double bedrooms to the upper floor. "
"Stylish, contemporary penthouse apartment finished to a high standard and situated within the heart of Dunfermline and its amenities. Accommodation Ground Floor: Hall, open plan Kitchen/Dining/Living Room, Mezzanine Office level above, Principal Bedroom with ensuite Shower R..."
26 South Larch Road is a superb 4 bedroom detached family house located in the popular and convenient city of Dunfermline. The property forms part of a pleasant and peaceful ...
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Rosedale is a STUNNING 3-bedroom detached home with a spacious, OPEN-PLAN ground floor design, ideal for FAMILY living. The ground floor of the Rosedale features a GENEROUS living room with a pleasant DUAL ASPECT "
"The Erinvale is an attractive family home open-plan kitchen, dining and family area, a contemporary family bathroom and en-suite to the master bedroom. Modern kitchen with an integrated oven, hob and chimney hood. Natural light from elegant French doors leading to rear garden. "
"IMPRESSIVE STYLISH 4 BED DETACHED VILLA. Hall, Lounge, Dining Rm, Fitted Kitchen, Office/Bed 5, Utility,WC Master Bed (en-suite), 3 Double Bedrooms, Bathroom. Storage. GCH/DG. Drive (2 cars). Front Garden. Terraced Rear Garden. Walking distance to schools/shops. Quick Access to M90. Cou..."
"A modern, four bedroom detached villa located within a sought-after residential cul-de-sac. 30 Brodick Gardens is situated within a popular residential setting within the eastern expansion of Dunfermline. An excellent location with Fife Leisure Park offering a variety of amenities including va..."
"A fantastic family home, not far from good schooling, local amenities and excellent transport links, this would suit a large range of buyers. Generously sized throughout with ample space for flexible living, this property is a fantastic purchase. Council Tax Band=E EPC=C"
"A beautifully presented and spacious detached villa in a sought after family friendly cul-de-sac in the popular Duloch area of Dunfermline. The property comprises - bright and welcoming entrance hallway, stylish lounge with bay window and French doors giving access to an open plan dining kitchen ..."
"•	ENTRANCE HALL •	LOUNGE/DINING ROOM •	KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM •	UTILITY ROOM •	FOUR BEDROOMS, THREE DOUBLE WITH MASTER ENSUITE AND ONE SINGLE •	BATHROOM •	CLOAKROOM •	SINGLE GARAGE •	EXTENSIVE OFFSTREET PARKING •	FRONT AND BACK SELF MAINTAINED GARDENS WITH PATIO AREAS. ..."
"Situated in the heart of the city centre is this generous three bedroom upper flat with shared parking spaces and drying green, a major benefit for city centre living. The accommodation would benefit from some cosmetic upgrading and briefly comprise private front door leading up to hallway, open ..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase this well presented upper maisonette in popular city centre location close to all amenities and schooling. The property is accessed via external stairwell and briefly comprises entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen, bedroom and modern bathroom on first level. On the ..."
Modern & Stylish 4 bedroom detached villa
"This stunning 4 bed detached villa offers ideal family living space both internally and externally with parking to the front in the form of a double driveway and to the rear, there is a superb garden that includes artificial turf, small decking area and a fantastic BBQ area, great for entertainin..."
We are delighted to bring to the market this detached four bed family home situated in quiet cul-de-sac within the sought after Garvock estate. This particular home occupies an enviable corner plot with fully enclosed wrap round landscaped gardens offering a child and pet safe environment. The ga...
Modern and stylish family villa in residential location with a short walk to the local shops and schooling. This home is ideally located with all local amenities at your fingertips. The accommodation is well presented and a credit to the present owners with excellent outdoor space with feature de...
"A traditional detached house in a popular area of Dunfermline. The property has generous flexible accommodation and comprises - Entrance vestibule, lounge with bay window and recessed shelving, sitting room which is currently being utilised as a 4th bedroom by the current owners, dining area ope..."
"Plot 138 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this superb Four Bedroom Detached House which is located in the popular Duloch area of Dunfermline. The property offers spacious living accommodation featured over two levels with the ground floor comprising – entrance vestibule, spacious lounge allowing ample..."
"Plot 142 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Excellent opportunity to purchase this extended four bed detached villa in the sought after area of Garvock close to all amenities, schooling, train station and town centre. The accommodation comprises of: entrance hall, wc, living room leading to family room/dining area, kitchen, utility area/f..."
"A well priced 3 bedroom detached family home, this would suit a large range of buyers. Immaculate throughout with spacious room sizes, this gorgeous home is a great opportunity for the right buyer to acquire a property with good schooling, excellent transport links and local amenities all within ..."
"We are delighted to be marketing this absolutely charming detached bungalow with superb development potential to go upwards into the attic space with the necessary planning permission. The subjects are well presented and offer generous accommodation with driveway and ample on street parking, toge..."
"Your Move are proud to present to the market this stunning 3 bedroom detached property. Close to the city centre of Dunfermline, local amenities and excellent transport links, early viewings are highly recommended! Council Tax Band=E EPC=D"
An excellent opportunity to purchase this Three Bedroom Terraced House which is located in a highly sought after residential location a short distance from Dunfermline City Centre. The property offers spacious accommodation featured over two levels with the ground floor comprising – Entrance vest...
"Early viewings are highly recommended for this stunning 4 bedroom semi-detached home. A sizable space that is excellent value for the money, we imagine this property will be popular by demand. EPC = C Council Tax Band = E"
"Superb opportunity to acquire this attractive traditional mid terraced property circa 1900. Internal floor area 109sq. metres. Walking distance to town centre, train and bus stations. The property comprises Vestibule. Hallway. Living room (bay window). Dining room. Kitchen. Downstairs bathroom. 3..."
"Launching this Autumn Damask is a stylish development of only nine glorious apartments converted from our Victorian building inspired by an NYC loft style; high ceilings, columns, impressive windows and stunning mezzanine space. The property is offered fully carpeted inclusive of the asking price..."
"Plot 136 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Stunning ShowHome opening this Saturday 29th October at 11am. New Marketing suite 11-5 Thursday to Sunday SatNav KY12 9FY Plot 172 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damak at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be hig..."
"Plot 132 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Plot 140 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Plot 160 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Plot 178 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
"Plot 148 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT. Council Tax Band = E"
Outstanding end terraced villa situated in a sought after modern development within a mile of a railway station with direct Edinburgh connection. This beautifully presented home features an impressive dining kitchen with access to an enclosed garden with raised deck.
NEW BUILD with off street PARKING. Spacious lounge dining area with patio doors leading out into the GARDEN. Kitchen includes INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Down stairs WC and great under stairs storage. Two double BEDROOMS with fitted wardrobes. Family bathroom INCLUDES tiling and shower over bath.
"We are delighted to introduce this immaculately presented, semi detached, extended, four bedroom family home which is positioned well away from any traffic in this quiet cul de sac providing a child safe, pet safe environment within which to raise a family. Early viewing is highly recommended for..."
We are delighted to be marketing this individually designed detached split level bungalow situated in one of Dunfermline's sought after areas within a short walk of the town centre and all amenities. This generous bungalow has some steps within to access an upper bedroom with w.c facilities and c...
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this Three Bedroom Semi Detached house which is located in the popular Duloch area of Dunfermline. The property would make an ideal family home or may suit someone looking to downsize and comprises – Entrance hall, spacious lounge allowing ample space for free..."
"Launching this Autumn Damask is a stylish development of only nine glorious apartments converted from our Victorian building inspired by an NYC loft syle; high ceilings, columns, impressive windows and stunning mezzanine space. The property is offered fully carpeted inclusive of the asking price...."
"Ideal for first-time buyers, downsizers or flat owners who are perhaps now looking for a garden, The Portree is an outstanding terraced home comprising a lounge, well-equipped kitchen with the bonus of direct access to the back garden, downstairs cloakroom, two spacious double bedrooms and bathroom."
"A stunning 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow benefitting from being close to the City Centre, local amenities and great walks. Viewings are highly recommended to appreciate the space this cottage has to offer. EPC = D Council Tax Band = C"
"A spacious four-bedroom semi-detached townhouse situated within the ever-popular Pitcorthie estate. Ideal for amenities with primary schooling within easy walking distance as well as Pitreavie Golf Course. Train stations available via Dunfermline, Inverkeithing and Rosyth with the M90 motorway..."
Rarely available period apartment with the benefit of large gardens to rear providing excellent outdoor space and side garden with greenhouse. The property also has a single garage/lock up (middle one) for additional storage. The subjects offer great potential to re-configure the layout as this w...
"Plot 168 Linen Quarter, our highly anticipated next phase of Damask at Pilmuir Street, Dunfermline is now released. We anticipate there will be high demand for these properties so contact us as soon as possible on to find out more. EPC = EXEMPT"
"Combining traditional features with modern contemporary living, this large traditional ground floor apartment within converted ""B"" listed linen mill provides spacious accommodation for any discerning buyer looking for an easy to maintain property within walking distance of the city centre and tra..."
**CLOSING DATE WEDNESDAY 15 MARCH 2023 @ 12 NOON** Charming ground floor garden apartment forming part of a traditional property in the heart of town offering contemporary and generous accommodation suiting couples and small families. The property is offered in move in condition with many attract...
"Popular by demand this 3 bedroom property is situated in an excellent location for commuter and transport links. Deceptively spacious throughout and well presented. School catchment for Woodmill Highschool, this stunning family home would suit a large range of buyers! EPC=D Council Tax Band=B"
"Maloco and Associates present 32 East Baldridge Drive to the market, a well-presented and spacious three bedroom terraced home, located within a popular residential location close to Dunfermline’s town centre. An ideal first time home offered in move in condition with amenities close to ..."
"Superb opportunity to acquire completely renovated modern and stylish apartment in the heart of city centre which would ideally suit a particular lifestyle, albeit professional couple, investor or first time buyers. The apartment is within a period building and is a credit to the owner offered in..."
"Opportunity to acquire this modern first floor apartment within a traditional dwelling in the heart of Dunfermline town centre. The apartment offer generous and stylish accommodation with period features throughout ideally suiting first time buyers, couples or buy to let investors. The accommodat..."
"We are delighted to introduce this immaculately presented, two bedroom, ground floor flat which comes to market in truly move in condition. The property enjoys a superb, gloss, fitted kitchen including a fabulous selection of integrated appliances from Zanussi, in addition to a well equipped, bou..."
"A semi-detached two bedroom house in the popular Pitcorthie area of Dunfermline. The property requires upgrading throughout and comprises - Entrance vestibule, lounge with dual aspect open to the kitchen with door leading out to the rear garden, two good sized bedrooms and a three piece bathroom..."
McDougall McQueen present to the market this traditional main door one bedroom flat with a private patio area to the rear. The property is ideally located in the popular town of Dunfermline close to many local amenities and schooling along with Dunfermline Abbey and Pittencrieff Park close by.&nb...
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this Terraced house which is located a short distance from Dunfermline City Centre. The property would make an ideal first time purchase or may suit someone looking to downsize. The internal accommodation comprises entrance hall, spacious lounge with built-in ..."
"A fantastic property situated within the City Centre of Dunfermline. Generously sized throughout with large double bedrooms, this property would be ideal for anyone looking for extra space for flexible living and working from home. Council Tax Band=C EPC=D"
Lovely second-floor apartment with excellent commuter links
**CLOSING DATE 17/03/23 AT NOON** GROUND FLOOR FLAT IN WALK IN CONDITION WITHIN SECURE COMMUNAL STAIRWELL. WALKING DISTANCE FROM DUNFERMLINE TOWN CENTRE. RESIDENTS' PARKING. GCH & DG. 
"We are delighted to introduce this bright, spacious, two double bedroom, semi-detached family home which offers a fantastic opportunity for young growing families, investors and first time buyers alike. The property benefits from double glazing throughout and gas central heating. Early viewing ..."
"Situated in the heart of the city centre and opposite the Linen Quarter is this generous two bedroom upper flat with parking space to rear, a major benefit for city centre living. The accommodation is fresh throughout with new floor coverings and kitchen. The subjects briefly comprise private fro..."
"A traditional, two bedroom, upper flat located only minutes’ walk from Dunfermline’s town centre and its amenities. A perfect first-time home and easy walking distance from Dunfermline Railway Station offering a regular service to and from Edinburgh. Further amenities include vario..."
"Well proportioned Mid terraced villa conveniently located close to local amenities and schools. Entrance hall, Lounge, Kitchen, 2 Double bedrooms, Shower room. Gas central heating. Double glazing. Gardens to front and rear. Requires modernisation and upgrading. Ideal starter home. Great p..."
"** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** RARELY AVAILABLE TOWN CENTRE 5 BEDROOM FLAT over two levels with excellent potential for HMO LICENSE. RENTAL POTENTIAL Â£20,000per annum post refurbishment. - ***REDUCED NOW FOR QUICK SALE***."
"2 BED GROUND FLOOR MAIN DOOR FLAT. Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/diner, 2 Double Bedrooms, Bathroom. Storage. Triple Glazing. Parking Space. Communal Garden. Short distance to city centre. Local amenities within walking distance. SUPERB FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET OPPORTUNITY. Council Tax ..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this two-bedroom flat in Dunfermline, Fife. The property also benefits from a being ideally situated for reaching Dunfermline's many retail and leisure opportunities along with being in close proximity to the M90 and Queensferry crossing making it ideal for..."
"A spacious, two bedroom ground floor flat located within walking distance of Dunfermline’s town centre. In need of upgrade, the property would make for a perfect first time home with scope to upgrade to a buyer’s own tastes or as an investment property. A variety of amenities close..."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase this ground floor flat close to Dunfermline City Centre. Ideal for any buyer to put their own stamp on, this property has great potential. Catchment for Queen Anne High School, this would be ideal for first time buyers, small families and btl investors. Council..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £55,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. This fantastic apartment offers an open plan living room/diner, a fitted kitchen, one sizeable bedroom and a three-piece shower room. Externally, the home boasts a..."
"14/4 Canaan Lane is a well-presented, two-bedroom terraced apartment situated in the heart of the sought-after Morningside Conservation Area. Occupying the first floor, this property is a generously-proportioned apartment offering spacious and comfortable accommodation, ideal for moder..."
"Fine Georgian house nestled in particularly private grounds, and including the delightful Old Coach House"
"Considered Edinburgh’s finest private home this highly prized Georgian mansion is a once-in-a-generation opportunity and arguably the very best family home in Edinburgh. The house is located in the affluent and prestigious Murrayfield area, especially sought after for its close p..."
"Innerwick is one of Edinburgh’s finest houses, nestled in private, beautifully screened and walled grounds in the much sought after Murrayfield district of Edinburgh. A high amenity area, the property is well located for access to a wide range of excellent private schools, the financial di..."
"A contemporary home with exceptional entertaining space, extensive ground and stunning views An outstanding five bedroom, five bathroom contemporary villa arranged over three floors, occupying a commanding position within the exclusive Belmont Estate. The house features panoramic cityscape views..."
"An outstanding five bedroom, five bathroom contemporary villa arranged over three floors, occupying a commanding position within the exclusive Belmont Estate, featuring panoramic cityscape views as far as the Pentland Hills, in the highly sought after area of Murrayfield. The property, nestled w..."
"Splendid and historic refurbished Scots Baronial house finished to an exceptionally high specification, set in grounds of just under one acre within the exclusive Craighouse development"
"This outstanding, detached, B-listed Victorian house occupies a generous plot on a sought-after street in the exclusive Grange area of the city; it boasts exceptionally spacious and flexible accommodation including five/six bedrooms, four/five reception areas, and two bathrooms (plus a WC), as we..."
"A beautiful and unique energy efficient, 21st century home in the heart of the Grange that caters perfectly for modern living."
"Incredibly charming detached Victorian family home in one of Edinburgh's most sought after areas, with accommodation on four floors including a self-contained flat"
24 Northumberland Street is an exceptional 7 bedroom townhouse with south-facing private garden in Edinburgh's New Town.
"This is a unique opportunity to purchase a stunning detached stone-built period house in the very exclusive district of Wester Coates, in Murrayfield Edinburgh.
 "
"AMA Homes brings to the market this magnificent Victorian five bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after Murrayfield Area. Tor House is a magnificent Victorian villa, modelled in a Neo-Jacobean style, which lies in the prestigious Edinburgh suburb of Murrayfield. AMA Homes has sympathetica..."
"A magnificent five bedroom West End home with incredible proportions This beautiful upper townhouse has five large bedroom suites across four elegant floors. The house is rich in original features, including intricate cornicing, working shutters and open fireplaces. Located in a handsome Victori..."
"Built in 1916, the last of a row of four houses designed by John Jerden and generally considered to be his best. This is one of Colinton’s finest houses.
 "
"11 Carlton Terrace offers the rare opportunity to acquire a meticulously presented, fully restored and refurbished three-storey townhouse in one of Edinburgh’s most coveted addresses. This impeccable family home is second to none and is the epitome of modern Edinburgh living. It..."
"Particularly fine four storey Victorian townhouse with magnificent period detail, self-contained flat, west facing garden and large garage for two cars"
"An outstanding A listed full townhouse on one of the West End’s finest streets. Walker House is a magnificent Georgian townhouse arranged over four floors, situated in the heart of the West End. The house has been restored to reinstate the intricate features of the period including ornate cornic..."
"A unique opportunity to acquire 2 established serviced apartments in Central Edinburgh: The Apartment: Situated over 3rd and 4th floors with 5 bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathrooms.and The Loft: Access from 3rd floor level, set over two floors with 5 bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathrooms."
A most impressive B-listed Scots Baronial style house sitting within extensive gardens and grounds.
"Exceptionally well presented family home over three floors, on a generous corner plot with large garden, garage and parking in one of Edinburgh's most sought after areas"
"A generous, stylish and immaculately presented family home tucked away in an exclusive residential enclave with large private garden in a highly sought after area, close to the city centre."
"Spectacular upper villa with garaging, studio and superb gardens, and a delightful southerly outlook to the Royal Botanic Garden"
"A beautiful detached house in a private setting with exceptional views. This is a rare opportunity to acquire an outstanding family house in a prime Colinton address, sitting in around 1.3 acres. The house has extensive gardens and private parking as well as beautiful reception rooms and up to e..."
"A truly spectacular 5 bedroom family home spanning over 3500 sq ft with private garden and parking in Trinity Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection of four unique, luxury family homes. The development consists of two contemporary new homes as well as two newly renovated homes within Dun..."
"Attractively presented two bed upper flat boasting a sunny public room, balcony with leafy outlook and shared garden, conveniently positioned close to excellent local amenities ..."
"Stunningly presented, three-bedroom, second-floor flat in the highly popular Leith area of Edinburgh.This fabulous apartment has been decorated to a high standard and is offered ..."
"This is a rare opportunity to acquire a Grade A-listed, six/seven-bedroom property, forming part of an elegant Georgian terrace, with a large garden that is situated on an attractive cobbled street in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic New Town. With one of the most desirable residential add..."
Recently renovated and immaculately presented three storey main door townhouse in a prime West End location.
"Five bedroom Victorian townhouse with immaculate interiors and impressive reception space, benefitting from a private garden and stunning skyline views"
"A beautiful A listed upper townhouse in the heart of the West End. Recently renovated and restored, this three-storey property with its Georgian proportions, including decorative cornicing, cupola and sweeping wrought iron staircase offers contemporary living in classical grandeur. Wi..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a three-bedroom executive triplex penthouse with two large private terraces and secure underground parking, situated in a modern factored building in the highly desirable Quartermile district, just 0.7 mile from Edinburgh’s city centre and Princes Street."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a modern detached family villa, with off street parking and sweeping views of the Pentland Hills. "
A full townhouse and the last remaining complete property on Magdala Crescent.
Luxurious three bed apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 17 is a beautifully crafted three bed apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment offers a beautiful openplan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. Residen...
"Discover The Townhouse Collection at Craighouse. An exquisite selection of modern townhouses, placed in one of Edinburgh’s most prestigious locations. Here you’ll find the perfect blend of old and new, contemporary homes set within stunning historic grounds. Each townhou..."
"A wonderful detached home located in the heart of the Grange. This beautifully presented, detached property is set behind wrought iron gates, offering sunny garden areas, garaging and parking for several cars. Findhorn Place is extremely well located on a quiet road in the Grange; one of Edinbur..."
"Welcome to 23 Hermitage Drive.Occupying an impressive footprint of just under 3,000 square foot, this lower villa forms part of a stunning B-listed Victorian building and offers exceptionally generous and airy accommodation, including two reception rooms, a dining kitchen, four bedrooms, a bathro..."
"Impressive townhouse with 2708 sq. ft. of flexible living over 4 floors, Plot 45 boasts a garage, excellent storage throughout and a studio designed kitchen - city living at its best. "
"A rarely available opportunity to acquire a three storey family house with garden and off street parking, set in an award winning development"
"Wonderful family home with garden and private parking. This handsome, terraced house offers wonderful proportions and original period features, presenting an excellent opportunity to create a charming family home. Upon entering through the front door there is an immediate sense of space. The sit..."
"A style and spacious three bedroom apartment positioned on the first floor which boasts views of the West End, iconic chapel and superb landscaped gardens."
"Luxurious three bedroom apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 30 is a beautifully crafted three bedroom apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment provides a beautiful, unique and sumptuous living space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh&rsqu..."
This immaculate presented and tastefully furnished four/five-bedroomed double upper apartment forms part of a handsome Victorian sandstone crescent situated peacefully on one of the most sought-after residential streets in Edinburgh’s West End. Arranged over two levels the prope...
"A high-spec three-bedroom mews house in a coveted New Town location, part of a stunning development on one of the city’s most sought-after streets. With a strong track record and trusted reputation for professionalism, Square & Crescent is a residential developer with a prim..."
"**£100,000 below Home Report valuation** Substantial ground and garden flat requiring some modernisation, in a prime West End location"
"A selection of four bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan. "
"Sought-after three bedroom penthouse coming soon at The Moorings. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments with private patio areas, duple..."
Three bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliances and...
*NEW TO MARKET* This is a contemporary townhouse beautifully presented and offers an abundance of space and natural light over three floors. Situated in Edinburgh’s fashionable Western Harbour it sits within a development of exclusive residential properties and boasts ...
"• Main door entry • Elegant Georgian features • 2 under pavement cellars • 2500 square feet of space A wonderful opportunity to acquire an impressive Grade A-listed four-bedroom Georgian ground, and garden apartment in a highly sought-after New Town l..."
Three bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield area within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliance...
"Wonderfully located four bedroom ground and garden flat with private garden in the heart of Edinburgh’s West End This is a well proportioned four bedroom flat with private garden, occupying ground and garden levels. The property can be entered at the ground floor via a smart communal entrance or..."
Five bedroom semi-detached home in Colinton with a south facing garden and stunning views of the Pentlands
A beautifully presented seven bedroom detached family home with landscaped gardens in a prestigious Cramond location of Edinburgh
"In the shadow of the city’s iconic Arthur’s Seat, the substantial semi-detached six-bedroomed family house sits on a peaceful one-way residential street in the sought-after neighbourhood of Newington. Just a short walk from Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, the handsome Victorian m..."
"Commanding a beautiful south facing position, 6, Kinnear Road offers the rare opportunity to acquire a spacious ground floor apartment with four bedrooms and private landscaped rose garden, situated peacefully in one of Edinburgh’s most coveted addresses. Owned by the same family for almost..."
"FULL LBTT PAID* ON THE FINAL HOME AT THIS ONE-OF-A-KIND DEVELOPMENT. Impressive, 2 bedroom apartment with 2 private parking spaces and spectacular views from all your main living areas.?"
AVAILABLE TO VIEW NOW This superb property combines the rich heritage of St James Church with beautiful modern interiors and contemporary specification. This is an expansive property over 4 levels combining exquisite features and flexible living. Private garden and parking. Must be vie...
"Beautifully presented, end of terrace Victorian family home, with single garage and private garden in the sought after residential area of Greenbank"
This wonderful property combines the rich heritage of St James Church with beautiful modern interiors and contemporary specification. This is an expansive property over 4 levels combining exquisite features and contemporary living. Private garden and parking.
"St. James townhouses is a collection of four and five bedroom homes, combining the rich heritage of St James Church with beautiful modern interiors and contemporary specification. Townhouse 1 is an expansive property over 4 levels combining exquisite features and contemporary living."
"*NEW TO MARKET* With its elevated position, just a short walk from Corstorphine Hill Nature Reserve, this semi-detached sandstone house is presented to the market as a wonderful family home. Arranged over two levels, the handsome property offers spacious accommodation including two wel..."
"*CLOSING DATE Thursday 16th March 2023* An amazing development opportunity to acquire a substantial, main door property on the corner of Drummond Place and Great King Street"
"A stunning, double fronted, three bedroom Victorian apartment in the ever popular West End with lift access and off street parking. "
"A beautiful detached three bedroom house, with private garden and parking in Trinity This new detached three bedroom family home has been finished to a high specification with private garden and parking, part of the Dunforth Gardens development. Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection o..."
"Luxurious 3 bedroom mews home. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood peppered with history and culture, Waverley Square is surrounded by a beguiling mix of contemporary architecture and the Old Town’s medieval characteristics – cobbled str..."
"Exceptionally bright and spacious flat with outstanding views, set on the upper two floors of a substantial Victorian townhouse."
"A unique mews house featuring open plan kitchen/living/dining & separate utility room. The principal bedroom includes a dressing area, walk in wardrobe & en-suite bathroom."
A mid-terrace villa over three levels situated within the prestigious Merchiston district of the city perfectly positioned for a wide range of local amenities and a short journey ...
"A rare opportunity to acquire a five-bedroom property that forms two storeys of an elegant A-listed Georgian terrace situated on a highly desirable street in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic New Town. In need of modernisation and refurbishment, this generously sized property be..."
"Discover flexible living across four levels - 5 bedroom townhouse featuring spacious bedrooms, a private balcony, a garage and low maintenance garden."
"Welcome to 26 Grange RoadMain-door upper villa in the exclusive Grange area of the city, within the Grange conservation area, forming part of a handsome Victorian building with two reception rooms, a breakfasting kitchen, four bedrooms, a shower room, a bathroom, and a WC, plus a private garden, ..."
"A restored semi-detached 3 bedroom home with private garden and parking in Trinity A fully restored, luxury semi-detached three bedroom home spread over three storeys with private garden and parking. Dunforth Gardens offers a wonderful collection of four unique, luxury family homes. The devel..."
** NEW TO THE MARKET ** A stunning one-bedroom B-listed property forming the top floor of a beautifully converted Georgian townhouse on Raeburn Place in the heart of sought-after Stockbridge. 3 Mary’s Place has been thoughtfully upgraded to provide the most contemporar...
"Exceptional duplex apartment within the A-listed Ramsay Garden complex in the Old Town, promising a rare opportunity to acquire an enchanting four-bedroom home with magnificent views to Edinburgh Castle, idyllic garden grounds and self-contained accommodation for short-term rentals subject to the..."
A five bedroom terraced house in the desirable area of Ravelston. A delightful family house in one of Edinburgh's popular residential areas and a beautiful example of a Victorian terrace with traditional period features. The property is entered via the vestibule and into a generous hallway. Loca...
40a Buckingham Terrace offers the rare opportunity to acquire a beautiful and extensively refurbished three-bedroom lower ground apartment with a south facing conservatory and private landscaped garden in one of Edinburgh’s most sought-after addresses. Presented to market in tur...
"A spacious four-bedroomed first floor apartment in the exclusive area of Inverleith just north of the city centre. This is an opportunity to modernise and renovate part of a Victorian detached property with great proportions, period features, high ceilings and light rooms overlooking the Edinburg..."
"A superb, light filled and spacious ground and garden apartment in the heart of Edinburgh’s West End. Occupying the ground floor and basement of an original Victorian building the property is located on Palmerston Place, a popular residential street in Edinburgh's West End close to many amenitie..."
A fabulous two bedroom roof top apartment with a spacious private terrace and two secure underground parking spaces.
"This rarely available, bright and spacious, duplex apartment occupies the lower ground floor and basement level of a classical palace block that is A-listed and dated to the Georgian era (1814-23). Designed by famous architects, Robert Reid and William Sibbald, this exceptional property is also p..."
"Open viewing Sunday 1-3pm An exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this beautifully presented and rarely available mid-terraced Victorian villa situated in the ever-desirable district of Morningside in the South of Edinburgh. This prime location offers excellent local shops, restaurants,..."
Two bedroom ground floor appartment in the sought after Murrayfield within the new AMA Homes development. Torwood House will be finished to the highest of standards and each property benefits from all the luxuries one would expect with modern living. The kitchens have integrated appliances and w...
"A three-bedroom apartment in prestigious Inverleith. Occupying an enviable position next to the Royal Botanic Garden, the property is in turn-key condition. It boasts a sumptuous interior design with high-quality fixtures and fittings set against a lightfilled layout. An enclosed private courtyar..."
"A unique mews house with garage features open plan kitchen/living/dining & separate utility room. The principal bedroom includes a dressing area, walk in wardrobe & en suite bathroom."
"Luxurious two bedroom mews home. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood peppered with history and culture, Waverley Square is surrounded by a beguiling mix of contemporary architecture and the Old Town’s medieval characteristics – cobbled s..."
Stunningly decorated five bedroom duplex apartment. Early viewing recommended!
Ready for you to move into - this spectacular 3 bedroom apartment boasts private parking with impressive living spaces and views to match. 
"This property is an impressive four bedroom duplex apartment with private parking. Featuring large master suite with dressing room, and en-suite, and flexible living space with dining kitchen, expansive living room with French doors leading to a balcony, and separate dining room."
"Elegant and immaculate three-bedroom Georgian apartment on one of the finest residential streets in the heart of the New Town, close to all amenities and the bustling atmosphere of Stockbridge whilst only a short walk away to the city centre and cultural highlights. In turn-key condit..."
"A spacious contemporary, duplex apartment forming part of an exclusive development lying immediately to the south of Edinburgh’s city centre. Located within the Quartermile development the property has a spacious modern feel, benefits from three generous double bedrooms, a parking space in ..."
"Murray & Currie are delighted to offer to the market this most impressive Georgian 4 bedroom double upper property situated in prime city centre location. 12 2f Great Stuart Street is accessed via a shared entrance lobby opening onto elegant, well-proportioned, and bright accommodation with a t..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this unique, beautifully extended family home offering impressive accommodation enjoying an abundance of natural light and panoramic views, set ..."
"Closing date: Tuesday 24th January 2023 at 12 noonForming part of a beautiful row of B-listed properties on Torphichen Street, this Georgian townhouse is a unique and stunning development opportunity with approved residential plans (planning ref: 21/06545/FUL) that include a spectacular roof terr..."
"15 Blinkbonny Crescent is a generously proportioned four-bedroom end-terraced family home in an elevated position with south-facing garden, driveway, and garage. Situated in the desirable Ravelston area on a peaceful residential street, the location is superb with excellent local amenities and sc..."
"Situated in Newington, within the Blacket conservation area, this generous lower villa occupies the entire ground floor of a handsome traditional building, offering three ..."
"This rarely available, Victorian mid-terraced villa is located in the popular district of Pilrig, in the East of Edinburgh. The location offers an array of local shops, restaurants and amenities, with Leith and the City Centre a short walk away. There are good public transport links as well as ro..."
"A stand out opportunity to acquire a beautiful four bedroom home, with garage and garden, located in the Braids area"
"This stylish three bedroom home is PERFECT FOR A FAMILY. On the ground floor, there is a KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with access to the garden, while on the opposite side of the home, you will find the LOUNGE which features two windows allowing for a light and airy room. You will also find a WC AND STORA..."
"Offering wonderfully spacious and flexible accommodation over three floors, sure to appeal to any growing family, this traditional five-bedroom, three-bathroom terraced house, ..."
"LBTT contribution (worth up to 20,075 GBP) on this 3 bedroom mid terrace townhouse with a carport, city garden with connecting garden room and studio designed kitchen."
"A selection of three bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan."
"A selection of waterfront three-bedroom apartments at The Moorings. The development at The Moorings is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments with private patio are..."
"With its striking pitched slate roof, the well-presented modern townhouse is located within the contemporary residential development from AMA Homes designed by renowned British architect Richard Murphy and is situated in the highly sought-after neighbourhood of Cramond. The substantia..."
"*Final apartment available. Book a private viewing appointment of this beautiful show apartment.* This garden level, two-bedroom apartment is tucked away behind a magnificent Georgian facade, situated on the gentle curve of one of Edinburgh's most sought-after streets. The internal ha..."
Beautiful Victorian Terrace House - 5 Bedrooms - Modern Kitchen/Dining Room - Large Sitting Room - Family Room - 2 Bath/Shower Rooms - Utility Room - Large Rear Garden - Beautiful Traditional Features - Flexible Living Space
"Currently offering £25k LBTT contribution & a parking space** Luxurious 3 bedroom first floor apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12..."
"2a Belgrave Crescent is a stunning 2 bedroom, lower ground floor apartment with superb open plan kitchen on the most beautiful crescent in Edinburgh."
"Enjoy a coastal location with this five-bedroom main door, double upper property in Edinburgh’s Portobello. A stone-built Victorian home and minutes from Portobello beach and High Street, it boasts outstanding accommodation. The generous and stylish interiors are complemented by an enviable decke..."
"This expansive 5 bedroom Victorian terraced villa provides buyers with a wide range of options and uses, with the choice to continue the property as a successful guest house or to transform it into a large family home for luxury lifestyles. The exceptional villa, flanked by landscaped gardens, fe..."
"A sleek first floor apartment with well-designed open-plan kitchen and living area, generous bedrooms with ample built-in storage space and en-suite bathroom in the principal bedroom."
"48 Polwarth Terrace is a collection of eight stunning new build and conversion apartments boasting an appealing canalside setting in a quiet residential area of Edinburgh. A unique offering within the development, The Cottage is a sizable three bedroom apartment within the converted ar..."
"Luxurious two bed apartment at New Eidyn, St James Quarter. Apt 20 is a beautifully crafted apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. ..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom lower villa in a Victorian sandstone villa with its own main door access in the extremely popular Trinity area of Edinburgh. The house is approached via private front garden and driveway which leads to the front door with original mosaic ti...
"NEW FIXED PRICE £10K BELOW HOME REPORT Immaculate, four/five bedroomed split level, detached house in elevated position in sought after leafy Blackhall, situated to the west of Edinburgh city centre. Built in the early 2000s, this attractive white and red brick contemporary prope..."
"CLOSING TOMORROW 07/03/2023 AT 12PM Spacious mid-terraced villa offering spacious and flexible accommodation comprising; entrance vestibule, hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, utility room, 4 bedrooms, boxroom, large bathroom and WC. Private garden to front and enclosed rear garden. Th..."
A beautifully position detached 5 bedroom family home located in the desirable area of Colinton.
"FIXED PRICE - £730,000.00 Parliament Square, on the south side of Edinburgh’s High Street behind St. Giles Cathedral, is one of Edinburgh’s significant addresses. This extremely elegant Victorian top floor apartment constitutes part of an “A” listed buildi..."
"Generously sized penthouse, with two private parking spaces and lift access."
"A 4-bedroom detached home, offering great potential in the sought-after Blackhall. This property offers an excellent opportunity for those seeking a large family home in a desirable location. A bright, airy hallway welcomes you & provides access to all rooms on the ground floor. A formal sitt..."
Rarely available four bedroom detached home with sunny private garden and single garage in Inverleith.
Traditional Victorian Terrace House - 4 Bedrooms - Private West Facing Garden - Highly Sought-After Location - Large Sitting Room - Family/Dining Room - Kitchen - Beautiful Traditional Features 
£5000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION! A superb top floor flat which offers a stylish home situated within a traditional tenement in the highly regarded area of Morningside. This beautifully presented property provides a flexible home which could either be used as a spacious one bedroom or...
"Rarely available - beautifully presented and spacious, four-bedroom, modern detached family home with gardens, a driveway and an integrated garage. Set in an exclusive cul-de-sac, on a most generous corner plot in the highly sought-after area of Davidsons Mains, west of Edinburgh city cen..."
Fixed at Home Report Valuation Wonderful three bedroom mews house with the added benefit of a triple garage and private garden.
The Wallace offers plenty of flexible living space and 5 bedrooms for comfortable family living.
"CLOSING DATE SET FOR TUESDAY, 14 March 2023 AT 12 NOON. Self-contained ground and first floor property with secure parking, extending 2,475 sq ft (GIA)"
"A contemporary, bright and stylish duplex apartment in one of Edinburgh’s most sought after conservation areas with Hallway, Kitchen/Dining Room, Sitting Room, 4/5 Bedrooms, 2 en-suite Shower rooms, en-suite Bathroom, Downstairs WC, Utility room, Balcony, Under ground parking"
"Open Viewing: Sunday 2-4pm. A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire a unique, individually designed detached family villa lying adjacent to Lomond Park situated in one of the ..."
This detached dorma-bungalow lies within the highly desirable Kingsknowe area to the south west of the city centre and is in ideal commuting distance by bus and rail services as well as being in proximity to the City Bypass and main motorway networks. The accommodation on offer within consists o...
Simpson Loan is a part of Sir Norman Foster’s inspirational and iconic Quartermile development that incorporates marvellous examples of the Victorian Royal Infirmary buildings that were the work of the renowned Edinburgh architect David Bryce. Quartermile is set in the heart of historic Edi...
"**FIXED PRICE at Home Report Value** A wonderful 4 bedroom family home with open plan kitchen/dining as well as a spacious, separate living room. **FIXED PRICE at Home Report Value** The Maltings offers fabulous family living on the ground floor with both kitchen/dining room and living room g..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a 4-bedroom family home in the sought after location of Plewlands Avenue in Morningside.
Spacious and modern 4 bedroom townhouse apartment available in the award winning development by AMA at Springwell 3 Ardmillan Mews offers modern and luxurious living with four double bedrooms spread out over three floors. This townhouse lies within AMA’s award winning Springwell development at ...
"The THETFORD - This FIVE BEDROOM home has a TRADITIONAL BAY WINDOW which gives the lounge an elegant appeal, complementing a superb L-SHAPED DINING AND FAMILY ROOM that opens on to the garden, and extends into the KITCHEN WITH SEPARATE LAUNDRY ROOM. Two of the five bedrooms are en-suite, and one..."
A well-presented extended detached bungalow situated within the prestigious Swanston district of the city perfectly positioned for access into the City Centre and an ideal ...
"4/10 Brighouse Park Crescent is a luxurious, well-presented and incredibly spacious four-bedroom penthouse apartment benefitting from east and west facing roof terraces set in an exclusive and modern development in the sought-after area of Cramond. The property offers lift access to all floors an..."
"Modern, link-detached family home in a sought after development in Trinity. Private parking and south facing garden."
"53/3 North Castle Street is a beautifully presented, light and spacious four-bedroom, three-bathroom duplex apartment arranged over the top three levels of an original Georgian building on an important street in the New Town, with immediate proximity to Edinburgh’s city centre. The property..."
This is a most impressive four/five-bedroom stone-built terrace property in a coveted location with enviable views over Joppa beach and the waterfront. This home boasts spacious and light filled accommodation spanning two floors with period features and detailed contemporary upgrades for the best...
"A superb double upper apartment in the heart of Edinburgh’s West End, benefiting from private parking. This impressive three bedroom double upper apartment forms part of a handsome Victorian building and is located in the heart of Edinburgh's desirable West End. Originally redeveloped by AMA the..."
"Warners are delighted to present to market this exceptional extended four bedroom detached family home boasting a sun terrace, double garage and private driveway, set within the ..."
"This charming second floor flat forms part of a handsome Georgian building built around 1806 within the prestigious New Town district of the city, a UNESCO World heritage site. ..."
29 Regent Street is a most impressive and generously proportioned main door double upper villa located within the highly desirable and historic Portobello area of Edinburgh. Set ...
"Closing Date on Thursday 16th March 2023 at 12pm Impressive, spacious three bedroom, two bathroom first floor corner flat with open views in the West End."
A superb detached villa situated within the sought after Colinton district of the city perfectly positioned for access to a wide range of local amenities and a short journey to ...
Beautifully Presented Top Floor Flat in Edinburgh's Popular Merchiston area of Edinburgh
"Characterised by Victorian charm, blended seamlessly with contemporary design, this five/six bedroom stone-built semi-detached villa offers a spectacular family home, complete with private gardens and off-street parking. Lovingly upgraded, the property is brimming with period features, including ..."
"A recently renovated lower ground floor apartment in Edinburgh’s fashionable West End. This three bedroomed apartment with its own private garden as well as showstopper living room extension comes on the market separately or potentially with No 3 Chester Street, above, also on the market. <..."
"Exceptional top floor flat with four bedrooms, forming part of a handsome Georgian tenement on the corner of Scotland Street and Royal Crescent. The property offers well-balanced accommodation with an array of preserved original features including ornate cornice work, fireplaces and sash and cas..."
"Ardmillan Mews offers the opportunity to acquire a four-bedroom, three storey townhouse, situated in the award winning AMA development at Springwell. The property is located at Edinburgh’s Dalry, Gorgie and Ardmillan intersection. Arranged over three levels, the property offers spacious acc..."
Luxurious PENTHOUSE APARTMENT with CITY VIEWS and EXPANSIVE ROOF TERRACE. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. UNDERGROUND PARKING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE  available on request. 
"** OPEN VIEW SUNDAY 19TH FEBRUARY BETWEEN 3 - 4PM - BY APPOINTMENT ONLY     **Viewing is highly recommend for this four bedroom townhouse finished to an excellent standard.Rare opportunity to acquire one of these unique, ne..."
"*Fixed Price - £15,000 below the Home Report value.*Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented Victorian lower villa that retains many fine ..."
"With its four bedrooms, the charming Stewart is perfect for anyone looking for extra space."
"PLOT 47 'WEST LODGE' IS A LOVELY THREE BEDROOM LODGE COMPLETE WITH A PRIVATE GARDEN AND PRIVATE PARKING. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT.
"
"37 2F1 George Street is a large 3 bedroom, rarely available apartment finished to the highest standard on Edinburgh's most prestigious retail street."
"Situated on a tree-lined street in exclusive Murrayfield, within the Coltbridge and Wester Coates conservation area, this main-door double upper villa is arranged over the first and second floors of a handsome traditional building and boasts four bedrooms, a grand reception room, a dining kitchen..."
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this fantastic detached house in the heart of Kingsknowe. With potential for 5 double bedrooms and great links to the city centre, ..."
"The Elmford offers instant appeal with the LOUNGE, and KITCHEN DINING offering the flexibility to form one single space. Sharing the downstairs is a LAUNDRY ROOM, downstairs WC and DOUBLE GARAGE. Upstairs, TWO BEDROOMS ARE EN-SUITE, and A WALK-IN DRESSING AREA adds a luxury touch to the principal..."
A truly stunning 3 bedroom galleried apartment. With expansive living space and a versatile third bedroom on the upper gallery which could be used as a study or studio to fit your needs.
"Currently offered as fully furnished with a £20k LBTT contribution** A luxurious 3-bedroom duplex apartment with a stand-out double height living space and galleried third bedroom. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open..."
5% deposit paid^ OR Part Exchange* plus flooring included on Plot 7 boasting an impressive south facing kitchen/living/dining area.
"Nestled in very heart of exclusive Stockbridge, this particularly spacious three-bedroom plus study, first-floor apartment is set within a B-listed Georgian tenement. Enjoying some of the finest amenities the capital has to offer, right on its doorstep, this prime city home will appeal to profess..."
"Beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious, four-bedroom, detached bungalow, with private gardens and a driveway. Rarely available, set on an enviable side street in the sought-after Corstorphine area, west of Edinburgh city centre. A vestibule offers ample space for outerwear, together ..."
"Enjoying spectacular views of Arthur's Seat, Blackford Hill and Pentland Hills, this rarely available and beautifully presented double upper villa is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, Newington offers an excellent selec..."
"Offering great kerb appeal, the four bedroom Maxwell has plenty of space for the whole family."
"A selection of two bedroom luxury garden apartments, available to reserve off plan."
"A selection of two bedroom luxury homes, available to reserve off plan."
"Two-bedroom apartments coming soon at a unique Waterside location minutes from the city centre. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments w..."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £255,000 by a qualified Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) Modern first-floor apartment on the outskirts of the centre of Edinburgh. The new owners will benefit from the use of two double bedrooms, one of which has an en-suite show..."
"Boasting impressive panoramic views of Edinburgh Castle and Arthur's Seat and ready for you to move into, reserve Plot 13 for 'Just The One' fee of 250 GBP*. "
"Plot 13 is the only 2-bedroom apartment on the top level. With a triple window feature, enjoy enviable views towards Edinburgh Castle and Arthur’s Seat. "
Beautifully Presented Triplex in This Modern Cannonmills Development
"*NEW TO MARKET* This is a wonderful opportunity to acquire an exceptional Grade B listed four- bedroom apartment in desirable Marchmont. Truly breathtaking this stylish residence with a shared rear garden, boasts accommodation which perfectly balances its heritage with a mod..."
A fabulous first floor flat part of a converted traditional detached villa situated in the prestigious Merchiston district of the city perfectly positioned for access to a wide ...
"Highly desirable, city centre garden flat situated on Rutland Square. Includes two private allocated parking spaces and an under-pavement cellar."
"A most impressive four-bedroom townhouse, this property occupies a superb position in Edinburgh’s sought-after and iconic New Town, just a short walk from the fashionable neighbourhoods of Stockbridge and Canonmills. Situated on a peaceful cobbled street in a leafy cul-de-sac borderin..."
"A superb four-bedroom family home in the sought-after district of Fairmilehead, south of Edinburgh City Centre. Providing spacious and flexible accommodation and set within a quiet development, this pristine property comprises an entrance hall with access into the integral garage which has an ele..."
 BRAND NEW PENTHOUSE . Luxurious PENTHOUSE APARTMENT with STUNNING VIEWS and ROOF TERRACE. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. UNDERGROUND PARKING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE  available on request. 
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this charming and generously proportioned detached bungalow, which rests on substantial and beautifully kept garden grounds, ..."
"Set on the top floor of an attractive A-listed Georgian tenement in the New Town, this spacious city home boasts splendid period features and some of the capital's finest amenities on its doorstep. Dating from 1807, the classical property offers a generous footprint with over 2020 sq. feet of ..."
"A wonderful four bedroom townhouse with panoramic views over Colinton Dell. This spacious townhouse is set within a development of 18 houses sharing access to landscaped mature gardens. Located within the popular Colinton area of Edinburgh, Colinton Village is considered to be one of Edinburgh's..."
"The Langwood - four-bedroom home, with SEPARATE STUDY, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and DINING ROOM, with French doors to the garden. Upstairs, the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and WALK-IN WARDROBE and further three bedrooms are ideal for any family."
A fantastic drawing room flat located on a prime street in the West End of Edinburgh
"Enjoy a highly sought-after Merchiston location with this most impressive four bedroom apartment. Bright and situated on the top floor of a traditional Victorian tenement it features charming period details and spectacular views. Set in the heart of a high amenity area, the property is in walking..."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this most impressive and beautifully presented bungalow that lies within the sought after Corstorphine area to the west of Edinburgh's city centre and benefits from easy access to many local amenities as well as to excellent transport links t...
Substantial two-bedroom flat with private south facing garden in Edinburgh’s New Town. This rarely available two-bedroom duplex flat with a private south-facing walled garden and patio area forms part of a striking B listed building. Situated over the lower ground and garden level this property ...
"*NEW TO MARKET* This is an exceptional one-bedroom B-listed first-floor property located in a grand Victorian townhouse in Edinburgh’s prestigious West End. Overlooking the beautiful expanse of Drumsheugh Gardens, this magnificent home offers extensive and outstanding..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally charming Victorian lower garden villa which forms part of a handsome period building, enjoying a fabulous ..."
"Picturesque, one of a kind, three-bedroom house in Edinburgh’s prestigious Comely Bank. Built in 1900 to accommodate the Headmaster of Flora Stevenson school. Comely Bank is in one of Edinburgh's most desired areas. Comely Bank Road links Stockbridge to Craigleith with Stockbridge offering a gre..."
"The Riverwood - FOUR BEDROOM home with flexible layout of KITCHEN/ DINING and SEPARATE LOUNGE. FRENCH DOORS to GARDEN. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM features an EN-SUITE, while one of the remaining three bedrooms could become a useful a HOME OFFICE."
The wonderfully spacious 4 bedroom Geddes home is perfect for family living.
 32 Redford Drive is an extremely bright and charming detached bungalow set amidst beautifully tended landscaped gardens to front and rear.  This most delightful family home has ...
"Two bedrooms, lift served, ninth floor apartment with spectacular uninterrupted view of Portobello Beach, Edinburgh and The Pentlands. The flat is west and south facing and consequently flooded with light."
"Open viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This immaculately presented garden flat with tranquil, south-facing private garden forms part of a converted, stone-built Victorian villa in a highly sought-after location in Morningside. The property is perfectly located for access to a variety of popular shops, ca..."
"Stunning two bedroom detached house within a private gated development, in the sought after area of Ravelston Dykes."
Beautiful Four Bedroom Family Home in Edinburgh's Desirable Trinity
"This is a bright, spacious and impressive four-bedroom, third floor flat situated in sought-after Marchmont, a short distance from Edinburgh’s city centre. With flexible and well-proportioned accommodation throughout it forms part of a traditional Victorian tenement and offers spectacular views o..."
"Located within Edinburgh's historic Georgian New Town, an elegant, spacious and attractively decorated 2nd floor traditional tenement flat offering bright and versatile ..."
"Enjoy a residential location with this impressive five-bedroom detached home in Barnton. Situated in a peaceful street with rear garden views over to the prestigious Royal Burgess Golf Club. It benefits from high-quality contemporary upgrades, enclosed gardens, a conservatory and garage. There ar..."
"Forming part of a modern development, 10 Kimmerghame Row is a stylish and immaculately presented 4 bedroom end-terraced townhouse, situated in the highly sought after area of ..."
Traditional Garden Level Flat - Beautiful Location - 3 Double Bedrooms - Spacious Sitting Room - Kitchen - Private Front and Rear Garden - Family Bathroom - Traditional Features -Excellent Transport Links - Abundance of Local Amenities
"A three-bedroom detached house situated in popular Duddingston, set within easy reach of Portobello and the city centre, and offering spacious accommodation and the possibility to extend and develop further (subject to consent). Representing an ideal home for families and city professionals, this..."
"Tastefully presented and exceptionally spacious, three-bedroom, main door flat, forming part of an impressive traditional tenement. Located in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Merchiston district, to the southwest of the city centre. The vestibule offers ample space for outerwear and opens..."
This wonderful two bedroom conversion home positioned on the first floor within the majestic Playfair building enjoys views of the surrounding landscaped gardens and breath-taking chapel.
Impressive Home on Quiet Street - Immaculate Interior Retaining Period Features - Private Front and South East Facing Rear Garden - Sitting Room - Kitchen/Dining Room - 3 Bedrooms - Bathroom - Utility Room - Potential to Extend
"Stunning lower ground, ground and mezzanine level apartment forming part of the iconic Playfair Building at Donaldson's."
"Located in the prestigious residential area of Morningside, this impressive 3 bedroom lower villa forms part of a handsome Victorian crescent. The property lies within walking ..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this exceptional semi-detached house with private gardens, driveway and garage, situated within the sought after residential area ..."
"Forming part of an impressive Victorian end-terraced property, this superb 3 bedroom double upper is located in the highly sought after residential area of the West End. The ..."
"This exceptionally spacious three bedroom apartment occupies the second floor of a traditional Victorian tenement, situated on a peaceful tree-lined crescent in the heart of Bruntsfield. Presented in immaculate condition, the property has undergone extensive refurbishment in the last year, effort..."
Spacious and Modern Four Bedroom Townhouse in Edinburgh's Sought-after Fettes Cul-de-sac
Last unit remaining in this elegant and contemporary development in the highly sought after area of Morningside. This high end and spacious two bedroom apartment lies on the first floor which can be accessed by communal lift or stairs. The large open plan kitchen and living area offers comforta...
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This beautifully presented extended stone front semi detached villa is situated within the highly sought after area of Corstorphine. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities, easy reach of the City Centre, Edinburgh Airport and motorway networks...."
"Only flat remaining within this exclusive new development in vibrant Morningside - two bedrooms and bathrooms. No.7 Canaan Lane is an exciting new development of ten exceptional, one and two bedroom apartments (forecasted Energy Efficiency rating B) . Apartment three is a wonderful two bedroom..."
"PLOT 7 IS A THREE BEDROOM APARTMENT SPLIT OVER TWO LEVELS WITH A LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, LIVING AND DINING ROOM AND TWO BATHROOMS. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT."
McEwan Fraser is delighted to present the bright and spacious double upper flat with a private front garden.
"Beautifully presented and spacious two-bedroom lower ground apartment occupying the garden level of a traditional Victorian townhouse in the heart of the West End. The property is within easy walking distance of Haymarket station, trams and the financial district as well as a wide selection of r..."
"CLOSING FOR OFFERS FRIDAY 17TH MARCH, 12 NOON. 33 (TFL) Howe Street is a superb top floor flat in Edinburgh's highly sought after New Town, now requiring refurbishment. The property, which forms part of an A-Listed building retains a wealth of impressive Georgian features throughout including hig..."
"A fabulous duplex penthouse flat part of the exclusive Platinum Point development in the popular Newhaven district, perfectly positioned for access to a wide range of local ..."
"Wonderful two bedroom apartment with a private terrace, in the wonderful Dean Village Fabulous two bedroom apartment set within an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Set within the hugely popular Dean Village Conservation area, the Bells Brae development consists of 10 unique ..."
"With 4 bedrooms and a sociable kitchen diner, the detached Fraser is perfect if you're looking for a little extra space."
"Investor purchase only, sale with tenants in situ. Connell and Connell are delighted to present to the market this well proportioned five bedroom double upper flat in a desirable residential area close to the City Centre."
"Located in a quiet street in the highly desirable residential area of Newington, this attractive ground floor flat forms part of a converted Victorian townhouse. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities, easy reach of the City Centre and a stones throw from Holyrood Park/Arthu..."
"Positioned in the desirable coastal suburb of Cramond, a short stroll from the beach, this generous detached twostorey home enjoys light and airy versatile interiors with ..."
"3 Bedroom Penthouse Apartment This fabulous 3 bedroom penthouse apartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home. The Lerwick features an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen, family bathroom and three double bedrooms. Bedroom 1 features a walk in wardrob..."
"This newly built three bedroom, ground floor apartment flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. Internally the flat comprises of an entrance hallway with plenty of storage to keep bits and bobs out of sight. Off the hallway t..."
Luxurious one bedroom apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 2 is a beautifully crafted one bed apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning studio apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. ...
"Detached, three-bedroom family home in Edinburgh’s sought-after Cramond. Well-presented throughout with private gardens and an enviable conservatory, this contemporary property offers spacious and flexible modern family living over two generously proportioned floors. ..."
"Luxurious 2 bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pepp..."
"New phase at The Engine Yard JUST RELEASED! . Two-bedroom, contemporary DUPLEX apartment with GARDEN in an excellent CITY LOCATION. SPACIOUS KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. EXPANSIVE OPEN PLAN LIVING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
Entered from a magnificent marbled tiled ground floor this is a 2 double bedroom flat which sits comfortably within a block housing only 3 duplex apartments. 
"This second floor apartment with principal en suite features well-proportioned bedrooms and ample storage. The open plan living/kitchen/dining area hosts an island, ideal for socialising."
"*FINAL HOME NOW REMAINING AT EDGELAW - ENJOY 5% DEPOSIT PAID. T'S & C'S APPLY * The ROSSIE has twin FRENCH DOORS to the family/dining area and kitchen open up the home to the GARDEN, bringing a light and airy feel to the home. Two EN-SUITE shower rooms to the bedrooms. DOUBLE GARAGE."
Spacious and extended semi-detached house with attractive garden and offering flexible family accommodation located in a popular residential area.
"7 Old Mill Lane is a Detached House, enjoying a beautiful setting adjacent to an 18th century mill house, once part of the Inch Park Estate, enjoying a rural feel yet is just minutes from Edinburgh’s city centre.   Located just off Gilmerton Road and situated in a quiet position surrou..."
"A well-presented three-bedroom, ground floor apartment in a prestigious, Applecross development in Craiglockhart. The spacious and light filled property offers comfortable, flexible, and attractive accommodation now in need of some modernisation. With a private garage, balcony, and landscaped gro..."
"Rarely available, beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious, three-bedroom, second (top) floor apartment. Set in an impressive 'B' listed Victorian college building conversion located in the Newington area, just south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance vestibule offers space for out..."
"Enjoying a secluded location, surrounded by beautiful mature trees in the highly desirable Barnton district is this substantial, extended semi-detached house offering ideal family ..."
"A beautifully presented Georgian flat. Leopold Place is a charming second floor flat, forming part of a handsome period terrace overlooking Calton Hill. The property has classic period proportions, fine period detailing and modern fixtures and fittings. The flat offers balanced living an..."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate upper flat situated in the Stockbridge colonies that has been finished to the highest standard throughout. The flat ...
"Exceptionally light and spacious traditional flat retaining lovely period features and superbly situated close to the green expanse of the Meadows, excellent amenities and the central Universities. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the generously proportioned and flexible accommodation..."
"An appealing detached villa with driveway, garage with power and lighting and well maintained private gardens, forming part of a mature, well established modern development.This ..."
Exquisite Traditional Ground Floor Main Door Apartment which has been upgraded to a very high standard by the present owners.
"Luxurious two bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pe..."
"Fabulous two bedroom apartment in an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Fabulous two bedroom apartment set within an enviable position with access to the Water of Leith. Set within the hugely popular Dean Village Conservation area, the Bells Brae development consists of 10 uni..."
"6 Rothesay Mews is a unique opportunity to acquire a stylish first floor, two double bedroom apartment with study, peacefully located in the heart of the West End within the New Two Conservation Area. In turn-key condition, this immaculate property offers spacious, flexible, open-plan accommodati..."
"Situated in sought-after Newington, this traditional, main-door, lower villa promises a spacious residence for families. It features a large living room and breakfasting kitchen, four double bedrooms, and two bathrooms, as well as two private gardens and a garage. Whilst the interiors are deco..."
A fantastic five bedroom family home offering flexible accommodation and a delightful south-facing garden.
"Superb, main door apartment with 2 double bedrooms, private garden and excellent open aspect to Bruntsfield Links, forming part of a B-listed Victorian terrace in the sought-after ..."
"This immaculate and timeless two-bedroom, first floor apartment forms part of a contemporary residential development from AMA Homes and is situated in the highly sought-after neighbourhood of Cramond. In turn-key condition, this property offers spacious accommodation with an open plan living area..."
"• Extremely spacious 3 bed flat. • Potential to convert attic space. • Peaceful New Town location. 11 Eyre Crescent is an exceptionally spacious, three-bedroomed, third floor apartment forming part of a splendid category ‘C’ listed Victorian Crescen..."
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire an unusual and ideally located building plot in one of Edinburgh’s most sought-after residential areas. Benefitting from full detailed planning to create a magnificent, three bedroom, detached home. The scheme for which the necessary planning pe..."
"Beautiful one-bedroom apartments @ The Moorings, Edinburgh Marina - A unique Waterside location. The Moorings development is part of one of Edinburgh's most exciting regeneration projects. It offers a luxury front-line development of 98 spacious 1, 2, 3 & 4 bedroom apartments, garden apartments ..."
"A selection of one bedroom luxury apartments, available to reserve off plan."
"Quietly enjoying a cul-de-sac position, this charming mid-terraced townhouse is located in the highly sought-after location of Murrayfield. The property is close to good amenities and is within easy reach of the City Centre and Edinburgh Airport by way of a good regular public transport system. ..."
The Douglas is a 4 bedroom home ideally situated to growing families or professional couples
"***Developers Warranty*** This modern apartment is situated on the second floor of a contemporary, factored development in desirable Cramond and boasts two bedrooms, a generous open-plan living area, a dining kitchen, a study, and two bathrooms, plus access to landscaped shared grounds and an ..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a top floor flat in Edinburgh's desirable New Town.
The Douglas is a 4 bedroom home ideally situated to growing families or professional couples.
"Beautifully presented four bedroom double upper traditional tenement flat (INTERNAL SIZE - 134 SQM), available for sale in this highly sought-after area of Bellevue. Boasting stunning south facing views towards Calton Hill and Arthur Seat. "
"A beautiful, south facing one bedroom mezzanine apartment at The Playfair, Donaldson’s, a Category A listed building, ideally located in Edinburgh’s West End."
"Ground-floor flat forming part of a B-listed Victorian townhouse in the heart of the West End, within the New Town conservation area, enjoying two bedrooms, an open-plan living area, a four-piece bathroom, a dressing room, and a private garage (available by separate negotiation). Beautifully pre..."
"*CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 26TH JANUARY AT 12 NOON* An extremely light and spacious first floor apartment presented in immaculate condition, convenient for superb local amenities and access to city centre. Comprising an impressive first floor apartment which forms part of a splendid traditional st..."
2 bedroom lower ground flat with private south facing garden in Edinburgh's Eastern New Town.
"With 3 bedrooms, the Chalmers is perfect for anyone looking for a little extra space."
"Set on a quiet, tree-lined cul-de-sac, moments from Portobello beach and Brunstane train station is this immaculately presented townhouse. Boasting a private rear garden, wide ..."
"Beautifully presented with attractive, modern interiors, neutral décor, and charming original features, this generously proportioned 2-bedroom, 2-bathroom flat is set on the third/top floor of a handsome, B-listed Victorian building in the city's West End, within the UNESCO World Heritage Site Ne..."
"Located on a newly renovated side-street in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Morningside area, Purplebricks are proud to present to the market this immaculately presented and well proportioned second floor apartment in a deceptively spacious development, offering bright and comfortable accommodati..."
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £475,000 - £515,000*"
"This rarely available, second-floor apartment is part of a stunning, B-listed, Baronial-style villa dated 1868. The unique and characterful home enjoys generous accommodation, ..."
An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this rarely available exceptional semi-detached bungalow which offers bright and spacious family sized accommodation. The ...
"Lying within walking distance of Portobello’s picturesque beach and enjoying sea views, this traditional detached chalet bungalow promises a versatile family home with four ..."
"Particularly appealing double upper villa retaining fine period detail, offering spacious, comfortable and well planned accommodation on two levels and commanding fine westerly ..."
A mid terrace upper villa in this sought after street in Morningside.
"2 Northlawn Terrace is a spacious, mid-terraced house in a quiet and secluded location with an integral double garage and well-kept communal gardens. Ground Floor: Entrance hall with storage cupboard; family room with patio doors to the gardens, double bedroom 2; double bedroom 3 with built-in-wa..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this extremely spacious and bright semi-detached bungalow, well placed within the popular Murrayfield district close to a host of ..."
"3D Tour Available, Situated in one of Edinburgh's most sought-after areas, this spacious and bright 2nd Floor Flat offers a perfect blend of period charm and superb city living. The large Victorian flat commands magnif..."
A spacious apartment with two outdoor areas. The private garden is accessed via the open plan living area while the private balcony can be accessed through bedrooms 2 & 3.
"OFFERED £10,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION. A spacious modern terraced townhouse overlooking Bruntsfield Golf Course and with views to Fife. The property is quietly positioned just off Easter Park Drive in the Barnton area to the west of the city centre. The house offers flexible and spaci..."
"Warners are delighted to present to market this generously proportioned four bedroom first floor apartment, forming part of a traditional Victorian era stone built tenement ..."
"The 4 bedroom PRINGLE is a fantastic home with OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining, STUDY, lounge with BAY WINDOW, master and second bedroom with EN-SUITE, further two bedrooms, FAMILY bathroom"
"This beautifully presented, three-bedroom cottage offers the rare opportunity to acquire a light and airy home, enjoying a tranquil outlook to its private walled south facing garden. Arranged over two levels, this secluded much-loved family home offers spacious accommodation with a cosy family si..."
"35 Redford Avenue is a spacious family home in a popular residential location. The versatile accommodation extends to 4 bedrooms, dining kitchen and bay windowed living room. The property has off-street parking to the front and a south facing, enclosed garden to the rear. Welcoming hall with unde..."
"Part of a traditional building, this charming, three-bedroom, main-door flat boasts an enviable location in the highly sought-after Morningside conservation area, set within easy reach of fantastic amenities, transport links, and Edinburgh’s idyllic green belt.The home offers spac..."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to bring this beautifully presented two-bedroom drawing room flat to the market. The property is presented to the market in superb internal order and offers an elegant and spacious living space. As is typical with this type of property, there are high ceilings, wonderfu..."
"Fixed Price - Enjoying a central location in a traditional tenement building, this spacious third floor flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities. The p..."
"CLOSING FOR OFFERS WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH, 12 NOON. A spacious and extended detached family home in the ever-popular Buckstone. The property offers flexible living accommodation of just under 1500 sqft and presents an excellent opportunity. The accommodation comprises, entrance vestibule, spacious ..."
Enjoy a prime location with this three-bedroom top floor apartment in leafy Marchmont. This light filled property boasts spacious and well-presented accommodation with spectacular open views across the Meadows to Edinburgh Castle. Situated within a traditional tenement with a shared rear garden a...
"This exclusive, three-bedroom, second-floor apartment forms part of a stunning, B-listed, Scots baronial-style building (1867-9) in highly sought-after Greenbank. The charming home offers bright and spacious accommodation that is characterised by high ceilings and light neutral décor, whic..."
"Plot C1.04  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"39 (2F1) or flat 3 Lauderdale Street is a well-presented two-bedroom second floor flat with box room, situated in the desirable Marchmont area. The location is superb with excellent local amenities, schools, and universities, and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding are..."
"Boasting four bedrooms (principal with en-suite), generous living space, family bathroom and downstairs WC, all enhanced by stylish presentation, this detached house forms part of ..."
"Plot C0.03  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"The Cullen is a stylish FOUR BEDROOM HOME. The ground floor offers a GENEROUS LOUNGE, AN OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA WITH FRENCH DOORS to the garden, a UTILITY ROOM AND WC. The first floor comprises THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, WITH BEDROOM 1 FEATURING AN EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM, A SINGLE BEDROOM, COMPU..."
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this magnificent late Georgian flat to the market. Located in the New Town conservation area, the property occupies the third/top floor of a B-listed tenement which was designed by the prominent architect James Gillespie Graham. Inter..."
"A beautiful 1 bedroom duplex, positioned on the first floor within the stunning Playfair building. The apartment is sold with one allocated parking space in the secure underground car park."
"£20,000 below home report valuation! An extremely impressive end terraced mews style property with easily maintained private courtyard garden, which is enviably located on quiet cobbled street in the heart of the New Town, which is within walking distance of excellent local amenities ..."
"Forming part of an exclusive walled development with residents parking and landscaped grounds is this superb second floor flat, which also has a private garage. Situated in the ..."
"Flat 1, is a most impressive, spacious and luxurious 2 bed en suite apartment located on the first floor of this impressive building. Substantial ceiling heights, large sash and case windows are combined with quality contemporary finishings. Close to The Shore and new tram stop."
"A spacious and bright three bedroom ground floor apartment benefiting from a terrace and garage, located in the ever sought after area of The Grange."
"This traditional, three-bedroom detached bungalow is ideally situated in Corstorphine, positioned conveniently close to a wealth of amenities, including shops, schools, excellent transport links, and scenic open spaces, and is also just under five miles from the heart of the capital. The home enj..."
25 2F Glencairn Crescent is a large 2 bedroom apartment on the second floor of this beautiful Victorian period building.
"This elegant and beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor flat situated on Learmonth Terrace in the prestigious West End of Edinburgh, a walk or bus ride from Princes Street and George Street. The flat is entered via a large hallway with entry on the right to the fantastic open plan..."
"A superb and spacious three bedroom, ground floor apartment in an attractive contemporary development by Cala Homes. Located in the city’s popular Hillside district, handy ..."
The Crombie is an impressive four bedroom detached home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway takes you to the front-facing lounge and to the back of the house where you'll find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with a family area.  A utility room and WC are located just off the kitchen ...
"The Crombie is an impressive four bedroom detached home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway takes you to the front-facing lounge and to the back of the house where you'll find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with a family area. 
 
A utility room and WC are located just off the kitchen..."
"Situated in a prime location in Edinburgh's highly regarded West End, this two-bedroom top(second) floor flat, forms part of a handsome B-Listed Georgian style terrace, a stone's throw from Haymarket train station and Edinburgh's bustling West End."
"A spacious and contemporary, two bedroom, second floor apartment forming part of the exclusive Quartermile development set in the south of Edinburgh’s city centre. Situated in one of the modern blocks, the property offers bright, open-plan living with an allocated garaged parking space and ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to present to market this stunning and highly impressive four bedroom detached house, well-positioned within a modern new residential development on the ..."
11 Barnton Park Gardens is an impressive detached house located in the highly sought after residential area of Barnton. The property offers bright and generously proportioned ...
"17 Walker Street is a delightful, well presented, 1st floor drawing room flat, with 2 bedrooms, situated in the heart of Edinburgh’s famous West End. The bright and spacious apartment is well presented and in excellent condition and comprises of a fitted kitchen, 2 well-presented double bed..."
Now fixed price below home report value.Warners are delighted to present this superb semi-detached home with an impressive open-plan kitchen/living and dining room. Located in an ...
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this superb three bedroom first floor apartment with garage, situated in the prestigious Merchiston district of the city, perfectly ..."
"Open Viewing Sunday 19th March 2-4 pm Set on a leafy street in Burdiehouse Village surrounded by garden grounds, this generous detached bungalow enjoys two reception areas, a large kitchen, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, and a bathroom, plus a detached tandem garage with partly fit..."
"Open viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This tastefully presented detached bungalow with attic conversion and separate one bedroom annexe is located in Burdiehouse in south Edinburgh, close to convenient local amenities, the City Bypass and public transport links to the city centre. The accommodation co..."
"Apartment six is a two bedroom apartment in the newly-built part of the development, with a generous, open plan living, kitchen and dining space, large principal bedroom and ample storage space. The folding French windows in the living area flood the space with natural light and offer wonderful v..."
"41 (Flat 4) York Place is a beautifully refurbished 1 bedroom, second floor apartment in the heart of Edinburgh's New Town."
Spacious three bedroom tenement flat with planning in place to create a five bed HMO property.
"Set in the heart of Marchmont and boasting breath-taking views over The Meadows, Castle and Arthur’s Seat is this immaculately presented top floor traditional apartment. Nestled ..."
"A lovely one bedroom apartment positioned on the ground floor of the stunning Playfair building, with views towards the central courtyard."
"Plot B0.02 is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
Purplebricks are proud to bring to the market this rare opportunity to purchase this stunning four-bedroom bungalow in the popular residential area of Craigentinny Road. Accommodation Comprises ~ The property has a large open plan living room with space for a dining table along with a beautifu...
"Plot A4.01  is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 4th floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Newly launched, Temple Park is a contemporary, sustainable residential development situated on the banks of Union Canal overlooking Pentland Hills to the west and the historic Edinburgh City Centre skyline to the east. A unique collection of 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments and a stunning..."
Spacious Three Bedroom End Terraced House in Edinburgh's Sought After Craigleith Area
"This lovely semi-detached villa is brought to the market providing a splendid family home located in a highly-regarded residential area in Edinburgh.   The accommodation comprises: on the ground floor: a welcoming entrance hall, a spacious dual-aspect lounge/diningroom with a large wind..."
"The Pinehurst is an ELEGANT 4-bedroom detached home with GENEROUS ground floor living accommodation, including an OPEN-PLAN kitchen, dining and family area, a utility room with sink facilities, a DUAL-ASPECT living room, and an integral garage."
"The Tantallon is a bright and spacious family home designed for flexible living. A spacious entrance hallway leads to a downstairs bedroom/home office, the lounge, WC and open-plan kitchen/dining roomwith the added benefit of a utility room. French doors open out from the kitchen into the back ga..."
"Charming elevated main door flat enhanced by fine period features and natural wood finishes, boasting its own private front and rear gardens, forming part of a red sandstone ..."
"This new build southwest facing, second floor apartment forms part of an impressive contemporary development, located in the heart of Edinburgh’s desirable Corstorphine ..."
"A spacious top floor flat situated in a handsome A listed building, located in the heart of the City Centre next to the new St James Quarter. Enjoying a beautiful outlook across the City skyline to the Firth of Forth the property retains superb period features and boasts a communal garden to the..."
"Fabulously situated in Edinburgh’s leafy West End, this immaculate two-bedroom second floor property is located within a B-listed Georgian terraced townhouse. This is a superb opportunity to acquire one of these enviable New Town apartments which boasts stylish neutral interiors, fixtures a..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this superb development opportunity, which forms part of a handsome period terrace located in the capitals desirable Newington ..."
"Most attractive 1st floor gable end flat, enjoying a bright south/west facing aspect, forming part of a select modern development and located in a popular and convenient ..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this impressive Victorian end-terraced house with private garden, situated within the heart of Corstorphine, close to excellent ..."
"Elegant and spacious two-bedroom apartment, occupying the first floor of a traditional Victorian building in the heart of the West End. In turn-key condition, this property is in immaculate condition with key original features such as expansive sash and case windows particularly in the sitting ro..."
"Located in the Marchmont conservation area, this traditional, two-bedroom (plus box room), second-floor flat has an enviable position, set within easy walking distance of The Meadows, Edinburgh University, and a wide choice of amenities. The south-facing property is in excellent decorative order ..."
"88 Milton Road West is a bright and spacious detached bungalow, situated east of Edinburgh city centre in the popular district of Duddingston. With superb development potential, ..."
"Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser are delighted to present this beautiful three bedroom double upper flat to the market. The property has retained a wealth of period character and is presented to the market in excellent condition. Alongside well-proportioned living accommodation, the propert..."
"Located within a quiet street in the highly sought after residential area of Newington, this lovely and spacious first floor flat forms part of a converted Victorian townhouse. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities, easy reach of the City Centre and a stones throw from Holy..."
An impressive two-bedroom B-listed Georgian apartment situated in a prime corner position in the heart of desirable Stockbridge. The spacious lounge with period features and bay windows overlooking North West Circus Place and the expansive kitchen/ dining room with original flagstone flooring set...
"9 West Catherine Place is a very appealing, rarely available 3 bedroom terraced cottage located in the desirable residential area of the West End. The property lies within easy ..."
The Dean is a spacious four bedroom home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway leads to a large front-aspect lounge. To the back of the home you will find an open-plan kitchen with dining and family areas and French doors leading onto the back garden. A useful utility room and WC complete...
An impressive three-bedroom apartment with a seamless open plan living design.
"Forming part of a handsome, traditional stone tenement building is this well presented top floor flat. Enjoying a bright triple aspect, the flat has gas central heating and double glazed windows with the building having secure entry and a shared garden. The property is located in the sought aft..."
"With all the benefits of city centre living on the immediate doorstep, 84 Comely Bank Avenue is a spacious and bright main door tenement flat located in the popular Comely Bank ..."
"Plot A1.02 is an impressive, low carbon, 3-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
Spacious Four Bedroom Second Floor Flat In Marchmont
"NEW FIXED PRICE - Recently updated to give a bright, modern feeling, this lovely two bedroom double upper flat is set over the second and third floors of an attractive period ..."
The Dunbar is a spacious detached home with an INTEGRAL GARAGE. The ENTRANCE HALLWAY leads to the SPACIOUS LOUNGE at front of the home. Further along the hall you will find the OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with FRENCH DOORS LEADING TO THE GARDEN. Downstairs also hosts a WC and UTILITY ROOM off t...
Style C2 is an impressive three-bedroom apartment with a seamless open plan living design.
"The Dunbar is a spacious four bedroom home. With a large lounge at the front and an open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the rear garden, this is the perfect home for growing families. There are four double rooms upstairs with bedroom 1 benefiting from an en suite, as well a..."
"Apartment seven is one of the desirable two bedroom apartments in the newly-built part of the development. The apartment benefits from a large folding French doors and Juliet balcony in the living/dining area offering leafy views over the garden and tree-lined canal. A large bathroom, ample stora..."
"Particularly appealing 2nd floor flat retaining fine period detail, forming part of a well maintained traditional tenement and located in an extremely popular and convenient ..."
"The seamless layout of the open plan space combines the lounge, dining and kitchen creating an inviting space to relax and unwind after a hard day."
A stylish second floor apartment with private balcony accessed via the open plan living/kitchen/dining area complete with 2 double bedrooms. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated.
"Sitting on Ardmillan Terrace, where Gorgie and Dalry meet. Plot 46 is ideally positioned to take advantage of all these areas have to offer. This newly built two bedroom second floor flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. "
Spacious two bedroom ground floor flat in the Corstorphine area of Edinburgh.
"Nestled around the Water of Leith, surrounded by lush established trees complete with allocated parking and private balcony. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated."
"Nestled around the Water of Leith this two bedroom ground floor apartment offers stylish open plan living, kitchen, dining area with private terrace, family bathroom and principal en suite."
"This stylish, newly-constructed fourth/top-floor flat is an attractive purchase for any buy to let investor, currently achieving 5.6% rental yield. The property is fully HMO compliant and is currently let as a three bedroom HMO.The property boasts three double bedrooms and versatile box bedroom, ..."
Wonderfully presented top floor flat in the sought after West End of Edinburgh.
Spacious Four Bedroom Family Home In Edinburgh's Popular Liberton
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links, Portobello Beach and Arthur’s Seat is this immaculately presented main door upper villa. Boasting ..."
"Immaculately presented two-bedroom first floor flat, forming part of a B-Listed converted Georgian terraced townhouse, situated in the desirable New Town. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and schools and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding areas. T..."
52/1 Learmonth Crescent is a rarely available three-bedroom flat forming part of a traditional tenement building in the popular and attractive area of Comely Bank. The property is quietly situated at the end of the cul-de-sac and has been extensively upgraded in 2021 with new double-glazed window...
PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this five-bedroom detached house to the market. The property is presented to the market in excellent internal order and has been thoughtfully extended by the current owners. Alnwickhill is an established development in Liberton and of...
"Located within a quiet street and forming part of a converted Victorian townhouse, this charming top (second) floor attic flat is located within the highly desirable area of Newington. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities, easy reach of the City Centre and a stones throw f..."
"Impressive, cleverly extended detached family villa with delightful private gardens including a large sunny south-west facing rear garden, double driveway and single garage, ..."
Spacious four bedroom detached house in sought after area with large garden and scope to expand.
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Oakmont is an impressive, detached family home which benefits from an integral garage, a front-facing living room, a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with four spacious double bedrooms to the upper floor."
"Boasting an exclusive New Town address, this stylish first-floor flat, with two bedrooms and a dual-level living area, lies on the first floor of a handsome B-Listed Victorian townhouse, within strolling distance of Princes Street and has access to Drumsheugh Gardens (subject to a fee). This desi..."
Well-Presented Semi-Detached Family Home - 3 Bedrooms - Private Front and Rear Gardens - Sitting/Dining Room - Kitchen - Family Bathroom - Excellent Storage - Single Garage - Driveway
"Enviably located in Edinburgh’s New Town conservation area, this main-door duplex apartment forms part of an A-listed building with Greek Revival architecture, designed in 1820 ..."
"Designed to accommodate modern lifestyles, the 3 bedroom Blair will suit couples and families alike."
"A spacious ground floor apartment features stylish open plan kitchen/living/dining area, double bedroom with ample storage and sleek contemporary bathroom."
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this beautiful three-bedroom, ground floor flat forming part of a contemporary development, boasting access to a charming patio and ..."
"Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town, a neighbourhood pe..."
"A must on your viewing list McDougall McQueen present to the market this fabulous, bright and spacious four bedroom townhouse offering excellent modern day family accommodation arranged over three floors, with a private rear garden and secure underground parking. The property is ideally located i..."
"*FIXED £15K BELOW HR - INVESTMENT SALE ONLY, TENANT IN SITU* Rental achievement £1,650pcm in current condition. 5% return based on sales value of £395,000. Located within the James Gillespie's Primary School and James Gillespie's High School catchments. "
"An immaculately presented, two double bedroom, two bathroom, apartment in one of Edinburgh’s most sought-after locations. Murray and Currie are thrilled to bring to market this immaculately presented two double bedroom apartment situated in one of Edinburgh's most sought-after locations with a w..."
"This spacious three bedroom semi-detached home is great for those looking to take the next step on the property ladder. Downstairs you have a comfortable living room to the front and at the back of the home, you'll find a spacious kitchen/dining/family room leading to the back garden. A utility r..."
"5 Joppa Park is a rarely available traditional Lower Villa Flat with Two Double Bedrooms, situated in a prime position, a one-minute walk from Portobello beach and esplanade.  An impressive property offering a truly idyllic setting with the stunning sandy beach and sea views on the doorstep,..."
"Rarely available, light and well-presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with an integrated garage. Located on a quiet, cobbled side street in Edinburgh's desirable New Town area, in the heart of the city centre. The front door opens directly into a spacious open-plan area, finished wit..."
"This exceptionally charming semi-detached bungalow enjoys a peaceful setting on a small well-kept cul-de-sac, located close to excellent amenities/transport links, in the highly ..."
"Beautifully-presented and spacious, flexible two-bedroom, lower ground floor flat with a private patio, forming part of an exclusive, factored residential development and set adjacent to the Water of Leith, in the heart of Edinburgh's highly desirable Stockbridge area, just north of the city c..."
"Currently offering a full LBTT payment** Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edi..."
"This two-bedroom (plus box room), secondfloor flat forms part of a traditional tenement building that is enviably located in the heart of prestigious Morningside, a stone’s ..."
"FIXED PRICE £390,000 (£10k Below HR Value) and quick sale required.Flat 4, 1 Smiddy Wynd is a gorgeous example of a 3 bedroom 1st floor apartment set within a bespoke Square & ..."
"If you’re looking for a turnkey city pad with the optional extras of city centre parking and a fully interior designed furniture package, this one-bedroom apartment at Waverley Square will hit the mark. The one-bedroom show home has been professionally designed by industry exper..."
"The property comprises a traditional, attractively presented 2nd floor conversion within a fine Victorian terrace and located in the heart of Edinburgh’s popular and renowned ..."
"A stylish one bedroom apartment with open plan living, family bathroom and ample storage."
"This well-presented garden flat with private, walled garden is located in Newington, a popular area slightly south of Edinburgh city centre. The property is perfectly located for access to Edinburgh University, Arthur's Seat and a variety of shops, cafes, restaurants and bars. The accommodatio..."
"Fabulously situated in Edinburgh’s prestigious Marchmont, this three-bedroom top floor apartment, is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious, well-proportioned, and bright traditional property featuring a number of original period features. Close to open green spaces, well-regarded schoolin..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, two-bedroom, second (top) floor flat, forming part of an impressive converted townhouse. Located on a leafy side street, in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Morningside area, just south of the city centre. The reception hall gives access throughout, includin..."
"£10,000 below home report valuation. A superbly located two-bedroom flat in the heart of Edinburgh’s sought-after New Town. Abercromby Place is regarded as one of the finest streets in the city and is a short walk to George Street, Princes Street and the new St James Quarter. Fashiona..."
"If you’re looking for a turnkey city pad with the optional extras of city centre parking, this one-bedroom apartment at Waverley Square will hit the mark. The one-bedroom show home has been professionally designed by industry experts to present a high-end boho city vibe within t..."
"Magnificent FAMILY home with a WALK-THROUGH family/dining room and kitchen, master bedroom with EN-SUITE, further two bedrooms, FAMILY bathroom."
"The CARLTON - a striking THREE-BEDROOM home with SEPARATE LOUNGE, beautifully lit by windows at either end, shares the ground floor with a dual aspect kitchen featuring FRENCH DOORS in the DINING AREA leading to the garden. A SEPARATE LAUNDRY room aids household management, and the stunning EN-SU..."
"New homes at The Engine Yard READY NOW! . Two-bedroom, MODERN apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
"READY NOW - Plot 170 Two bedroom, 961 sqft, MODERN apartment with Balcony in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
Beautifully presented and well proportioned three bedroom double upper apartment located in the extremely popular Longstone area of Edinburgh. The property will appeal to a wide range of buyer with flexible accommodation and a fantastic child friendly garden.
Enjoy a sought-after location with this impressive two-bedroom apartment situated in Edinburgh’s prestigious Bruntsfield. This attractive and generously proportioned property on the first floor of a traditional Victorian tenement features charming period features including ornate cornicing ...
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this outstanding maisonette apartment providing spacious living on both the ground and first floor levels. Forming part of the modern Urban Eden development, the apartment provides bright and spacious accommodation with feature double height lounge,..."
"Forming part of a C-listed former church on Commercial Street in Leith, this generous first-floor flat offers spacious and flexible accommodation including an open-plan living area, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, a bathroom, and a study, all enhanced by minimalist décor. Externally, the..."
"4 Bedroom House on a Fantastic Plot.  Eligible for OMSE LIFT scheme.                        This fantastic house is set in a quiet cul-de-sac, close to local amenities and a short distance to the transport links. This well-pro..."
"This bright and spacious main-door duplex flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops, restaurants and amenities. The property is conveniently located for many Unive..."
"Forming part of an exclusive landscaped development with private parking facilities, this contemporary first floor flat has a lovely light and spacious interior and the added benefit of a private balcony. The open plan living space has windows on three sides which flood the room with light and p..."
This stunning main door 3-bedroom property forms part of prestigious modern development quietly nestled on the banks of the Water of Leith in the idyllic and highly regarded ...
"Offering beautifully presented accommodation and located within the sought after Bruntsfield area of Edinburgh is this large second floor flat. Forming part of an Art Deco inspired building with secure entry system, there is a shared garden to the rear which is mainly laid to lawn. Of..."
"Closing date set Tuesday 21st March at 11am. Set in a handsome traditional tenement, moments from excellent local amenities, vast open green spaces and most university ..."
A main door flat situated in the prestigious Comely Bank district of the city perfectly positioned for access to Edinburgh City Centre and a wide range of local amenities.  ...
"We'll help you move to our last remaining Durris house type with Movemaker. We could help you arrange your sale and pay your estate agent fees. Speak to a Sales Adviser for full details.
The Durris is intelligently designed over THREE STOREYS. There is plenty of space in the OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DIN..."
"Rare opportunity to acquire most desirable Traditional Town Flat, 2nd floor, set amidst Edinburgh's highly regarded ""Comely Bank"". Well proportioned 2 Bedroom accom' with development potential (subject to planning etc). Viewing highly recommended"
"The Fenton is a combination of stylish, modern and spacious. The KITCHEN is a perfect space for entertaining as its OPEN-PLAN DESIGN INCLUDES A DINING AREA AND ACCESS TO THE BACK GARDEN. The ground floor also offers a separate LOUNGE, UTILITY ROOM and WC. Upstairs comprises FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, ..."
"A stunning first floor apartment, nestled around the Water of Leith, surrounded by lush established trees complete with allocated parking. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated."
A stylish first floor apartment with private balcony accessed via the open plan living/kitchen/dining area complete with 2 double bedrooms. All homes are incredibly efficient and A-rated.
"BRAND NEW HOMES at The Engine Yard! . Plot 177 Two-bedroom 851 sqft, MODERN apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
"This two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with excellent development potential is quietly positioned within a highly regarded district of the city, close to excellent amenities and ..."
"New phase at The Engine Yard JUST RELEASED! . Two-bedroom, CONTEMPORARY apartment in an excellent CITY LOCATION. OPEN PLAN kitchen/living area with PRIVATE BALCONY. Double bedrooms with FITTED WARDOBES. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
"This two-bedroom (plus box room) first-floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement building in the sought-after Bruntsfield conservation area, set close to Bruntsfield Links, local amenities, and transport links. It offers spacious accommodation, and is presented in neutral tones throughout, ..."
Rarely available three bedroom main door duplex apartment in an exclusive Colinton development on the banks of the Water of Leith. The private balcony gives stunning views over the water and offers a secluded spot to relax on summer evenings.
Spacious Family Home - 5 Bedrooms - 2 Bathrooms (1 En Suite) - Large Sitting Room - Kitchen/Dining Room - Private Rear Garden - Allocated Parking 
Spacious three bedroom flat in the hugely desirable area of Trinity
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this unique two bed detached house in the heart of Slateford. With superb links to the city centre and fantastic local amenities, the ..."
"This spacious and rarely available semi-detached bungalow with extensive private gardens and a driveway, is quietly situated within the highly sought-after Corstorphine area of ..."
"Fixed at Home Report Valuation Beautifully presented three bedroom apartment with balcony and private garage, set within an attractive residential development in Barnton. "
"Delightful modernised flat, forming part of beautiful Pilrig House, a Grade A listed 17th century turreted Laird’s House of great historical and literary significance, ..."
"The welcoming hallway leads to the open plan lounge, dining & kitchen – the perfect space for entertaining. Relax within the sumptuous principal bedroom which boasts a dressing area."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this impressive semi-detached house with extensive private gardens and secure driveway, situated within the heart of Slateford, ..."
"NEW FIXED PRICE - Recently updated to give a bright, modern feeling, this lovely two bedroom period flat is set on the first floor of a handsome period terrace overlooking the ..."
"Enviably situated in the heart of sought-after Bruntsfield, 4F2 172 Bruntsfield Place is a well-presented three-bedroom apartment on the fourth floor of a traditional sandstone tenement. With generous accommodation, the property boasts a bright bay windowed corner living room, a contem..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, two-bedroom, first-floor flat, forming part of an impressive traditional stone-built tenement. Located on a charming cobbled side street, in the desirable and highly sought-after Comely Bank area, just northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A welcomi..."
"Spacious ground floor apartment offers stylish open plan living, kitchen, dining area with private terrace, family bathroom and principal en suite."
"NOW UNDER OFFER - Enjoying a quiet cul de sac position away from the main road in the city’s exclusive Grange area, sits this unique end-terrace house. With the additional bonus of PRIVATE PARKING AND GARAGE"
Style E2 is a fabulous two-bedroom apartment with a superb open plan concept.
"Just a short stroll to beautiful Inverleith park and the vibrant cafe culture of Stockbridge, is this stunning two-bedroom Victorian tenement flat, in desirable Comely Bank. This second-floor flat offers exceptionally splendid proportions in a fantastic location. The property is brimming with ..."
"Luxurious one bedroom apartment at Waverley Square. Ready to move into. Contact us to book your private Rettie & Co. viewing appointment, or attend the open viewings on Thursdays from 3-7pm and Sundays from 12-4pm. Set in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town..."
Impressive modern and spacious two-bedroom apartment situated in the much sought-after Fountainbridge area.
"Modern first floor flat offering great potential. Forming part of a factored development with a secure entryphone system, a stair lift to first floor level and landscaped communal gardens. This well proportioned home offers great potential and comprises; an L- shaped hall with two cupboards – one..."
"** NEW FIXED PRICE (£20k BELOW HR VALUATION ** Picturesque 2-bedroom Victorian cottage tucked away on a peaceful leafy lane in the sought-after area of Colinton. With immediate access to the wonderful walks of Colinton Dell, Water of Leith walkway and the entrance to the Pentlan..."
An elegant double upper apartment forming part of a unique Gothic style ‘C’ Listed building built circa 1873 with beautiful architectural features. The property is located within one of the City’s most sought after residential areas in a quiet street and is close to an excellent...
A spectacular two-bedroom traditional first floor apartment in desirable leafy Merchiston area of Edinburgh
"This charming two-bedroom, B-listed, third floor apartment forms part of a handsome Victorian tenement , situated in the heart of cosmopolitan Stockbridge, a highly sought after address on the edge of the city’s historic New Town. The property is bright and spacious, facing predominantly so..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this rarely available three bedroom semi-detached family home, situated on a much sought after street in Liberton. Boasting ..."
Stylish 3 bed top floor flat for sale in West End
"With open plan living, a private terrace and allocated parking, reserve Plot 203 for 'Just The One' fee of £250*."
"*** £10K UNDER HOME REPORT *** Commanding spectacular views of Salisbury Crags in Holyrood Park, the well-presented two-bedroom apartment forms part of a beautifully designed modern residential development that is set around an inner courtyard garden. Situated on the first ..."
"Beautifully presented, factor-maintained three-bedroom, two-bathroom apartment occupying a first floor position within an attractive red sandstone Victorian building in the Liberton area. Sympathetically converted by prestigious developers Square and Crescent to create unique contemporary apartm..."
"McDougall McQueen present to the market this fabulous four bedroom detached villa arranged over two floors with gardens to the front and rear along with an integrated garage. The property commands an enviable setting within the Bellway Homes development, moments from excellent local amenities, qu..."
"This two-bed and box apartment is situated in the thriving residential area of Marchmont. Located on the first floor of a Scots Baronial-style tenement, this well laid-out property benefits from period details and an abundance of natural light. Now in need of modernisation, it will make a wonderf..."
"***FIXED PRICE £5K UNDER HOME REPORT VALUATION*** Located within sought after Urban Eden development this immaculately presented Townhouse is set over 3 levels and comprises: Main door entrance at ground level, leading into downstairs hallway with storage cupboards."
"This four bedroom DETACHED HOME has a spacious FRONT LOUNGE which connects to an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA leading out to the BACK GARDEN. The UTILITY ROOM and WC can be found just off the kitchen. Upstairs features THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, with bedroom 1 offering an EN SUITE; a SINGLE BEDROOM ..."
"The Rosevale is an impressive apartment featuring two double bedrooms and a third flexible, single bedroom. The kitchen/lounge/dining area is open-plan, perfect for entertaining, with plenty of natural light. The main bedroom benefits from an en suite shower room and the apartment offers a storag..."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £18,099, plus we'll include flooring. Or, if you've got a home to sell before you move, we could be your guaranteed buyer with Part Exchange. T&Cs apply. Speak to a Sales ..."
A lower villa situated on an excellent corner plot in the much sought after and prestigious Inverleith district of the city perfectly positioned for access into Edinburgh City ...
FIXED PRICE - NO BIDDING WARS. UP TO 5% DEPOSIT INCENTIVE AVAILABLE. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available.
"Impressive 3rd floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms forming part of a prestigious Georgian A listed terrace, enjoying a quiet yet very convenient central location in the ..."
"An immaculately presented first floor flat, quietly tucked away in the popular Viewforth."
"Live an enviable beachfront lifestyle with this beautifully presented two-bedroom apartment situated directly on Portobello promenade, east of Edinburgh City Centre. Located on the second floor, the property boasts spectacular panoramic views of award-winning Portobello beach and the North Sea. W..."
"Light and beautifully presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace double upper villa, with a private garden, part of a modern 'colonies-style' residential development. Conveniently situated in the vibrant and sought-after Bellevue area, just north of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall, w..."
"A rare 1 bedroom apartment featuring vast ceiling heights at 3.4m, with south facing treeline views from the kitchen/living/dining area."
"A superb top floor flat with views of Edinburgh Castle in highly desirable Bruntsfield, close to excellent amenities and transport links.This generously proportioned top floor ..."
"Closing Date set for Wednesday 15th at 2pm - Situated on a quiet residential street just off bustling Bruntsfield, this two-bedroom second-floor flat offers exceptionally spacious accommodation in a fantastic location. Forming part of a traditional tenement, the property is brimming with period c..."
"An impressive and well-presented home, occupying a prime position in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic and leafy Dean Village. The two-bedroom contemporary property sits within a category B listed building designed by Robert Wilson in 1872 as the home of the Edinburgh School Board. "
"The Thurso is a four-bedroom detached family home. It features a lounge, separate dining room or playroom/office, open-plan kitchen/dining area with direct rear garden access, downstairs cloakroom, large first-floor landing with a window providing light, an en suite bedroom and a family bathroom."
"Recently reduced - Nestled on a charming, tranquil street in the heart of Joppa is this well-presented Victorian main door maisonette set over three levels with driveway and ..."
"The Erinvale is an attractive, 3-bedroom family home which benefits from a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and dining area, along with a SPACIOUS SEPARATE LIVING ROOM. The property's master bedroom features an EN SUITE and a Juliet balcony."
"The Lytham is a 3-bedroom family home which enjoys generous ground floor living accommodation and with an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a front-facing living room, and an en-suite shower room to bedroom 1."
"Immaculately presented first floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms and open aspect to the front, forming part of a prestigious traditional stone-built townhouse conversion, in ..."
"A bright and spacious four-bedroom, first floor apartment within a traditional B listed Georgian tenement building, situated in the highly desirable residential area of Newington within walking distance of a wide variety of local amenities and the City Centre. The property offers spacious accommo..."
"Located on a quiet cobbled street within the sought after Bruntsfield area of Edinburgh is this most impressive first floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building with secure entry system, there is a well maintained garden to the rear which is mainly laid to lawn. Offer..."
"The Balerno is a beautifully proportioned four-bedroom home with an internal garage and a large kitchen and utility area with outside access. The lounge has French doors that lead out to the garden and there's a spacious front-aspect dining room. Upstairs, bedroom one benefits from a large en suite."
"The Lismore is a four-bedroom detached home with a single integral garage. It features an under-stairs cupboard, lounge, kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden, utility room and cloakroom. Upstairs there's a storage cupboard, bedroom one with an en suite, and a family bathroom."
"Set on a quiet street in the heart of Comely Bank, moments from some of the city’s finest artisan shops, restaurants, cafes and bars is this spacious first floor apartment. ..."
" 13 3F1 Broughton Place is a nice top floor flat forming part of a Georgian tenement in the extremely desirable New Town district of Edinburgh. With access to excellent local amenities and right in the city centre, this is a fantastic flat in a great location.   Welcoming hall; generously proport..."
"Exciting opportunity to purchase this commercial unit, drive & additional yard with approved building warrant in place to create a three bedroom detached home in one of the most sought after districts in Edinburgh"
"17/7 Bridge Street is a stunning 2nd floor flat within a luxury, factored development, enjoying views across the Firth of Forth and towards Arthur Seat. Offered in exceptional ..."
Luxurious studio apartment at New Eidyn. Apt 15 is a beautifully crafted studio apartment finished to the highest standard with an impressive specification. This stunning studio apartment offers a beautiful open plan space above the hustle and bustle of Edinburgh’s streets. Resid...
A well-presented semi-detached villa situated within the highly desirable Corstorphine district of the city a short journey to the west of Edinburgh Centre.  The property ...
"Impressive two bedroom apartment in the Trinity area forming the ground and lower ground levels of an elegant original sandstone Victorian building with commanding seascape views across the Firth of Forth to Fife, immediate proximity to Granton Harbour and only 1.5 miles to the city centre. Close..."
Stunning contemporary apartment forming part of the iconic Playfair Building at Donaldson's
This super property enjoys enviable far-reaching views over the Firth of Forth and the East Lothian coastline. Situated on the ground floor with direct access to a large private ...
"A wonderful three-bedroom end-terraced townhouse set over three floors in the sought-after district of Liberton. Forming part of an exclusive development by David Wilson Homes, this superb property is an ideal family home. Boasting spacious accommodation throughout, modern finishes and offered to..."
"High spec apartment with a private terrace, reserve Plot 241 for 'Just The One' fee of £250*."
"Modern detached villa in peaceful cul de sac. This excellent family sized home comprises; hall, sitting room, dining room, conservatory, kitchen, downstairs wc, upstairs master bedroom with an en suite shower room, three further bedrooms and a family bathroom with a white three piece suite with a..."
"Nestled in popular Corstorphine, on an attractive residential street this highly sought-after traditional semi-detached bungalow enjoys a sunny aspect and internally, offers exceptionally spacious accommodation, that represents tremendous potential for further development; up into the attic and t..."
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this superbly presented, three-bedroom, first-floor flat to the market. The property forms part of a traditional tenement building in the popular Tollcross area, close to Edinburgh city centre."
"Neilsons are delighted to present to the market this well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached villa, situated in a quiet pocket of the much sought after district of ..."
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with gardens and a view of Edinburgh skyline. Located in the popular Oxgangs area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance porch provides space for outerwear and access to the carpeted stairs leading to the upper hall ..."
"Excellent terraced family home in high amenity area. The versatile accommodation is arranged over three levels and comprises; at garden level; sitting room, dining/family room, kitchen, bathroom with white three piece suite having a hand shower over the bath. Ground floor comprises; two double be..."
"Offering stylish city accommodation in the desirable Trinity district, just a stone’s throw from the water and within the Newhaven conservation area, 9/2 Craighall Road is a ..."
" Excellent Flat in a Sought After Location!!Carol Lawton and RE/MAX Property are delighted to offer to the market this superb 1st floor flat which is situated within a traditional tenement in the highly regarded area of Morningside. Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, box room/office area, dini..."
"2 Bedroom Apartment This luxury 2 bedroom apartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home. The Kirkwall features an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen with breakfast bar, family bathroom and two double bedrooms. Bedroom 1 features a fitted wardrobe alo..."
"Boyd Property are delighted to market this charming top floor flat, forming part of a traditional stone-built tenement building, situated in the much sought after Morningside area ..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this generously proportioned mid-terraced with private gardens, situated within the highly desirable area of Portobello, and within ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this exceptionally charming second/top floor flat, which forms part of a traditional Victorian terrace, enjoying a superb location ..."
"71 Joppa Road is a charming, bright and spacious 3 bedroom cottage, with a lovely and south facing rear garden in the highly regarded district of Joppa. The property is located within a short walk of the Promenade and Portobello High Street."
A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this substantial four bedroom seventh floor apartment situated in a modern harbour-front residential development in Granton. With ...
"This Category B-listed, three-bedroom apartment is found on a picturesque, cobbled street just off Stockbridge’s Raeburn Place. Now in need of modernisation, it will make a wonderful blank canvas for anyone looking to start their property journey or as an investment opportunity in the centr..."
"A delightful semi-detached house which benefits from a garage and a fully enclosed garden to the rear, situated in the sought after area of Duddingston. The property offers an ideal family home with potential for extension subject to obtaining the necessary consents. In brief the accommodation c..."
"Located within the sought after New Town area of Edinburgh is this beautifully presented first floor flat. With bright and spacious accommodation, the flat forms part of a B Listed Georgian building and benefits from gas central heating. The accommodation includes an entrance hallway ..."
"27 Pentland Gardens is a bright and spacious two-bedroom semi-detached bungalow with enclosed south-west facing garden and driveway, situated in the desirable Comiston and neighbouring Fairmilehead area. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and schools and is a convenient distanc..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this impressive and stylish two bedroom terraced home situated within a quiet pocket of the sought after area of Bellevue, close to ..."
"Umega are proud to offer for sale this fantastic two-bedroom apartment at Rowanbank Gardens, Gylemuir Road, Corstorphine brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. "
"The Huntly is designed as a comfortable family home. The front-aspect lounge is a spacious hub and connects to the bright kitchen/dining room, which opens onto the back garden. A functional lobby with utility space and WC is located just off the kitchen. Upstairs are two generous double bedrooms ..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Glencoe is an attractive 3-bedroom semi-detached home which benefits from an integral garage, and a master bedroom with en suite. West Edge Meadows is an exciting development of 3, 4 and 5-bedroom homes"
"This four-bedroom detached family home provides flexible living space. It features a lounge to the front with a triple window, open-plan kitchen/dining area with access to the garden and downstairs WC. There’s a large landing with a window, bedroom one has an en suite and there’s a family bathroom."
Bright and spacious top floor flat forming part of a traditional Victorian tenement situated in the heart of Leith close to The Shore and Ocean Terminal. The generously proportioned property has been sympathetically upgraded to move-in condition. It has a modern gas central heating system with a ...
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS – IT’S ENTIRELY YOUR CHOICE. WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £16,799, PLUS WE’LL INCLUDE FLOORING OR WARDROBES. The Huntly is designed as a comfortable family home. The front-aspect lounge is a spacious hub and connects to the brigh..."
"13a Scotland Street offers the opportunity to acquire an immaculate one-bedroom, main-door, lower ground apartment in a sought-after location of Edinburgh’s New Town. In turn-key condition, this charming Georgian property offers the best of both worlds with its sash and case windows and tra..."
An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this fantastic and rarely available one bedroom top floor flat with box room. Situated in a sought-after pocket of Bellevue close to ...
"Sitting on Ardmillan Terrace, where Gorgie and Dalry meet. Plot 18 is ideally positioned to take advantage of all these areas have to offer. This newly built ground floor flat lies within AMA’s Springwell development and has been designed with your practicality and comfort in mind. Internally t..."
"*CLOSING DATE SET FRIDAY 17TH MARCH AT 12PM* Enjoy a superb city centre lifestyle with this first floor three-bedroom apartment in sought-after Bellevue, bordering the iconic New Town. Located in a contemporary development with allocated parking space, it is well-presented and offers modern city ..."
"Beautifully presented semi detached villa offering ideal family sized accommodation. In move in condition, this lovely home comprises; hall, sitting room, dining room, conservatory, stylish fitted kitchen with white goods, three bedrooms, gorgeous bathroom with white three piece suite having a du..."
"Designed with modern living in mind, these stylish two-bedroom ground floor open-plan apartments have everything to offer."
A top floor duplex flat part of a traditional building situated within the vibrant Shore district of the city a short journey to the north-east of Edinburgh City Centre.  There ...
"**New Fixed Price** Enjoying stunning views of Arthur's Seat and Salisbury Crags, 24 (2F) Marchhall Crescent is a charming apartment which occupies the entire top floor of a converted Victorian terrace house, situated on a leafy residential street."
"2 Bedroom Apartment This fabulous 2 bedroom apartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home. The Bowmore features an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen, family bathroom and two double bedrooms. Bedroom 1 features a fitted wardrobe along with an en-suite."
"The downstairs features a bright and airy open-plan kitchen/dining room with a built in breakfast bar and access to the rear garden. You will also find a utility room, WC, and lounge area. Upstairs, you have two double bedrooms and an additional single bedroom with bedroom 1 benefiting from an en..."
"Set in a modern, manicured, luxury development surrounded by excellent amenities, quick transport links and vast open green and coastal walks is this immaculately presented second ..."
"Bright and spacious two-bedroom lower ground floor flat located in a modern development on St Stephen Street, a much sought-after location in Edinburgh’s Historic New Town. The property boasts a spacious sitting room with direct access onto a private paved terrace, dining kitchen, spacious ..."
"FIXED AT HOME REPORT VALUE Located within the highly sought after Stockbridge district of Edinburgh, St Stephen Street is a lovely street comprises traditional tenement buildings with an array of independent shops and bistros. We offer for sale this most attractive, bright and spaciou..."
"The Dunlop is a 4 bedroom modern living home over 3 storeys, ideally situated to growing families or professional couples"
This spacious and well presented terraced villa is situated within the popular South Gyle area close to excellent amenities and commuting links. The property is presented to the ...
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this attractive, 1 to 2 bedroom main door flat with private front and rear gardens. Located in Trinity, the property has many striking traditional features including ornate fireplaces, ceiling cornicing and wood flooring. Currently utilised as a on..."
"6 Marischal Place is a most attractive Upper Villa offering Two Double Bedrooms, with a private entrance, a large private south facing roof terrace and rear garden, located in the popular residential area of Blackhall, lying two and a half miles north west of Edinburgh city centre and close to ex..."
"Plot A0.04  is an impressive, low carbon, 2-bedroom, ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"(FULL LBTT PAID ON PURCHASE AT FULL FIXED PRICE!) Fabulous and rarely available three bed ground floor flat, occupying a prime position on this exclusive waterfront ..."
"This light and spacious, three-bedroom apartment forms part of the luxurious Platinum Point waterfront development in Newhaven, benefitting from panoramic views over the Firth of Forth to Berwick Law. Located on the sixth floor and presented to the market in immaculate condition, this well-propor..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £16,249, PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING.
OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. A bright, inviting hallway le..."
"Set on the first floor of a traditional building in Morningside, within the Plewlands conservation area, this well-proportioned flat comes with two double bedrooms, a spacious ..."
"Exceptionally light and spacious traditional top floor flat with lovely views to Arthur’s Seat, situated in a highly regarded area with great local amenities and transport ..."
"1 Howe Street is a fantastic top floor corner aspect flat in an enviable position within Edinburgh's prestigious New Town. With brand new boiler, newly fitted bathroom and kitchen together with access to prestigious Queen Street Gardens. Recently repainted and freshly decorated throughout this..."
20/1 East Suffolk Park is a spaciously presented ground floor two bedroom apartment which forms part of an historic “B” listed development quietly situated in the much ...
"Spacious and beautifully presented, two-bedroom, detached bungalow, with a garage and private gardens. Set in a quiet residential cul-de-sac with views of the Pentland Hills, located in the sought-after Swanston area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall has carpeted f..."
"Plot B1.03  is an impressive, low carbon, 2-bedroom 1st floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this appealing first floor flat which forms part of an elegant period terrace, located in the heart of Edinburgh’s ..."
Enjoying a wealth of original features along with bright and spacious rooms is this beautifully presented lower apartment. The property forms part of a traditional Victorian villa which has been converted into apartments sharing an entrance vestibule with stained glass arch window. There is gas...
"An attractive two bedroom, ground floor flat with private gardens."
"Situated in sought-after Comely Bank, this two-bedroom, third-floor flat enjoys a desirable setting in the capital, positioned within easy reach of amenities, schooling, transport links and fashionable Stockbridge. The home features spacious rooms which are finished in light neutral tones, all..."
A semi-detached bungalow situated within the popular Restalrig district of the city and a short journey to the east of Edinburgh City Centre.  There is a wide range of local ...
"This generously proportioned second floor flat forms part of an attractive gated conversion, enjoying a superb location on a peaceful residential street, located in the capitals ..."
"COMING SOON PLEASE REGISTER FOR LAUNCH INFORMATION Only 4 stunning two bedroom apartments. High specification and situated within the heart of Corstorphine village, close to Kirk Loan and the High Street. Contemporary open plan layouts. Must be viewed."
"This Traditional Property Lies Just A Stones Throw From The Meadows, with traditional features overlooking the tree lined street. "
"***LOVELY END TERRACED VILLA*** Carol Lawton and RE/MAX Property are delighted to offer for sale this spacious, end terraced house offering fantastic family accommodation in a highly sought after location. The property benefits from a delightful kitchen/diner and spacious lounge with large win..."
"This second-floor flat forms part of a contemporary development in desirable Leith and boasts immaculate interiors, a sociable open-plan living area, three bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, and a bathroom, and private, allocated parking space. The flat benefits from enviable close proximity to m..."
"The Leith is a superb four-bedroom detached family home. There's a spacious utility room, downstairs cloakroom, en suite master bedroom and a single garage. The large kitchen/dining area lends itself to family meals as well as entertaining friends, with french doors opening onto the rear garden."
"CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 16/03/23 @ 12 NOON This delightful semi-detached house is in excellent order throughout and benefits from a large, south-facing garden. A superb open ..."
"*NEW FIXED PRICE £10,000 BELOW VALUATION* Immaculately presented and spacious, one-bedroom, dual-aspect, first-floor apartment with a private patio terrace. Set in a modern, factored, exclusive residential development, located in the highly desirable Canonmills area, just north of Edinbu..."
"A delightful detached bungalow with driveway, garage and enclosed private garden, which enjoys lovely outlook towards the Pentland Hills and is situated in quiet street in established residential area. The property provides well proportioned accommodation over one floor and would now benefit fro..."
"Spacious and light two bedroom, second floor apartment within an original Victorian building, close to the Edinburgh University campus and Edinburgh College of Art. The property retains original features as well as commanding views of Bristo Square and the cityscape. Close to all amenities with..."
"Situated on the top floor of a Victorian tenement in Canonmills, this well-proportioned flat strikes the perfect blend of period charm and modern interiors and enjoying stunning ..."
"Ativa Property is delighted to present this superbly situated one-bedroom flat, located on the second floor of a traditional Victorian tenement. Set within Edinburgh's conservation area in the highly sought-after district of Stockbridge, this bright and airy flat is perfect for cosmopolitan livin..."
This rarely available bright and spacious period flat is located within a small well-kept stair comprising only four flats and enjoys an enviable position within the established ...
"CLOSING DATE:- WEDNESDAY, MARCH 15TH @ 12 PM - Particularly appealing semi-detached bungalow with private drive, car port and secluded south-facing back garden. Located in a quiet ..."
"Outstanding 3 bedroom first floor city centre flat in excellent move-in condition. Next to the new tram line, just a few hundred metres from St. James Quarter. Flexible third bedroom / home office. EPC rated C with sash double glazing and Council Tax Band C. Call Dunpark for a viewing."
Rarely available elevated ground floor flat with large private terrace in an exclusive modern development with underground parking and lift access. Spacious accommodation with two ...
"Beautifully presented two bedroom, main door lower villa in excellent order throughout with private front and rear gardens. The property is fully double glazed and has gas central heating, with a new boiler installed in 2022."
"Beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious, flexible two-bedroom, detached bungalow, with gardens, and a multi-vehicle driveway. A sought-after property type, set on a generous plot, in a family-orientated development in the Gilmerton area, south of Edinburgh city centre. A welcomin..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, four-bedroom, semi-detached house, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Clermiston area, northwest of the City Centre. A welcoming entrance hall has wood effect flooring extending throughout the majority of the ground floor, stairs leading to..."
"*MORE THAN £25,000 UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE*Located in desirable Liberton, this stone-built, semi-detached cottage exudes period charm with classically proportioned living space, retained period features, and a delightful walled garden. Enhanced by contemporary upgrades, the traditional three-bedr..."
"Enjoying lovely views, this spacious third floor flat forms part of a modern factored development sought-after district of Fettes, in the North of Edinburgh. The property is a short walk from Stockbridge and there are plenty of shops and local amenities nearby. For those that enjoy the outdoors, ..."
"Spacious and stylish one bedroom 1st floor apartment available in Cannonmills area with beautiful views over the water of Leith. This apartment has to be seen to fully appreciate all it has to offer. The open plan living area really has the wow factor. There is a beautiful, curved wall will larg..."
"An excellent opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented two-bedroom duplex apartment set over two floors of an impressive Victorian terrace in the heart of Bellevue, within walking distance to excellent local amenities, lying just north of Edinburgh City Centre."
Forming part of the exclusive Springwell development (AMA) this superb 1 bedroom first floor flat is located in the popular and convenient location of Ardmillan that lies on the ...
"9 Joppa Terrace is a stunning, 2 bedroom main door villa, situated on a quiet residential street in the highly desirable area of Joppa, a short walk from the Promenade and ..."
"Rarely available 3 bedroom penthouse flat with large west facing sun terrace, commanding a prime position on the much respected Strada developmentThis impressive executive style ..."
Les Sibbald and RE/MAX Property Marketing Centre are delighted to present to the market this stunning first floor tenement flat in the sought after district of Hillside in Edinburgh. This recently renovated apartment is in walk-in condition with fresh decor done to a high standard throughout. Ide...
"Tastefully presented, one-bedroom, second-floor flat, forming part of an impressive traditional stone-built tenement. Located in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Bruntsfield area, just south of the city centre. A welcoming entrance hall, with generous storage, showcases the richly-toned hardwoo..."
Neilsons are delighted to market this large tenement flat with many original features and carefully modernised to make this a great opportunity for any professional. The flat is ...
Well-Presented Two Bedroom Apartment - 2 Bathrooms - Open Plan Living/ Dining Room - Private Parking - Private Balcony - Central Location - Factored Development 
"A superb two-bedroom first floor flat within a modern factored development in the popular Dean Village. The property, which is presented in move-in condition provides spacious accommodation comprising, entrance hall with storage cupboard, a utility cupboard, large sitting dining room with window ..."
"This spacious and impressive traditional second floor flat, is situated within the heart of Morningside close to a host of excellent amenities and transport links. The property ..."
"Enjoy the best of modern living in this three-bedroom home which benefits from an open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. There’s a front-aspect lounge, utility, storage cupboard and WC. Upstairs, bedroom one is en suite and there's a bathroom and further storage."
"The Kearn is a three-bedroom detached family home with a single integral garage. The ground floor has a lounge, kitchen/dining room and convenient WC. The first floor features a storage cupboard, master bedroom with en suite and a fitted cupboard, two further bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"The Dunblane features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors opening into the garden and a separate lounge. There’s also a WC and two storage cupboards. Upstairs there are three bedrooms, including a large bedroom one with en suite, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
**UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE** RARELY AVAILABLE 2 BED MODERN FLAT IN POPULAR DEVELOPMENT WALK IN CONDITION AND ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. GCH & DG. 
"Set on a quiet, tree-lined street in the heart of Marchmont, moments from The Meadows, excellent amenities and the university quarter is this traditional top floor Victorian ..."
"Open Viewing Sunday 1-3pm. Enjoying spectacular views of the Pentland Hills, this stunning townhouse is situated in a modern development in the residential district of Longstone, in the South-West of Edinburgh. Longstone offers a variety of local shops, amenities, local schools and is ideally..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious, three-bedroom, three-storey, southerly facing, mid-terrace townhouse, with a garden. Part of a modern factored residential development, located in the Longstone area, west of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall features a built-in cloak cupboard, and gi..."
PLOT 42 AT SPRINGWELL HOUSE IS A LOVELY AND BRIGHT ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT ON THE SECOND FLOOR WITH A PRIVATE CAR PARKING SPACE. SPRINGWELL WILL BE AMA’S NEWEST EDINBURGH RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT.
"Surrounded by excellent local amenities, quick transport links and moments from The Botanic Gardens and the Water of Leith Walkway is this immaculately presented second floor ..."
Modern One Bedroom Retirement Property in Edinburgh's Popular Area of Morningside
"This two-bedroom semi-detached villa is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac within the popular residential area of Craigentinny. It offers fantastic potential for a first time buyer or investor to create their dream property. With private front and rear gardens, along with a conservatory and close to ..."
"1/3 Dunbar's Close is a well-presented two-bedroom first floor flat with stunning views towards Calton Hill, situated on the Royal Mile within the historic Old Town. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding areas. ..."
"Enjoying a highly-desirable city centre address with far-reaching leafy views, this two-bedroom second-floor flat lies within a modern development, offering secure private parking and situated within walking distance of Princes Street and Stockbridge’s delightful shopping area. The bright, south-..."
"Located in the a popular modern development in the heart of Craiglockhart. This generous two bedroom second floor flat in quiet, leafy surroundings benefits from an allocated private parking space and well-kept residents gardens. "
"A centrally located and well-presented two-bedroom top floor flat, with two large balconies in an established modern development. The property is ideally located for access to Haymarket, the City Centre and the West End and represents an ideal opportunity for both owner occupiers and investors al..."
"This impressive, well presented penthouse apartment on the 6th floor forms part of the desirable modern Britannia Quay development with allocated parking space within the secure ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this excellent two bedroom main door lower villa well situated within a quiet residential pocket of the much sought after ...
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this fantastic three bed flat ideally placed for swift access to the city centre. With generous living space this property would be ...
"A charming, newly refurbished first floor flat forming part of a substantial semi-detached villa situated in sought after location of Trinity."
"The two bedroom VERMONT boasts an OPEN DESIGN in the living room, with INTEGRATED STAIRCASE. There's a useful cupboard as well as a built-in wardrobe in the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM. The second bedroom could also become a useful home office."
A main door flat situated within the vibrant Polwarth district of the city perfectly positioned for access into Edinburgh City Centre and close to a wide range of local ...
"Charming two-bedroom ground floor apartment set in a traditional tenement building in a quiet cul-de-sac, superbly situated in a high amenity area convenient for the central ..."
Situated in the highly popular Urban Eden development is this most impressive duplex with great views to Arthur seat. With gas central heating and full double glazing the property offers bright and spacious contemporary living with specious terrace. The accommodation includes an entrance hallw...
Located in an exclusive residential development in Edinburgh’s Newhaven district is this luxury 2 bedroom apartment
Bright and Spacious Third Floor Apartment - Lift Access - Southernly Aspect and Castle Views - 2 Double Bedrooms - 2 Bathrooms (1En Suite) - Sitting Room - Kitchen - Residents' Parking - Excellent Storage
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this spacious two-bedroom apartment to the market. The property lies on the edge of Holyrood Park and enjoys fantastic views towards Arthur's Seat. Internally, the property is well presented and offers 80m² of thoughtfully designed living space. The property'..."
"Well presented, light and spacious first floor flat, forming part of a traditional tenement and located within one of the city's most desirable residential areas. This lovely ..."
"2 Bedroom Apartment This spacious 2 bedroom apartment is perfect for those looking to move to an energy-efficient, low-maintenance home. The Arinagour features an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen, family bathroom and two double bedrooms. Bedroom 1 features a fitted wardrobe."
"Rarely available upper mews flat with private garage, forming part of a mature, well established modern development and located in a very popular and convenient residential ..."
"A 1 bedroom newly developed, luxurious apartment in the heart of Edinburgh. The apartment situated at York Place form part of a charming B listed building, located right in the heart of Edinburgh. The building has undergone an extensive refurbishment by developers, Allanton Capital, resulting in..."
"With 3 bedrooms and a sociable lounge diner, the semi-detached Bryce is perfect if you're looking for a little extra space."
"Rarely available fully serviced building plot with Planning Permission and building warrants for a two-storey house of individual design. One of just five properties within a gated community this home can be built in a bespoke fashion with many options available, designed to suit your own familie..."
"Closing date set for Thursday 16th March 2023 at 12.00pm.This impressive two-bedroom apartment is located on the top floor of a traditional stone-built tenement in Edinburgh’s leafy Morningside. Set in a peaceful street just off Morningside Road, it has been tastefully decorated to provide ..."
"This beautifully presented first floor flat forms part of a popular modern development, situated within the highly sought-after Orchard Brae district. Perfectly placed, the property is a short distance to the city centre, excellent local amenities, the renowned Erskine Stewarts Melville Sc (cont.)"
"Fixed price £5,000 under the Home Report valuation. Set in a handsome tenement within easy reach of the city centre is this spacious third floor apartment currently ..."
"Offering bright and spacious accommodation, including four bedrooms, a generous living room, a dining kitchen, and two bathrooms, this semi-detached house is tucked in a quiet cul- de-sac in Duddingston (near Fort Kinnaird) and is accompanied by front and rear gardens and unrestricted on-street p..."
"This unique and characterful, three-bedroom, second-floor apartment forms part of an early nineteenth-century, B-listed building. The home features bright and spacious ..."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this lovely two bed flat ideally placed for swift access to the city centre. Freshly decorated and carpeted the property is in turn ...
"Sylvia @ McDougall McQueen is delighted to present to the market this rarely available, bright and spacious three bedroom traditional top floor flat with stunning period features. Located in a much sought after residential area of Trinity, within walking distance of excellent day to day amenities..."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this charming and immaculately presented link-detached stone-built cottage, situated in the beautiful grounds of Southfield House in the popular residential district of Liberton, in the South of Edinburgh. Liberton offers easy access to local shops, ameni..."
McDougall McQueen present to the market this fabulous and rarely available one bedroom top floor flat forming part of a handsome Georgian building with access to the private roof garden from the attic room. The property is ideally located the heart of Edinburgh’s fashionable New Town distri...
"Open Viewing Sunday 2-4pm. This charming and rarely available link-detached villa is quietly situated in a cul-de-sac in the popular and established district of Gilmerton, in the South of Edinburgh. The property is within easy reach of a range of shops, local amenities and local schools. The..."
Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this three-bedroom top-floor apartment to the market. The property forms part of a small and highly regarded modern development and is present to the market in 'walk-in' condition.
Located towards the end of a no through road in the sought after Slateford area of Edinburgh is this well presented semi-detached house. Houses are rarely available to the market in this area and therefore early internal viewing is essential. Located on a corner set plot the property ...
"Set in the heart of Portobello, moments from the beach, promenade and excellent local artisan cafes, restaurants and bars is this spacious first floor apartment. The property ..."
"20 Badger Way is an immaculately presented End Terraced Townhouse offering Four Bedrooms, private gardens and a private driveway, set within a popular modern residential development close to Liberton, with excellent local amenities in the vicinity and offering easy access to the City Centre and C..."
"*Fixed Price - £10,000 below Home Report *Located in sought-after Trinity, this first floor flat is a wonderful residence for city professionals, couples, and small families ..."
"Are you looking for a bit of peace and tranquillity in your new home?  Then look no further, this converted Church in Bruntsfield will serve you well "
"Set in a quiet, exclusive development built by Cala Homes, surrounded by manicured communal grounds, excellent amenities, quick transport links and vast open green spaces is this ..."
**Video Tour Available** A bright and spacious 2-bedroom flat set in the heart of the city centre. Entered on the first floor from a communal stair the property boasts a spacious open plan Kitchen/living room. Two spacious double bedrooms and separate WC and shower room. The...
BUY TO LET | VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE 116 (3F1) Rose Street South Lane is a fantastic opportunity to secure an investment offering a strong yield in the City Centre of Edinburgh 
"** Fixed Price ** Spacious and well-presented, two-bedroom, second floor flat forming part of a traditional yet converted, factored, residential development, located in the quiet cul-de-sac in the area of Slateford, lying west of Edinburgh city centre. The spacious entrance hall gives access thr"
"A beautiful Victorian two bedroom property, located in the heart of Edinburgh's City Centre with direct access to a shared rear garden."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £14,199 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
This two-bedroom apartment feat..."
"The Salisbury is an impressive first floor apartment featuring lift access and a secure entry-door system.
You are welcomed into the apartment through an L-shaped hallway which leads to the open-plan living space and a private outdoor terrace area.
Both bedrooms are double with fitted wardrobes f..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this appealing first floor flat, which forms part of a handsome period building, enjoying a fantastic high amenity location in the ..."
"Owen Auskerry of Purplebricks offers this this charming, beautifully presented second floor flat which forms part of a distinctive C-Listed building by Charles Kinnear dating from 1866 in a superbly centralised location facing Usher Hall. The property benefits from many well maintained tradition..."
"Two Bed Top Floor Art Deco Flat with Balcony and Superb Views Over the HillsLocated close to all the amenities of Morningside, this 1930’s two bed top floor flat has lots of ..."
"New Fixed Price - £10,000 below Home Report Value! Positioned on the top floor of a handsome traditional building in the heart of the highly soughtafter Newington area ..."
"Extended end terraced villa requiring modernisation. Set opposite Holyrood Park close to an excellent choice of amenities, this versatile family home offers great potential and comprises; entrance vestibule, hall with two storage cupboards, twin windowed sitting room, breakfasting kitchen, downst..."
"The subject of sale forms a delightfully charming second floor fully modernised two bedroom flat, which has been tastefully decorated and finished to a high standard throughout ..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Mid-Terrace Family Home
Yopa Edinburgh are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic 4 bedroom townhouse in a sought after area. Early Viewing Advised!!
"Recently changed to a Fixed Price at Home Report valuation.This bright and spacious first floor flat is ideal for the 1st or 2nd time purchaser or for a discerning landlord looking for a perfect investment flat, situated in one of Edinburgh’s most popular residential areas benefitting from ..."
"Purplebricks present this superb opportunity to purchase this extended three bedroom, semi-detached villa offering spacious family accommodation on two storeys. Located in a quiet cul-de-sac in Edinburgh's residential Northfield district, east of the city centre this is ready for some renovation ..."
A fabulous top floor flat part of the old converted Barnton Hotel (“C” listed building built in 1895) in the prestigious Barnton district of the City. Converted by ...
A perfect family home in move in condition. 
"Located within the popular Comiston area of Edinburgh is this most attractive and well-presented top floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building, the flat has sash and case double glazed windows and electric night storage heaters. The accommodation includes an entrance..."
"An impressive two-bedroom upper villa enoying true walk-in condition and a modern interior design, completed to exceptional standards."
"Maloco and Associates are delighted to bring this upgraded, four bedroom flat offering flexible accommodation and fantastic aspects. Located within a residential cul-de-sac the property will suit a range of buyers including young professionals and those with growing families due to the flexibl..."
"Set in the cosmopolitan and vibrant Tollcross district of central Edinburgh, is a recently refurbished one bedroom main door flat set on a traditional Victorian street that operates a one way traffic system and is consequently quiet. "
"Three-bedroom end terrace house with private front, side and rear gardens along with a detached, private garage found in this wonderful residential area in Craigentinny."
Fully converted and upgraded 1-bed mews apartment in Edinburgh's trendy West End with easy access to Haymarket Station and a short walk to Lothian Road. Fantastic investment for short-term & long-term landlords or; as buy to live in.
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,799 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. Speak to a Sales Adviser for fu..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,799 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE.
The Roxburgh is a two bedroom a..."
"Light and tastefully presented, three-bedroom, second-floor apartment, set in a modern, factored residential development. Located in the Abbeyhill area close to Holyrood Park, lying to the east of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall gives access throughout the property, and f..."
A beautiful and bright and sunny two double bedroom apartment located on the ground floor with private parking. A modern well-presented two double bedroom apartment located within the desirable Stockbridge-Comely Bank neighbourhood. The property is located on the ground level within a fully fac...
"Open viewing Sunday 2-4pm. Forming part of a cul-de-sac setting, this light and airy semi detached villa is situated within the sought after residential area of Swanston. The property is close to an abundance of excellent amenities at Straiton Retail Park with the City Bypass on the doorstep ..."
"This delightful three-bedroom end-terraced house lies within a contemporary development in Newcraighall, a suburb popular for its excellent transport links and local amenities. ..."
" Characterized by outstanding proportions and a wealth of flexible accommodation, this traditional third floor tenement flat represents an exciting opportunity to acquire a period home with fabulous views. The flat has retained a selection of charming original features, including ornate ..."
"Situated in the popular residential area of Newington, this is a well-presented traditional three-bedroom apartment. On the second floor of a stone-built tenement the accommodation is bright and spacious with an appealing neutral décor and original period features. Its proximity to the University..."
"This lovely home has been finished to a good standard throughout and provides comfortable and stylishly presented living space which would make an ideal home for a couple or family and has the added attraction of an enclosed, child friendly rear garden. EPC - C COUNCIL TAX - D"
Most impressive extended semi-detached villa offering superb familysized accommodation and a south facing rear garden in a prime location close to excellent amenities.This is a ...
"Third/top-floor flat forming part of a handsome, traditional tenement building in Corstorphine with wonderful far-reaching views, enjoying two bedrooms, an open-plan living area, and a contemporary kitchen and bathroom, plus access to a shared garden and unrestricted on-street parking. Close to s..."
"This well proportioned second floor flat forms part of a traditional tenement, within the sought after area of Polwarth, within easy reach of the City Centre, excellent local amenities and transport links. EPC rating = C Council Tax Band = C"
A well-presented two-bedroom apartment in a popular modern development in Canonmills. This home off ers bright and comfortable accommodation with a fresh neutral décor. In move-in condition it boasts picturesque views of the Water of Leith and St Marks Park as well as a lift and residents ...
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this rarely available two bedroom end terrace house benefiting from generous garden grounds to rear, driveway and a single garage. The property requires upgrading to realise its full potential. EPC rating = E Council tax band = E"
"This is an attractive and extended semi-detached family home with four bedrooms, private gardens, conservatory and superbly located in the popular Brunstane area. EPC = D COUNCIL TAX = D"
"Tastefully presented and rarely available, one-bedroom, ground-floor garden flat, forming part of a traditional stone-built tenement. Conveniently located in the vibrant and fashionable area of Canonmills, adjacent to Stockbridge just to the north of Edinburgh city centre. The hall gives acces..."
"Enjoy a desirable coastal location with this three-bedroom third floor flat in Edinburgh’s sought-after Portobello area. In the heart of the bustling high street and only minutes from Portobello beach, this traditional tenement property offers a warm neutral décor and well-presented spacious acco..."
"Open Viewings Sunday 2-4.   A seldom available, yet highly desirable Colonies flat, this two-bedroom main door lower villa enjoys a tranquil setting, in the popular Shandon Colonies, close to lovely Harrison Park. Approached via a cobbled lane the property sits behind a white picket gate and sunn..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £13,549 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FU..."
"A wonderfully spacious and bright top floor flat, ideally located within easy reach of Edinburgh City Centre. This beautiful property is flooded with natural light and retains a wealth of character features including intricate cornicing, original wooden flooring and feature fires. The accommodati..."
"Rarely available, beautifully presented and spacious, two-bedroom basement flat with a private patio garden. Forming part of an impressive and unique grade A listed stone-built tenement, Pilrig area, by Leith Walk, north of Edinburgh city centre. A vestibule entrance is accessed via ..."
"An immaculately presented, one bedroom, ground-floor apartment forming part of a factored and lift serviced development, in the sought after Fountainbridge area of Edinburgh, lying south of the city centre."
"Set on a quiet, leafy cul-de-sac with private parking this spacious property neighbours a local nature reserve and offers the charm of a small village feel, whilst also ..."
"Recently gone to fixed price £5k under value. Beautifully presented terraced villa, extended to the rear to create a lovely home of immense appeal, forming part of a ..."
"This stunning second floor flat sits quietly within a charming landscaped development in the popular district of Blackhall. The property is presented in true move in condition with high quality fixtures and fittings and benefits from a single garage, gas central heating and new double glazing. ..."
"Stunning 2 bedroom Apartment, a stone throw from the Royal Mile"
"This well-presented, main-door, two bedroom property enjoys an enviable location in the popular area of Newington within walking distance to Commonwealth Pool and iconic Arthur's Seat and the excellent amenities that come with city center living. The accommodation comprises; bright and sp..."
A very well presented main door lower villa set within a highly sought after residential area which is set close to amenities and very well placed for commuting. The property benefits from gas central heating and has double glazing. Externally there are well maintained gardens as wel...
"1 / 4 Hunter Square is an extremely well-presented top floor flat with the added benefit of owning the roof void above, possibly creating the opportunity to develop the property subject to obtaining the necessary permissions. Conveniently located in the heart of Edinburgh’s historic Old Town dist..."
"The Newington is a great option with three bedrooms and an integral garage. The lounge opens out onto the garden and has room for a dining table, the kitchen has garden access, there’s a downstairs WC and storage space. The master bedroom has an en-suite, there's a family bathroom and more storage."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this stunning ground floor studio flat to the market. The property occupies a prime position off Fettes Row in Edinburgh's sought after New Town. Presented in excellent order, making it ideal for both owner/occupiers and buy to let investors, it would also ma..."
"Situated in the popular Northfield area of the city, this end of terrace three-bedroom villa, offers a fabulous family home, with easy-to-maintain outdoor space. A front door opens into a small hallway, with stairs leading up to the first floor. On the left is a bright lounge and dining room, enj..."
FIXED PRICE - NO BIDDING WARS. GROUND FLOOR. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request.
"*FIXED £13K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE* A tasteful and immaculately presented two-bedroom lower villa flat, situated in the sought after residential area of Chesser."
"A bright and spacious, two bedroom, ground floor flat, set within a well maintained mid-century development, with communal garden areas, residents parking and private single ..."
"Stunning one bedroom property, with study, available in the Cannonmils area with beautiful views of Edinburgh Castle. A well proportioned, recently renovated third floor flat situated in a traditional tenement located in a quiet street in the sought after area of Comely Bank. The living room i..."
"This one-bedroom lower-ground floor flat forms part of a handsome, C-listed Victorian building in exclusive Stockbridge, within the New Town conservation area, and is sure to appeal to first-time buyers, city professionals, couples, and rental investors alike. The flat is ideally situated for e..."
"Boasting views across to Fife a rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this fantastic three bedroom semi-detached new home, with a fully enclosed rear garden and private ..."
"Forming part of a traditional tenement, this attractive and spacious first floor flat, which has recently been renovated is located within the high amenity area of Easter Road. There are an abundance of excellent amenities within walking distance with the City Centre a short distance away. In mov..."
"Purplebricks are proud to present this bright and well-proportioned ground floor flat situated in a highly centralised location. Close to Edinburgh University in the ever-popular district of Newington, to the south of Edinburgh City Centre, the property is close to a wealth of amenities includin..."
Beautifully presented and well-proportioned 3rd floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms forming part of a traditional building situated in the sought-after Morningside area.This ...
"Immaculately presented and spacious, south-facing, modern, four-bedroom, semi-detached house, with gardens and a private driveway. Located in the established residential area of West Pilton, northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A bright entrance hall, with a modern WC, leads into a sunny, south..."
"Beautifully presented ground floor apartment with 2 double bedrooms, forming part of a traditional tenement in a most convenient location.This bright and generously-proportioned ..."
"Enjoying lovely views of the Pentland Hills, this stylish semi-detached villa is located in the residential district of Longstone, in the South-West of Edinburgh. Longstone offers a variety of local shops, amenities, local schools and is ideally placed for Edinburgh College and Napier University'..."
"Beautifully presented one bed first floor apartment forming part of a tucked away cul-de-sac development with mature communal gardens, close to the scenic Water of Leith Walkway, ..."
"Spacious, two-bedroom, dual-aspect, first-floor flat with a private balcony, set on a residential street, located in the Inverleith area, to the north of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall serves each room within the property, has a secure entry phone handset, a storage cupboard and mode..."
Neilsons are delighted to present to market this well-proportioned three bedroom terraced house situated within a quiet residential pocket of the popular Drum Brae district of ...
"Simply beautiful 1st floor corner flat, located within a three storey building, forming part of the Cala Homes Grovewood Hill development, and located close to super amenities, ..."
"£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION. A superb and rarely available ground floor flat with residents parking and direct access from the sitting room, kitchen and master bedroom to well maintained communal gardens. Ideally located in popular modern development off Slateford Road, which i..."
"Set on a quiet, leafy street, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links, Portobello beach and vast open green spaces is this immaculate end terraced house. Boasting ..."
*VIRTUAL TOUR* Modern semi-detached two-bedroom bungalow with private gardens and garage. Ideal for first / second time movers and for those looking to downsize into something with plenty of storage and private gardens.
5/3 Brunstane Road North is a bright and spacious ground floor flat situated within a few minutes' walk from Portobello beach. The accommodation comprises: entrance stairwell; ...
"FIXED PRICE, NO BIDDING WAR. Luxurious APARTMENT in an excellent CITY LOCATION. DESIGNER KITCHEN & BATHROOMS. Spacious OPEN PLAN LIVING. Optional UNDERGROUND PARKING. ON-SITE GYM & FITNESS SUITE available on request."
"Forming part of a B listed building, this charming ground floor flat is located in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the city centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities and is conveniently located for many Universit..."
"Traditional two double bedroom tenement flat, set in the heart of Edinburgh's historical Old Town. *£10k Below HR* *Potential long term rental £1,225pm, 5.55% Yield, based on the fixed price* *Short term rental value between £125-£450 depending on the..."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £13,199 plus we'll include flooring. Speak to a Sales Adviser for full details.
The Ayton is a two bedroom apartment offering a bright and flexible space designed for moder..."
"This spacious two bedroom apartment is conveniently placed for commuters and those looking to live within easy-reach of the city's amenities. The Gilmour features an open-plan living, dining and kitchen area, creating the perfect space for entertaining and there is also plenty of storage space th..."
"Property number 48386.
An Attractive First Floor Apartment Within A Small Modern Development Adjacent To Holyrood Park And Convenient For Shopping, Services & Transport Links "
Yates Hellier are delighted to bring this second floor flat within an early 18th century A-listed building to the market. Set right in the heart of the historic old town close to all the central attractions and amenities. Fleshmarket Close runs between Cockburn Street and the Royal Mile. The prop...
"This well proportioned and beautifully presented main door apartment forms part of an impressive modern block, situated on an established and sought-after development in the ..."
"Spacious and superior two-bedroom ground floor apartment, offered chain-free, within an attractive and established modern development with landscaped grounds and ample ..."
"An opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunning two-bedroom upper flat in a highly desirable, central location just a stone’s throw away from Leith Links. Ideal for ..."
"Well presented, four-bedroom, mid-terrace, converted farm cottage over two levels with a private garden. Located in the popular Newcraighall area, to the southeast of Edinburgh. The entrance vestibule opens up into the hall which provides access throughout the majority of the ground floor incl..."
Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached
***20K UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE*** Enjoying a secluded position tucked away at the end of a quiet road is this most impressive ground and lower ground maisonette flat. Forming part of an imposing B listed house which dates back to around 1800 and then converted to four flats in the 198...
"Two bedroom second floor apartment, offering private balcony with open views onto Calton Hill, located in the historic Old Town."
Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate two bed flat in the heart of Ardmillan. In turn key condition with a fantastic attic space that is the perfect ...
"Plot D0.03  is an impressive, low carbon, 1 bedroom ground floor apartment within the groundbreaking Rowanbank Gardens development brought to you by award-winning Artisan Real Estate. MARKETING SUITE NOW OPEN"
"This exceptionally spacious ground floor apartment forms part of a small modern development in the popular district of Bonnington, within walking distance of both the city centre ..."
"93/6 Milton Road East in a well presented, bright and generously proportioned second floor apartment, located in the popular residential district of Joppa. Forming part of a well ..."
"Well proportioned and a sunny, top (3rd) floor flat offers a truly outstanding location. Nestled in a idyllic dell setting near the Water of Leith, in much sought-after Roseburn, ..."
"Re/max Scotland are delighted to present to the market this immaculate two bed top floor apartment in the Trinity area of Edinburgh, north of the city centre. Set within a modern factored development with south facing views The top floor accommodation comprises: Entrance hall with solid woo..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,999 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. This spacious apartment features two double bedrooms, the main featuring an en suite shower room. In the open-plan living space you w..."
"A well-presented, two bedroom, fourth floor, lift served apartment with allocated garaged parking space situated within the desirable Britannia Quay development adjacent to Ocean Terminal. Ideal for first / second time movers or those looking to downsize"
"McDougall McQueen present to the market this bright and spacious two bedroom second (top) floor apartment forming part of a small modern, factored development (2007) boasting a superb corner site with a lovely southern aspect towards the Pentland Hills. The property is ideally located in the soug..."
"Part of a sought-after development in prestigious Morningside, this two-bedroom first-floor flat enjoys a highly desirable position in the capital, set within easy reach of ..."
"Immaculately presented, three-bedroom, mid-terrace home, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Prestonfield area, just south of Edinburgh city centre, with views of Arthur's Seat. A welcoming entrance hall, with storage, is finished with the light neutral decor and stylish w..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious, three-bedroom, mid-terrace house, with a driveway and gardens. Located in The Inch, a popular area, south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall affords access to the public rooms and the stairway to the upper hall, and features solid oak flooring exten..."
"Boasting panoramic sea views over Granton harbour this two bedroom, dual-facing fourth floor apartment with private balcony is moments from excellent local amenities and quick ..."
40/5 Dalmeny Street is an appealing second-floor flat lying in Edinburgh’s bustling Leith district. The flat enjoys a delightful blend of contemporary decor and classic ...
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,749, PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. SPEAK TO A SALES ADVISER FOR FULL DETAILS.
The Ayton is a two bedroom apartment offering a bright and flexible space designed for mode..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,699 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. Located in Block 2, this apartment features two double bedrooms. You'll benefit from a spacious, open-plan lounge/dining area offering..."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £12,649 plus we'll include flooring.
Located in Block 2, this ground floor apartment features two double bedrooms. You'll benefit from a spacious, open-plan lounge/dining a..."
"Thoughtfully designed, the family-friendly Maybury has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a spacious lounge and a handy storage cupboard. The first floor boasts three good-sized bedrooms - bedroom one benefits from an en suite - and a family bathroom."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £12,549 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. OR, IF YOU'VE GOT A HOME TO SELL BEFORE YOU MOVE, WE COULD BE YOUR GUARANTEED BUYER WITH PART EXCHANGE. THE AYTON IS A TWO BEDROOM APA..."
"This spacious second floor apartment forms part of an impressive modern block, enjoying a fantastic location on the banks of The Forth and boasting spectacular open views over ..."
"Two Bed End Terraced House on Large Corner Plot, Now Requiring Upgrading.  Fantastic opportunity to acquire this super property with plenty of development potential to turn it ..."
Spacious One Bedroom Flat In Edinburgh's Highly Sought after Morningside
"Neilsons are delighted to offer onto the market this exceptionally appealing top floor flat, which forms part of a charming period building, enjoying a spectacular central ..."
"Lots of character, stylish fittings and generous sized living space are provided within this traditional one bedroom flat plus box room, superbly positioned to easily access a ..."
"Set in the heart of Edinburgh's prestigeous New Town, 8c/1 Abercromby Place is a delightful lower ground apartment, forming part of an attractive Georgian building and ..."
"This generously proportioned ground floor flat is situated within the popular district of Bonnington, close to exceptional local amenities and within easy reach of the city centre ..."
This superb semi-detached house offers well-proportioned accommodation in a peaceful residential location close to superb amenities and transport links. Offered for sale in good ...
This deceptively spacious mid-terraced house offers excellent family accommodation in a peaceful residential location. The property is in easy walking distance of superb local ...
"This luxury ground-floor apartment for over 50s is part of a deluxe conversion of the iconic Barnton Hotel a C-listed nineteenth-century villa (1895) that is an important landmark, with unique architecture, a pagoda tower, and a sandstone ashlar fadde. Finished to high standards throughout, th..."
*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* Apartment 47 benefits a southerly aspect making this a lovely one bedroom bright apartment located on the second floor
Spacious Two Bedroom Flat In Meadowbank With a Desirable Outlook
"Enjoying fantastic views, this pleasant top (third) floor flat is located in a modern development in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, Newington is a convenient location offering an excellent selection of local shops, restaurants ..."
"Most impressive three bed terraced villa enjoying a peaceful cul-de-sac setting within a mature, well-established development, well placed for an excellent range of amenities and ..."
"Forming part of a modern development with exclusive parking space and well maintained grounds is this bright and spacious top floor flat. Offering well-presented accommodation, the flat has electric heating and double glazed windows. The accommodation includes an entrance hallway an..."
"Beautifully presented mid terrace villa with three bedrooms, forming part of Barratt's Greenacre development, enjoying an extremely convenient location, close to a good range of amenities and excellent transport links. This bright and well-proportioned home is offered to the market in excellent d..."
‘Period top floor tenement flat with sunny aspect beside Murieston Park’
"This attractive and well presented end-terraced with fantastic private garden forms part of an established modern development within the sought after area of The Wisp, close to ..."
"**FIXED 5K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE** Offering beautifully presented accommodation is this well proportioned third floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building the flat has gas central heating, double glazed windows and lovely views to Salisbury Crags. The acc..."
"Constitution Street is a well-presented and spacious, four bedroom top floor flat, located in the heart of the fashionable Shore area of Leith. Within a short walk of excellent ..."
"This traditional third/top-floor tenement flat lies in popular Tollcross: a bustling central area close to the Meadows with excellent transport links and local amenities for shopping and entertainment. The appealing city home includes two bedrooms, and benefits from shared garden access."
"Bright South facing property situated in the highly desirable district of Barnton, close to excellent amenities and commuting links, 47 Lyle Court forms part of an exclusive ..."
"Two bedroom ground floor flat forming part of an established residential development in the heart of Morningside, Edinburgh. This will appeal to a variety of buyers with it being ideally located for a host of local amenities and excellent transport links. Entered via a communal hallway by ..."
"Boyd Property are delighted to market this bright, well-proportioned two-bedroom first floor flat, forming part of an established block within the ever-popular area of Newington, ..."
"Charming 2nd floor flat enhanced by fine period features and natural wood finishes, forming part of a red sandstone tenement, located in a popular and convenient residential ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer on to the market this immaculately presented first floor apartment which forms part of a well-kept purpose-built block, enjoying a superb high ..."
"Light, spacious and well planned 1st floor flat, forming part of a traditional tenement and located in a highly regarded residential area.This appealing property offers ..."
"Located within leafy suburb of Morningside, Edinburgh, Yopa delightfully announce this stunning Traditional Main Door Flat which commands immediate inspection"
"New Fixed Price - This rarely available main door flat is located in the sought after district of Bruntsfield, in the South of Edinburgh. The property is close to a wide range of highly regarded amenities and recreational facilities and is within walking distance of the city centre. There are exc..."
"Two-bedroom, mid-terrace house with private front and rear gardens. Situated in the well-established and popular residential Buckstone area of south Edinburgh "
"Offering bright and spacious accommodation is this second floor flat. Located in the sought after Newington area, the property forms part of a traditional tenement building and includes gas central heating and double glazing. The accommodation includes a welcoming entrance hallway wit..."
"We could pay towards your mortgage, deposit or help with your moving & running costs - you choose! We could contribute up to £12,449 plus we'll include flooring. Speak to a Sales Adviser for full details.
This spacious apartment features two double bedrooms, the main featuring an en suite shower ..."
The 2 bedroom Andrew is a perfect home for first-time buyers with its well-proportioned interior.
"1 Bedroom Apartment This contemporary one bedroom apartment is ideal for first time buyers with an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen, bathroom and double bedroom with a fitted wardrobe."
"Set in the heart of Newington, surrounded by excellent local amenities. Quick transport links and close to the main university buildings is this immaculately presented ground ..."
An exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this beautifully presented two-bedroom flat forming part of a traditional tenement in the highly desirable Leith area of ...
"A rarely available opportunity has arisen to acquire this immaculatelypresented, three bedroom terraced family home boasting a private rear garden in the popular Wisp area of ..."
"Enjoying a leafy setting in sought-after Corstorphine, this stylish two-bedroom first-floor flat forms part of a prestigious development with attractive communal gardens and allocated parking. Perfect for professionals and young families, the appealing home also includes a spacious open-plan livi..."
"Set in the heart of fashionable Leith, moments from excellent artisan cafes, bars and restaurants and within easy walking distance of the city centre is this spacious first floor ..."
"Particularly appealing 1930s main door upper villa, enviably located in the sought-after area of Craiglockhart, set on a quiet no-through road, with unrestricted on street ..."
"Attractive ground floor flat, enjoying a prime position overlooking lovely landscaped gardens and located within an extremely popular residential area.This light and spacious ..."
"This wonderfully light two-bedroom apartment occupies the third floor of a B-listed Georgian tenement and benefits from a south-west facing aspect. Entered via a historic cobble stone archway, this generously proportioned property is ideally located for the University of Edinburgh and Edinburgh C..."
"A bright, well-presented, clean and spacious three-bedroom, mid-terrace townhouse, with gardens to the front and rear offering around 1216 square feet of flexible family living space. Located in a quiet residential new development part of Edinburgh, this fabulous superb value family home is pr..."
"Well-presented and spacious, two bedroom, third floor (top) duplex apartment with secured parking. Set in a modern, factored residential development, superbly located in the Leith area, just north of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall has wood effect flooring, two light fittings, a ..."
"OPEN VIEWINGS SUNDAYS 1.3-3.30PM Finished to a high standard, this two-bedroom contemporary apartment offers a chic modern lifestyle in Edinburgh's popular residential area of Bonnington. "
Contemporary and spacious one bedroom apartment with open plan kitchen living room.
"1 Bedroom Apartment This spacious one bedroom apartment is ideal for first time buyers with an open-plan lounge-dining-kitchen, bathroom and double bedroom with a fitted wardrobe."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this quietly position, two-bedroom, second floor flat to the market. The property forms part of a modern apartment block in Comiston, a sought-after area, to the south of Edinburgh city centre and close to the amenities of Morningside, Buckstone and Fairmileh..."
"Enjoy a prime city location with this contemporary second floor apartment situated in the prestigious Fettes area of Edinburgh. This two-bedroom property with private balcony, sits within the exclusive Strada development, and thanks to its immaculate interiors and quality    finishes, is in turn-..."
An ideal opportunity to purchase this most attractive bright and spacious two-bedroom terraced villa in excellent order throughout. This charming property occupies a pleasant position within this sought-after district of Gilmerton and within very easy reach of the city centre. An ideal first purc...
Beautifully Presented One Bedroom Maindoor Flat In Leith's Desirable Engine Yard Development
"New FIxed Price £240,000 (£10K below HRV). Bright One Bed Third Floor Flat in Desirable Shandon..  This spacious flat would make an ideal first time ..."
"A bright and spacious, two-bedroom upper villa with a prime location in popular Davidson's Mains, situated within easy reach of amenities, schooling, idyllic green spaces, and transport links. The home features lightly decorated interiors, with a dining kitchen and a four-piece bathroom equipped ..."
"A beautifully presented two-bedroom apartment situated in Edinburgh’s popular Canonmills, one of the city’s most historic areas. Located on the first floor, this bright and spacious property offers comfortable, flexible living space. Its central location offers an array of amenities from restaura..."
"Part of the highly sought-after Western Harbour development in Newhaven, this modern, two-bedroom, second-floor apartment is an outstanding home for professionals, couples, and small families. The southwest-facing property is presented in true move-in condition, with crisp white décor a..."
"A bright and spacious, two-bedroom, upper villa with a prime location in popular Davidson’s Mains, situated within easy reach of amenities, schooling, idyllic green spaces, and transport links. The home features lightly decorated interiors with a fully-enclosed private garden that has a ..."
"A well-presented first floor flat, quietly situated to the rear of the building, forming part of a sought-after retirement development in the prestigious Comely Bank district of ..."
"Flat 16, 4 Orchard Brae Avenue is an immaculately presented penthouse flat with lift access and located in a prime residential location. Quietly situated within a mature, established development, the property has easy access to excellent local amenities and is within a short commute to the city c..."
"This one-bedroom Georgian basement apartment in the popular Hillside area of Edinburgh offers the best in city centre living. Well-presented and bright throughout, it is in move-in condition and provides comfortable accommodation. Close to excellent leisure and retail amenities and just minutes f..."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this immaculately presented, spacious two-bedroom apartment to the market. The property is located on the third floor and is one of the largest apartments in the development. Its elevated position offers fantastic views and huge amounts of natural light. Birc..."
"Bright and beautifully-presented, two bedroom, third-floor flat, set in a modern, factored residential development, located in the popular Newhaven area, adjacent to the waterfront, north of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance hall gives access throughout, featuring two built-in store cupboards..."
A seldom available opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunningly presented first floor flat on Edinburgh's historic Royal Mile - a UNESCO World Heritage Site.Forming part of a ...
"We are delighted to offer onto the market this well presented semi detached villa, in need of modernisation, which offers flexible family accommodation over two floors.
It has a driveway to the front and an enclosed family friendly garden to the rear in need of TLC.
Early viewing is recommended. ..."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this superb two bedroom upper villa nicely positioned within quiet residential street of the ever-popular Balgreen district of the ...
"Spacious, immaculately presented, two-bedroom, main door, ground-floor flat. Forming part of a traditional, stone-built tenement, located in the Slateford area, just west of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance vestibule leads into a high-ceilinged, carpeted hallway, with storage, which..."
"A fantastic buy-to-let opportunity, this well-presented, two-bedroom, fourth (top) floor flat, has previously been on the landlord register and a renewal fee has been paid. Set in a traditional stone-built tenement, located in the sought-after and vibrant Tollcross area, close to the heart of ..."
"**Newly Fixed Price** 18 (3F2) Bruntsfield Place is a charming and exceptionally bright 3rd floor flat, forming part of a traditional Edinburgh tenement building."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* **NEW PRICE - AVAILABLE FOR SALE OR TO RENT TO PURCHASE *** A superbe spacious one bedroom retirement apartment with Juliet balcony, boasting a pleasant view overlooking the entrance courtyard. There is ..."
"Centrally located in Edinburgh’s sought-after New Town, with a quiet position and access to a shared garden, this traditional second-floor tenement flat is tastefully presented with classic décor and authentic features, and includes one double bedroom, a newly carpeted living/ dining..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious, one-bedroom, second-floor apartment, forming part of modern, factored residential development. Conveniently located on a quiet side street, in the popular Shandon area, just west of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall affords access throughout t..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* * Now Fixed Price * Superb first floor one bedroom retirement living plus apartment with Juliet balcony. Excellent facilities on offer including a table service restaurant, sun room, roof terrace, hair ..."
"3 Bedroom terraced villa situated in a preferred position within an established modern development, which enjoys an extremely convenient location, close to a good range of amenities and excellent transport links to the city centre, bypass and beyond. Perfect for couple or young family."
"*Potential long term rental £1,100pm, 5.18% Yield, based on the home report valuation* Spacious and well-presented, first floor flat with south facing balcony in a sought-after development, just off Brunswick Road."
"£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT. This well-presented double aspect second floor flat is situated in an established and secure gated courtyard development in the popular residential district of Dalry, in the South-West of Edinburgh. The convenient location offers an array of shops, restaurants and local ..."
"Forming part of the Strada development in the popular Fettes area of Edinburgh is this bright, spacious and well-presented fourth floor flat. The flat benefits from stylish decoration throughout, gas central heating, double glazing and a security entrance system. The accommodation c..."
"Nestled on a cul-de-sac in sought-after Blackhall, this main-door, first-floor, mews-style flat enjoys a desirable location in the capital that is sure to appeal to commuting ..."
"Most impressive lower colony style villa with sunny private garden, forming part of a stone fronted building and located within walking distance of a wonderful range of ..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A well presented one bedroom, second floor retirement apartment with Juliet balcony. The superb facilities within Lyle Court include a table service restaurant, sun room, roof terrace and hair and beauty..."
Spacious Three Bed Semi Detached House In The Broomhouse Area
"29 (2F2) Springvalley terrace is an impressive one-bedroom second floor flat, situated on peaceful street in the desirable Morningside area. The location is superb with excellent local amenities and is a convenient distance from the city centre & surrounding areas. The property has been taste..."
Yopa Edinburgh are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic 2 bedroom ground floor flat in a sought after area. Early Viewing Advised!!!
"Part of the highly sought-after Western Harbour development in Newhaven, this modern, two-bedroom apartment boasts a waterside setting and is an ideal home for professionals, couples, and small families."
"Exceptionally Well Presented Two Bed Ground Floor Maindoor Flat in Popular Morningside Location.  Beautiful traditional flat finished in a contemporary style, with brilliant ..."
A delightful two bedroom duplex set on the shores of The Firth of Forth in Trinity offering beautifully decorated and stylish living space on the level. Internal viewing is the only way to truly appreciate this property
Immaculate Mid Terraced Townhouse ideally placed for the commuters of Edinburgh City Centre.
"This exceptionally spacious and bright ground floor flat occupies a well-maintained block of only four properties, in the highly desirable district of Corstorphine close to ..."
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent amenities, the train station and vast open green spaces is this immaculately presented terraced house. Boasting a private enclosed ..."
"Beautifully presented semi-detached home, enjoying a superb location for family life, within walking distance to schools, close to Portobello beach, the magnificent Holyrood Park ..."
"This bright and well presented third/top floor flat forming part of a traditional tenement building, is well placed in the popular district of Dalry, within easy walking distance ..."
"Superb three bedroom mid terraced family home with a sunny back garden, tucked away on a popular modern development, yet close to good transport links and local amenities.This is ..."
"Part exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this spacious main-door colony flat to the market. Located in popular Shandon, the property enjoys excellent proportions and a private front garden. Internally, the property requires a degree of upgrading making this a perfect opportu..."
A spacious and well-lit two-bedroom flat on the top floor of a unique converted building. The flat is an ideal purchase for a profitable buy-to-let opportunity or first time ...
"Bright and spacious, four-bedroom, duplex flat with private balconies, on the ground and first floor, set quietly within a purpose-built apartment complex, located in the sought-after Bellevue area. The entrance hall has the stairs leading to the upper floor and laminate flooring extending thr..."
"This generously proportioned mid-terraced house with private gardens is situated right next to the Water of Leith, within the popular residential area of Bonnington. The house is ..."
Yopa Edinburgh are proud to present to the open market this stunning First Floor Apartment which commands early viewing
"This one-bedroom apartment lies in Edinburgh’s sought-after historic Stockbridge. On the top floor of a modern property, it is well-proportioned with views of the Water of Leith and surroundings. Ideally located in a peaceful residential street and in easy reach of the City Centre. With exc..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE – TUESDAY 2nd MAY - 10am – 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* Lovely bright second floor apartment with easy access to all the communal facilities on offer including the residents' lounge, restaurant, roof terrace and sun room and more."
"Forming part of McCarthy Stone's exclusive retirement development in Barnton, this superb one bedroom second floor apartment is exceptionally bright, spacious and is of move-in condition throughout."
"Open viewing Thursday 6-8pm & Sunday 1-3pm This appealing ground floor flat is located in a modern factored development within the sought-after location of Bonnington. The property is within easy reach of an abundance of excellent amenities, close to the fashionable Shore area with many re..."
"A rarely available end-terraced lower villa offering well-proportioned accommodation in a highly desirable location, close to Haymarket, the West End and excellent transport ..."
"Spacious, tastefully-presented, two-bedroom, ground-floor flat, with an allocated parking space. Set in the impressive Maltings development, in the popular Slateford area of Edinburgh, west of the city centre. A hallway gives access throughout, and features two built-in store cupboards, a secu..."
"Part Exchange available! McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this well-proportioned semi-detached house to the market. Presented in excellent condition, the property boasts three double bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, driveway, and private front and rear gardens."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this impressive and well-proportioned two bedroom first-floor flat, situated within a small and quiet cul-de-sac setting in the high ..."
"Forming part of a traditional tenement building, this double aspect first floor flat is located in the popular residential district of Dalry, in the heart of Edinburgh. Dalry has benefitted from continued development over recent years and is ideal for young couples and professionals. The convenie..."
"This bright and spacious flat would be ideal for either a first time buyer or investor. The property is conveniently situated to take advantage of many recreational facilities with nearby Fountain Park offering a range of high street restaurants, gym, cinema, bowling alley, mini golf and casino. ..."
"Perfect for first-time buyers or city professionals, this spacious apartment features lift access and a secure entry door system. The double bedroom is complete with fitted wardrobes and across the hallway, you’ll find the bathroom. An open-plan living space combines the kitchen, lounge and dinin..."
A delightful studio apartment in superb central location
"Enjoying an established residential setting in Gilmerton, this two bedroom, detached bungalow boasts spacious interiors and open-plan living space, in addition to low maintenance gardens, and driveway, the property represents a fabulous family home in a popular, well-connected location. Quietl..."
"2 bedroom apartment located within the prestigious development off New Mart, ideally located within communicating distance to the city centre and all transport links."
"*£5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT*Spacious end terraced villa noew requiring modernisation offering excellent development potential. Offering ideal family size accommodation, the property offers the opportunity to create a bespoke home and comprises; entrance hall hallway, lounge, dining kitch..."
Located just off the vibrant Leith Walk is this good sized and well-presented top floor flat. Forming part of a traditional tenement building the property enjoys a bright ambience and well-proportioned accommodation. The accommodation compromises an entrance hallway with two storage cupboards an...
"Purplebricks present this particularly appealing ground floor flat, forming part of a modern courtyard development with private residents parking facilities. This attractive South facing flat enjoys a bright facing and features French windows which open onto a private paved front garden. Modern k..."
"A well-presented bright two-bedroom apartment set within a traditional sandstone tenement, in the bustling Dalry area of Edinburgh"
"**A Wonderful 3 Bedroom Maisonette with Garden**This fantastic property would make an ideal home for a family, first time buyer or investor. Situated in an ideal locale, with all amenities close-by, this upper maisonette in Stevenson Drive, Edinburgh, EH11 3HL is ideally placed for a family and t..."
"22 Collier Place is a spacious, modern two bedroom detached house, set in a quiet residential development in Niddrie, east of Edinburgh city centre. The well-presented ..."
A lovely bright top floor flat part of a traditional tenement building in the vibrant Grassmarket district of Edinburgh perfectly positioned in Edinburgh’s historic OId Town and ...
An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this delightful 3rd floor apartment forming part of a popular modern factored development benefiting from secure underground ...
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this excellent one bedroom top floor flat situated within the highly sought-after district of Stockbridge. Boasting superb amenities ...
Neilsons are delighted to present to market this beautiful two bedroom first floor flat forming part of a modern development within the high amenity area of South Gyle. Close to ...
"Boasting stunning views of Edinburgh Castle, this delightful fifth floor flat is located in the popular Grassmarket district in Central Edinburgh. The location is within easy reach of excellent local shops, restaurants and amenities and is a short distance from the City Centre. There's frequent p..."
"This superb, bright and well presented 2 bedroom ground floor apartment forms part of a popular modern development located close to a variety of amenities and within easy reach of ..."
Neilsons are delighted to offer to market this well-presented two bedroom first floor forming part of a popular retirement development situated within the highly desirable ...
A great opportunity to purchase a well presented two-bedroom second floor flat situated within the exclusive Rennie’s Isle development in the popular Leith shore area.
"17 Fair-A-Far Cottages is a stunning double-upper moments from Cramond Beach and the River Almond. The property benefits from 2 double bedrooms and two bathrooms, together with an open plan living room / kitchen with great views to the Firth of Forth.External stairs lead to the front door an..."
"Light and tastefully presented, two-bedroom, end-terrace villa, set on a corner plot with gardens. Located in an established residential area of Liberton, south of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance gives access to both public rooms, and to a deep built-in store cupboard. Front facing, the lo..."
"Beautifully presented two bedroom first floor flat quietly situated in a popular modern development. Flat is approached via communal stair with views over The Water of Leith. Bright and spacious open plan lounge/kitchen with washing machine, fridge, four ring gas cooker and oven/grill. Two bedroo..."
"Polwarth Crescent is a pristine Main door apartment, beautifully presented in this much sought after location with many amenities on the doorstep. A lucrative buy-to-let investment and / or a pied-à-terre in a strategic part of the Capital."
"This modern two-bedroom, two-bathroom ground-floor flat boasts an enviable city address adjacent to the scenic Water of Leith and within strolling distance of The Shore’s ..."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £10,899 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. The Kirkton is a spacious apartment with one double bedroom located in Apartment Block 2, not far from Portobello beach. The main open..."
Sean Lyon and RE/MAX Property Marketing Centre Edinburgh are delighted to present to market this bright and spacious two bedroom ground floor flat situated within this popular modern development in the desirable Leith ward of Edinburgh. The property is within walking distance from an abundance of...
"A superbly located and rarely available upper flat, set within a peaceful residential cul-de-sac in a highly popular part of the City. The property will appeal to a wide variety of buyers. EPC = E COUNCIL TAX BAND = E"
"A two-bedroom top/fourth-floor retirement flat within a popular retirement complex, which enjoys a lovely setting in the capital, positioned within easy reach of Edinburgh’s Royal Botanic Garden, local amenities, and regular transport links. The property is neutrally decorated throughout..."
"Well presented and spacious, three-bedroom, main door double upper villa, with gardens and a driveway. Located in the popular Easter Drylaw area, northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A ground-floor entrance affords access to the carpeted stairs leading to the hall which offers space f..."
"Set on the ground floor of a handsome, Victorian tenement building in Meadowbank, this well-presented flat enjoys attractive, modern presentation paired with some characterful ..."
"Beautifully presented and spacious top floor flat forming part of a luxury-built development surrounded by landscaped grounds. An Excellent Opportunity for young professionals, First Time Buyers and Investors alike. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate what the property offers. ..."
Forming part of a highly sought after modern development this bright and well presented ground floor apartment is located close to a variety of amenities and within easy reach of ...
"A well-presented one bedroom main door flat, centrally located in the Canonmills district of Edinburgh’s city centre. The property would be well suited to first time buyers and buy-to-let investors. This property is tastefully decorated and is located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the centre of Edin..."
" McDougall McQueen present to the market this two bedroom third (top) floor flat with lovely open views forming part of a traditional tenement. The property is ideally located within the popular area of Willowbrae close to many local amenities, Edinburgh city centre and commuting links. The ..."
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, main door, upper villa, with a well-maintained garden, a garage and a driveway. Located in the popular Easter Drylaw area, northwest of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming, carpeted staircase and an entrance hall, with storage, are finished with the light, so..."
"Situated in a quiet cul de sac development in sought-after Murrayfield, this two-bedroom ground floor flat, offers light and airy accommodation in an ideal location. The famous Murrayfield stadium and Edinburgh zoo, are a short stroll away, as well as, quick and easy access into the city centre...."
"14/7 St Clair Road is a beautifully presented top floor flat forming part of a well-maintained modern development. The apartment benefits from permit parking within the development, a spacious living room, two bedrooms and two bathrooms.   "
Purplebricks offer to the market this Luxury 2 Bedroom 1st Floor flat with private parking beautifully presented to the market. This bright flat (56 sqm) occupies part of the first floor of an individually built residential block (2008) which will appeal to purchasers of all age groups and landl...
"Superb top / second floor apartment with 2 bedrooms, a single garage and excellent views, forming part of a modern development in a most convenient location.This bright and ..."
"Perfectly-proportioned, the Polwarth has a separate kitchen with a door leading into the garden, two double bedrooms, family bathroom and a good-sized lounge. Ideal if you're a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"WE COULD PAY TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR HELP WITH YOUR MOVING & RUNNING COSTS - YOU CHOOSE! WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £10,599 PLUS WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING. This spacious one bedroom apartment is located on the second floor in Apartment Block 2, not far from Portobello beach. The open-plan ..."
"*GOLDEN SHARE AVAILABLE* The Benbecula is a pleasant 3-bedroom home which presents a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, a living room with elegant French doors onto the rear garden, and a contemporary family bathroom to serve the property's three bedrooms."
"Enjoying stunning views of Arthur's Seat and the Salisbury Crags, this is a beautiful first floor flat situated in the sought after area of Newington. Boasting a modern kitchen and bathroom this delightful property also benefits from two external storage cupboards and a private area of garden in..."
Spacious Two Bedroom Flat In The Bonnington Area Of Leith
"Light and immaculately presented, one-bedroom, corner-aspect, fourth-floor (top) flat of a modern residential development. Located in Leith's fashionable Shore district, lying to the north-east of Edinburgh city centre. The hall has space for outerwear, and features a built-in cupboard an..."
"Purplebricks present this bright and spacious modern third floor flat benefiting from lift access and residents parking. Situated in the popular area of Fettes, the property sits within easy reach of many local amenities and benefits from secure entry-phone, landscaped communal areas, gas central..."
A charming and well-appointed two-bedroomed second floor flat with an allocated parking space forming part of a converted Church on Edinburgh’s highly desirable Easter Road located just east of the city centre. The property is presented to the market in immaculate condition with...
"A generously proportioned mid-terraced house with three double bedrooms, with fresh neutral décor and newly fitted carpets, requiring some modernisation but benefitting ..."
"Generously proportioned 2nd floor flat (one of the larger design types), forming part of a select modern development with lift, private allocated parking and well maintained ..."
McDougall McQueen present to the market this well-proportioned two bedroom ground floor flat forming part of a block of six traditional terrace with a shared entry along with a shared garden to the rear and on street parking. The property is ideally located in a sought after location within Edinb...
"New FIxed Price - This well presented second floor flat is situated in a traditional tenement building in the popular district of Newington, in the South of Edinburgh. A short distance from the City Centre, the location offers a great selection of local shops and amenities. The property is con..."
"CLOSING FOR OFFERS FRIDAY 17TH MARCH AT 12 NOON. Enviably located literally around the corner from the wonderful open spaces of Leith links, this modern top floor flat could hardly be better placed to take advantage of all the area has to offer. Entered via a secure door entry system ..."
Purplebricks are proud to present this stunning three bedroom ground floor property in the popular residential street of Carrick Knowe Terrace in Edinburgh. The property is situated perfectly with quick commuter routes into the City Centre along with offering a vast array of high quality local ...
91/22 Morningside Road is an attractive 3rd floor apartment with lift access in a small retirement development set in a desirable residential area close to an excellent range of local amenities. The property has been recently up-dated with modern storage heaters and a B.M.A.S. wet-room.Entrance h...
"A modern luxury apartment set within a category B listed building completed in 1949. Close to excellent local amenities and only a short walk to Inverleith park, botanic gardens and Granton Harbour."
Beautifully presented first floor flat forming part of a traditional Victorian tenement in a prime location close to the City Centre. The generously proportioned property has been well looked after and is in move-in condition. It has a modern gas central heating system with a modern Worcester com...
"Light and tastefully presented, two-bedroom, semi-detached villa with gardens and a multi-vehicle driveway. Located in the established residential area of Liberton, south of Edinburgh city centre, and exceptionally well-placed for the Royal Infirmary. A welcoming entrance porch opens into the ..."
"A bright and spacious, first floor, one-bedroom plus boxroom, apartment situated on the edge of Holyrood Park in Meadowbank, just east of the bustling city centre. Entered from a communal stairwell the property is presented in good order throughout benefitting from a spacious sitting room with tw..."
"**Reduced Fixed Price £15,000 Below Home Report Valuation**"
"SPACIOUS 1 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT. With Arthur's Seat and Holyrood Park on the doorstep. Communal Stair. Vestibule, Hall, Dining Hall, Lounge, (Study), Kitchen/Diner, Bedroom, Box-Room, Shower-room. DG/GCH. Storage. Parking x 2 cars. University/Amenities/Old Town are all within easy ..."
The 2 bedroom top floor apartment is a perfect home for first-time buyers with its well-proportioned interior.
"Beautifully presented mid terraced villa cul de sac setting. In move in condition, this lovely home comprises; hall, sitting room with double doors through to a most attractive dining kitchen with appliances – French doors to rear garden, two upstairs bedrooms – both with built-in wardrobes, styl..."
"Set on the upper ground floor of a contemporary development in Canonmills, this immaculately presented flat accommodates a double bedroom, an open-plan living area, and a bathroom, and benefits from a private patio, access to communal outdoor space, and an unallocated parking space. The flat will..."
This spacious and beautifully presented terraced villa with private gardens and garage forms part of an established residential area close to local amenities and commuting links. ...
Bright one bedroom top floor flat forming part of a modern development close to Stockbridge and the City Centre.
This 2 bedroom hidden gem is located on the top floor of a modern block of flats taking advantage of fantastic views across to Arthurs's seat. The property is situated in the very popular area of Abbeyhill.
"CLOSING DATE SET: Thursday 16th March at 12 noon.Stylish and superbly proportioned traditional top floor flat with lots of appealing features, boasting a prime cul-de-sac position ..."
"Two bed double upper villa with private garden, convertible loft space and off-street parking for two cars"
A rare opportunity to purchase a plot with planning permission in a highly desirable location.
Enjoy a popular and residential location with this well-presented three-bedroom apartment situated in Edinburgh’s sought-after leafy Corstorphine. This spacious and bright second floor property benefits from appealing contemporary upgrades to both the kitchen and shower room as well as shar...
"This three-bedroom, double-upper property sits in a peaceful neighbourhood in the popular district of Colinton Mains"
"CLOSING DATE TUESDAY 21/03/23 @ 12 NOON A truly appealing sixth floor flat, positioned in a popular and modern residential development. Located in the bustling area of the ..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this fantastic three bedroom semi-detached house, located in a popular pocket of Gilmerton."
"A unique opportunity has arisen to acquire this spacious, two-bedroom upper flat boasting a large, private rear patio area in the highly sought-after Granton area near north ..."
"Blair Cadell are delighted to bring to market this immaculate raised ground floor flat ideally placed for swift access to the city centre. In turn key condition, the property ..."
"Forming part of a contemporary development just a short walk from all the area has to offer, this exceptional top floor flat commands superb rooftop views to the Forth of Forth in one direction and the Pentland Hills in the other. The sitting/diningroom is lovely and light and offers the perfec..."
"McEwan Fraser is delighted to present this one-bedroom ground floor apartment which forms part of a unique, modern residential development situated in the highly desirable West End of Edinburgh. The property offers clean, contemporary living space within walking distance of the city centre and th..."
"A well-presented one-bedroom first-floor apartment, offering reconfiguration potential."
A bright and well-presented one bedroom apartment in the heart of the historic Old Town. This charming top floor B-listed property in one of Edinburgh’s most iconic streets just off the Royal Mile offers attractive and comfortable accommodation. Set within a historic baronial style building from ...
"This light and airy flat is situated on the ground floor of a traditional tenement in Dalry and enjoys two bedrooms, an open-plan living area, and a shower room, as well as access ..."
Gibsons are delighted to bring to the market this two bed house offering flexible living space. Decorated to a high standard throughout and offering quirky spacious accommodation.
"** CLOSING DATE FIXED WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH AT 12NOON ** Located within the popular Ardmillan area of Edinburgh is this spacious second floor flat with fantastic natural light. Forming part of a traditional tenement building, the flat has double glazed windows and gas central heating and wou..."
"**Excellent first time purchase or investment property **  This well presented, main door first floor one-bedroom Victorian flat is set in a much admired and peaceful street, a short walk west of the City Centre with great amenities on the doorstep. Viewing is highly advised."
"This beautifully presented third/top floor flat with lovely open outlook, forms part of a popular modern development in the high amenity Corstorphine district. The property is ..."
"BUY TO LET Comfortable, 1-bedroom, rear facing ground floor apartment with communal gardens in the heart of the city. South of The Castle and Grassmarket, and north of The Meadows in central Edinburgh"
Viewing is absolutely essential of this stylish two bed apartment. The property has been decorated to a very high standard and is in true move in condition throughout.
Located within a popular residential area to the North of Edinburgh is this well-presented and good sized end terraced house. With electric heating and double glazed windows the house offers bright and spacious family living with a large rear garden. The accommodation includes an entr...
"Purplebricks present this is well-presented two bedroom ground floor, main door flat situated in a modern gated development and well placed to take advantage of shopping facilities at the nearby Cameron Toll centre. It lies on Peffermill Road opposite Prestonfield Avenue. The property is set w..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a well-proportioned two-bedroom flat, situated in a sought-after residential area, and just a short distance from the Edinburgh city bypass."
"This attractive top floor flat forms part of an established residential area with beautiful leafy communal grounds, close to excellent local amenities and well placed for ..."
"Enjoying an enviable central address on the fringes of Holyrood Park, with unrestricted on-street parking, this classic first-floor tenement flat boasts an open-plan living area and breakfasting kitchen, a generous double bedroom with period features, a wet room, and a separate WC - all presented..."
"CLOSING DATE WEDNESDAY 15/03/23 @ 12 NOON Delightful main door lower colony flat with private front garden, quietly positioned within a quaint setting close to the vast open ..."
"Set in the heart of Meadowbank, moments from excellent amenities, quick transport links and the vast open green spaces of Holyrood Park is this immaculately presented top floor ..."
"CLOSING DATE WEDNESDAY 15/03/23 @ 12 NOON This bright and well-proportioned apartment is situated on the third floor of an attractive modern building, located close to ..."
Blair Cadell are delight to bring to market this immaculate flat situated in the highly sought after area of Slateford.The property is in turn key condition and would appeal to ...
"With just 2 miles from the city centre and a 15 min commute by bus, or by bike using the cycle path to Haymarket, this  traditional top floor tenement flat offers an appealing home or rental investment in popular Blackhall. The generous accommodation is freshly decorated in tasteful neutral ..."
Stylish 1 bed retirement property for sale in Liberton
" Prime Property Auctions is excited to present a Beautiful Flat 2 Bedroom TENANTED Flat located in popular location of Dalry in Edinburgh. Home Report of £230,000 - PRICED TO SELL.       *** 218, Dalry Road, Edinburgh, Midlothian EH11 2ES previously sold for £270,0..."
"Light and spacious lower villa boasting private gardens, garage and drive, situated within an ever popular area convenient for varied local amenities and good transport links into ..."
**360 TOUR AVAILABLE** Alba Property are delighted to introduce to the sales market this spacious upper floor Villa situated in the Western suburbs of Edinburgh's Sighthill. This main door flat comprises a welcoming entrance porch which leads to the first floor and main hallway of the p...
"Set in the heart of Leith and within walking distance of the trendy Shore area is this well-proportioned 1st floor flat. Offering bright and spacious accommodation the flat a security entrance system, gas central heating and double glazed windows. The accommodation includes an entranc..."
Spacious One Bedroom Ground Floor Flat in Edinburgh's Desired Blackhall
"A well proportioned upper villa situated in the popular area of Balgreen. This delightful property offers a lovely home which benefits from a private area of garden in addition to the communal drying green. In brief the accommodation comprises; twin windowed sitting room with feature fireplace, f..."
A well-presented and quietly positioned two bedroom first floor retirement flat. The property is located in the popular Blackhall area to the west of the city centre. The building is accessed via a secure entry-phone system into a well-maintained communal hallway. The internal accommodation compr...
"Very spacious and well presented, three-bedroom upper villa with a private garden and driveway, set on a quiet residential street, located in the popular Broomhouse area, to the west of Edinburgh city centre. The carpeted entrance stairway leads to the upper hall which provides access to ..."
"Immaculately presented and spacious, second (top) floor flat, forming part of an established residential development. Set on a quiet side street, in the heart of the sought-after Corstorphine area, west of Edinburgh city centre. A welcoming entrance hall affords access to the majorit..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer to market this impressive two bedroom semi-detached home, quietly positioned at the end of a pleasant cul-de-sac within an established modern ..."
"This bright and spacious mid terraced villa is situated within the popular residential area of Broomhouse. The property is close to good amenities with further specialised shopping available at Hermiston Gait and Gyle Shopping Centre, easy reach of the Bankhead Tram Stop and walking distance of E..."
"Well-proportioned, southerly-facing, two-bedroom, ground-floor flat, forming part of a traditional stone-built tenement. Superbly located in the popular and vibrant Leith Walk area, northeast of Edinburgh city centre. A generous reception hall gives access to all rooms except the kitchen, and ..."
Forming part of a modern development completed in 2013 is this bright and well-presented end terraced house. Offering spacious accommodation the house enjoys gas central heating and double glazed windows. The ground floor enjoys a large open plan lounge and kitchen with a bright dou...
"Warners are delighted to bring to market this lovely end-terrace home offering an ideal first-time purchase for an individual or couple, quietly situated in the heart of this ..."
"Set beside the Water of Leith in Edinburgh’s idyllic Dean Village, this one-bedroom flat boasts one of the capital’s most sought-after central addresses. The flat ..."
"Set within an established development in Corstorphine, this groundfloor flat boasts immaculate, contemporary interiors, a good-sized living room, a stylish kitchen and shower room, and two bedrooms, plus access to shared gardens and unrestricted on-street parking. "
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, traditional upper villa, with private gardens and a driveway. Conveniently located in the popular Pilton area, lying to the north of Edinburgh city centre. A carpeted entrance staircase leads up to a naturally lit, central hallway, with access to all ro..."
"If you want to be a hop, skip and a jump from Leith Links, this is the flat for you. "
"Golden Share opportunity (Eligibility criteria applies) for this superb one bedroom retirement apartment located on the second floor, for further details please refer to the brochure and link provided within"
"Well-presented, one-bedroom, second-floor flat, forming part of an impressive, traditional stone-built tenement. Located on a quiet side street, in Edinburgh's highly sought-after Morningside area, south of the city centre. The entrance hall has space for outerwear and features a built-in..."
"Light and beautifully-presented, two-bedroom, corner aspect, first-floor apartment set in a modern, factored residential development. Located in the popular Muirhouse area, to the northwest of Edinburgh city centre. The hallway features a secured entry handset, space for outerwear and two buil..."
"This is a third floor, one bedroom flat in a traditional tenement in the popular Tollcross district of Edinburgh, lying a mile to the southwest of the city centre."
"Beautifully presented, two-bedroom, mid-terraced house with gardens and a double driveway. Located in the popular residential Duddingston area, lying to the east of Edinburgh city centre. The entrance vestibule has wood effect flooring extending through to the hall which gives access..."
"Beautifully presented and well proportioned two bedroom upper apartment located in the extremely popular Stenhouse area of Edinburgh. The apartment will appeal to a wide variety of buyers from first time buyers to young couples, professionals and investors as well as down sizers looking for somet..."
"Set on a quiet street, moments from excellent local amenities, quick transport links and vast open green spaces is this spacious two bedroom terraced villa with driveway and ..."
"This well-presented one-bedroom apartment is situated in a traditional tenement overlooking the open green space of Leith Links. Located on the third floor, this is a bright and comfortable property boasting attractive interiors and in move in condition. The current owner has upgraded both the ca..."
"Purplebricks are proud to present to the market this incredible opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented one bedroom flat which is situated in the popular and sought after Lauriston Street. Lauriston Street lies just a stone throw away from the City Centre. Along with that, there is ..."
Immaculately presented Ground Floor Flat located within the ever popular Slateford district of Edinburgh and immediate viewing is strongly recommended
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a well-presented one bedroom third floor flat in the popular and sought-after Broughton area. *Potential long term rental £825pm, 5.82% Yield, based on the home report valuation*"
"Set within leafy surroundings in the suburb of Gilmerton, this modern ground-floor flat, with appealing neutral décor, offers two bedrooms, two bathrooms, a bright and ..."
"Neilsons are delighted to offer to the market this well-proportioned three bedroom ground floor flat, forming part of an established modern cul-de-sac development with attractive ..."
Set in the heart of the historic conservation area of Dean Village along the Water of Leith in a stunning “A” listed building dating back to 1883 is this duplex ...
"80 (BF) South Clerk Street is set in the heart of Newington close to excellent local amenities, university buildings, quick transport links and vast open green spaces. The ..."
"The Crombie is a stylish family home. 
 
The ground floor offers a generous lounge, an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the garden, a utility room and WC. 
 
Upstairs you'll find all 4 double bedrooms, bedroom 1 with an en suite shower room. The family bathroom, and home office ..."
"Prime Development Opportunity, 55 West Regent Street, Glasgow, G2 2AE33,553 Sq FtFOR SALE"
FOR SALE – Former Care Home / Development Opportunity
"A magnificent detached villa occupying a prime elevated position in Kelvinside, set back and screened from Great Western Road by mature trees."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this locally admired and handsome period detached villa, with elegantly proportioned accommodation, positioned within generous and private landscaped gardens, located in one of Glasgow's most sought after residential neighbourhoods, close to popular schools, Rouken G..."
"An impressive detached residence, set within generous and private landscaped gardens, in close proximity to Whitecraigs Tennis and Golf Clubs, popular East Renfrewshire Schools and Whitecraigs Train Station."
"A stunning, 5 bedroom architect designed house with over 6000sq ft of accommodation, triple garage and landscaped gardens."
"The Mackintosh is a truly imposing home, built to the highest specification and offering luxurious living accommodation. The ground floor entrance hall offers the first glimpse of the grand oak and glass staircase that runs through all three floors."
Stunning family home with generous double aspect lounge. Family room to the rear with sliding panel through to the dining room/kitchen with a magnificent double-height window that extends to the mezzanine on the first floor allowing in plenty of light.
~LAST REMAINING PLOT~ CODA Estates are delighted to offer to the market an exclusive development positioned in one Lenzie's most prestigious addresses. ‘The Manors at Seven Sisters’ will comprise of 3 luxurious detached properties within a unique setting. This development will incorporate an exc...
Stunning duplex apartment offering incredible views
Substantial country home with excellent outbuildings in accessible location.
"PRICES FROM £895,000 The picturesque conservation Village of Carmunnock is the inspiration of Mill Bank. The Select development of only 4 New Executive Homes sit in a mature tree-lined enclave exclusive within the village. Set within large plots our designs seek to crea..."
"The property is set within this most desirable private road, in arguably the finest location within Lenzie, a delightful hamlet located on the northern fringe of Glasgow and regarded as one of the mos..."
Coming Soon - A bespoke 4 bedroom duplex apartment at Claremont Apartments. This spacious apartment is situated within the Park District of Glasgow close to Kelvingrove Park.
"38 Aytoun Road is in one of the most desirable of areas, set within spectacular garden grounds extending all the way round this superb 10 apartment detached Victorian blonde sandstone property spanning over 326 square meters, offering versatile family accommodation formed over two original levels..."
"Discover the Lawers collection new to Balgray Gardens, Newton Mearns. The final collection from Cala Homes, discover impressive 5-bed detached homes, with stunning high specification and exclusive new homestyles available. "
"A handsome, stone built, detached villa which offers flexible accommodation of nine principal apartments, all set amidst large established gardens, at the end of this quiet cul-de-sac. Garwhitter Drive is one of Milngavie’s premier addresses, located just off Baldernock Road, amidst similar s..."
"A magnificent, six apartment second and top floor duplex within this elegant Victorian townhouse, situated in the ever-popular Park district."
"Magnificent, six apartment first and second floor duplex, situated within a highly sought after and prestigious development, within one of Bearsden's most desired locations."
"Show Home Viewings By Appointment - Incentives available on certain plots. Last few plot remaining, prices from £799,000. A stunning four storey townhouse offering superb sized family living space which extends to over 4000 sq ft. Set within the small and exclusive Glades development thi..."
A Unique Variety of Holiday Lodges and Visitor Centre Nestled into the South Side of The Campsies with Spectacular Views Over Kirkintilloch and Glasgow. For Sale as a Whole or in 3 Lots. Please read brochure for details on Lots 2 & 3. Banks Farm Lot 1 – Four 2-bed...
"Five South is a beautiful development of 56, two and three bedroom apartments and penthouses within the sought-after locale of Giffnock in Glasgow's Southside. PLOT 18 - 3 bedroom PENTHOUSE executive apartment with ROOFTOP TERRACE. Call now for more information."
"This rarely available, end terrace townhouse is sure to appeal to a wide range of buyers, presented in true walk in condition the property boasts spacious well laid out accommodation. Internally the property comprises of an impressive lounge which leads to the luxurious contemporary in..."
"A stunning detached villa, sitting on an expansive plot in the heart of Newlands. Having undergone improvements under the current owner and enjoying generous family accommodation over two levels, this outstanding family home really is a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. "
"The Melville is a spacious 5 bedroom brand new home, enjoying an open plan kitchen, dining and family room with bi-fold doors out to your rear garden and patio. Have a home to sell? Ask about Cala's Part Exchange service."
"A stunning three-bedroom, full first floor renovation within this beautiful sandstone property. The property has been restored and refurbished to a high standard with the retention of original features and modern finishes. With three double bedrooms and a choice of options for buyers to choo..."
"If you aspire to a' lifestyle less ordinary', allow us to introduce Cartview Court. This bespoke family home is set amidst expansive garden grounds and boasts not only its own detached apartment but, seasonally, an exclusive aspect over one of the 'White Cart Water's' more striking waterfalls."
"The Logan is a spacious 5 bedroom brand new home, enjoying an open plan kitchen, dining and family room with bi-fold doors out to your rear garden and patio. Have a home to sell? Ask about Cala's Part Exchange service."
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE. The Lowther is a stunning 5 bedroom detached home, boasting a spacious open plan kitchen dining and family room complete with feature island and bi-fold doors out to your private garden. "
"Offering a wealth of space and designed with modern living in mind, the Lowther is the perfect family home to grow into. **Available with a complimentary flooring package throughout Plus, turf to your rear garden** Secure your dream move for Spring 2023 Key f..."
"Set within an exclusive address in Bothwell, Dukes Gate is a truly stunning five bedroom detached grand villa nestled in a desirable quiet cul-de-sac. This modern family home offers comfort across two levels extending to over 2600 square feet with a fantastic flow. Tastefully decorated ..."
A beautifully extended and reconfigured detached house within a primary Giffnock address.
"First floor drawing room conversion with mezzanine sitting room. two bedrooms, one en-suite, bathroom, shared garden."
"""ULVERTON"" Ulverton is a stunning, traditional semi-detached villa nestled in the heart of Pollokshields. Offering generous family accommodation over three levels that can be used very flexibly, this stunning blonde sandstone villa is a must for viewing in order to..."
"Spacious duplex apartment in the historic David Stow building at Jordanhill Park. Set over two spacious levels, enjoying an open plan kitchen, living and dining room plus a separate living room. Part Exchange now available - make your dream move work for you."
"Millichen is a charming country location on the rural outskirts of Glasgow’s north westerly boundary, by Bearsden. A delightful setting, it lies behind Boclair and is home to only a few homes and stretches across open fields to The River Kelvin and is an area monitored by RSPB ornithologist..."
"** OUTSTANDING PERIOD PROPERTY, WITH AN INTERNAL MODERN TWIST ** * Stunningly Presented, Bright & Spacious Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Spacious Lounge, Separate Dining Room & Additional TV Room * Four Bathrooms & Five Spacious Double Bedrooms, Additional Office< (cont.)"
"10 Ellergreen Road is a substantial, detached, seven apartment villa occupying extensive, mature and private garden grounds within an exclusive residential area of Bearsden."
"A well presented and spacious extended four bedroom detached villa by Dickie Homes set within private gardens, positioned within a quiet and short cul de sac, backing onto woodland and situated within the highly regarded Newton Grove development, only a short distance to Mearns Cross and The Aven..."
"***A TRUELY UNIQUE, TRADITIONAL BLONDE SANDSTONE DETACHED HOME*** * Beautifully Presented & Extensively Extended Six Bedroom Detached Family Home * Traditional Blonde Sandstone Facade With Large Horse Shoe Driveway & Landscaped Gardens * Four Reception Rooms (Lounge, Di (cont.)"
"Designed with a modern lifestyle in mind, the 4 bedroom Gordon offers plenty of space for relaxed family living."
Stunning four bedroom traditional sandstone villa with impressive south facing garden grounds boasting expansive land and peaceful kittoch water stream. The property has been renovated throughout by the current owners and really has to be seen to fully appreciate. The property boasts stunning tra...
"Immaculately maintained, preferred first floor flat within sought after location offers good sized accommodation comprising level access communal residents' foyer entered via a secure door system security controlled doorway. The flat itself offers welcoming reception hallway, spacious loung..."
"The Mulberry - a beautiful three bedroom penthouse apartment boasts 3 generously sized bedrooms, two benefitting from ensuites. Bring the outside in with two private terrace spaces and revel in the light, perfect for winding down."
" A four bedroom equestrian home with 28.22 acres of land and stabling for 3 horses, all located within easy commuting distance of Glasgow.Located at the end of a quiet road with picturesque views towards the Campsie Fells, this beautiful home has been finished to an impeccable standard ..."
"With a sociable kitchen diner that leads to the garden room, the 4 bedroom Kennedy has plenty of space for everyone."
"Seldom available, a spacious four bedroom/ three public room detached villa, situated within the quiet residential pocket of Forrestfield Crescent, close to local shops, schools and transport links."
"With five spacious bedrooms, The Lewis is ideal for a larger family. All bedrooms include fitted wardrobes and two enjoy an ensuite shower room, complimented by a generous family bathroom. Downstairs a large open plan kitchen/family area is located alongside a separate formal lounge, dining room."
"Due for completion Early 2023, Prices from £595,000 Kilmardinny Meadows is an intimate collection of just four bespoke main door villa style apartments, in a quaint haven of serenity within bustling Bearsden and surrounded by an abundance of green space and views you’l..."
"Set within a highly desirable pocket is this architecturally designed detached villa with 3 public, 7 bedrooms, double garage and many features listed. It is convenient Hairmyres Train Station, highly regarded schools, and sports and recreational facilities."
"** OUTSTANDING, UNIQUE PROPERTY WITH AMAZING VIEWS OVER CALDERGLEN AND BEYOND** * Four Bedroom, Five Bathrooms & Stunning Large Family / Dining Size Kitchen * Additional Study - Possible Fifth Bedroom or Family Room * Very Well Maintained Gardens, Large Driveway & Doubl (cont.)"
"Built in the 1930s and located within a sought after Bearsden pocket, 102 Henderland Road is a superb, extended, detached villa, providing excellent family accommodation over two levels."
An exceptional detached house built by renowned Robertson Homes.
"*****NEW FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE £585,000 - HOME REPORT VALUE £620,000***** * A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS PROPERTY SET WITHIN A HIGHLY DESIRABLE AREA * Stunningly Presented, Bright & Truly Special Five/Six Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Luxury Fixtures (cont.)"
"This stunning 5 bed home offers sophisticated family living with a wealth of space. 5 bedrooms all with fitted wardrobes, impressive open plan kitchen, dining and family area with bi-fold patio doors, and 2 ensuite bathrooms. South facing corner plot with outlooks to green space."
"Situated within a sought after Newton Mearns location, Pine Lodge is an architect-designed detached villa, extending to approximately 3000 sqft and situated within extensive gardens of approximately one acre. It would be a wonderful home for a large family, those looking for a self-contained anne..."
Highly energy-efficient Mews-style home up to 1135qft. Open-plan living/dining includes a German-manufactured kitchen & Siemens appliances. 3 spacious bedrooms & designer bathrooms. Ample storage includes integrated wardrobes. Private amenity space and access to adjacent park. Allocated car parking.
"Forming part of the highly popular St Andrews Brae development and located in the heart of Bearsden, this spacious and contemporary four bedroomed detached villa was built by Miller homes in 2013. The property enjoys a prime position set amongst a variety of house styles and comes with the added ..."
Stunning top-floor penthouse apartment offers unrivalled views over Newlands Park. Two bedrooms are provided alongside designer bathrooms within a 1168sqft open plan configuration. Additional amenity via private rooftop terrace and lift access. Highly energy-efficient. Allocated car parking.
This beautifully presented and particularly spacious modern detached villa with lovely private gardens. The property was built circa 1994 and has been particularly well cared for and upgraded with a modern stylish kitchen which incorporates a range of integrated appliances. Offering a ve...
Magnificent sandstone detached villa located within a highly desirable and sought after Burnside address. The property occupies an elevated position and offers breath- taking views across the city towards the Campsie fells. The property itself retains a wealth of period features inc...
"** TRULY UNIQUE & ONE OFF PROPERTY WITH FABULOUS LIVING ACCOMMODATION THROUGHOUT** * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Six Bedroom Detached Family Villa * Three Fantastic Reception Areas, Four Bathrooms & Large Breakfasting Kitchen * Deceptively Spacious Througho (cont.)"
"Situated within this peaceful, leafy address and benefiting from direct views onto Glasgow golf course, a superb detached home set within substantial, immaculate gardens and providing recently refurbished and immaculately presented accommodation over two levels. As the photographs and ..."
Stylish and immaculate upper conversion.
 LOOK at the AMAZING GREEN BAY 4 bedroom DETACHED HOME with large DETACHED GARAGE. LUXURY LIVING within one of the most SOUGHT AFTER LOCATIONS. BEAUTIFULLY DESIGNED HOME which oozes space and sophistication set within beautiful surroundings EXCELLENT DESIGN. BI FOLD DOORS Integrated appliances !! 
"Benefitting from a central position, less than 1 mile from Bearsden Cross - this attractive detached sandstone villa offers well-appointed,  extremely comfortable accommodation that will appeal to growing families in search of preferred school catchment and a convenient setting. Drym..."
"Immaculately presented five bedroom detached CALA home with picturesque, unspoilt views of the countryside. The property is ideal for families and really must be seen to fully appreciate this stunning family home. The property comprises welcoming reception hallway, with spacious WC. There is..."
"An extraordinary 5 apartment lower conversion of a beautiful Arts & Crafts villa built circa 1903 by H.E Clifford, set within corner position gardens in the heart of The Avenues."
"Trade up with Part Exchange + incentives included. A brand new end-terrace home in Glasgow's West End. Enjoy your own driveway, open plan living with bi-fold doors out to private rear garden, composite decking and artificial lawn. Plus designer kitchen & bathrooms and a truly impressive bedroom one."
"West End living with a difference, enjoy an end terrace with driveway, open plan living with bi-fold doors out onto a private rear garden, composite decking and artificial turf. Plus stunning high spec including underfloor heating, and a truly impressive main bedroom."
This original Mactaggart & Mickel detached villa sits enviously on one of the most sought-after locations within Newton Mearns. This home with its single-story side extension shows off a beautiful façade with an immaculate front garden to match and mature level grounds to the rear. 
"Apartment 92 Type D, is a stylish 2 bedroom apartment located on the second floor benefiting from South facing balcony, lift access and allocated parking. "
"**FABULOUS SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME, WITH RURAL VIEWS** * Very Well Presented & Extensively Extended Detached Family Home In Great Location * Fabulous Multi Functional Floorplan Over Two Floors- Viewings Required To Appreciate * Three Large Receptions Rooms & Three Bathroom (cont.)"
"** AN IMPRESSIVE AND SPACIOUS PROPERTY LOCATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER AREA ** * Beautiful Five Bedroom Detached Villa in Exclusive Residential Pocket of Stewartfield * Multi Car Driveway and Double Garage * Large Corner Plot, with Rear Conservatory, Mature Established Garden (cont.)"
"This is a truly impressive family home that feels generous and luxurious at every turn, from its imposing external appearance to the large and bright living areas and grand master bedroom suite."
"A truly immaculate villa fully refurbished to the highest standard by the current vendor. This superb property offers spacious family accommodation with an attached cottage set within 0.6 acres of garden grounds, within the sought after village of Neilston. "
"With its 4 bedrooms, the charming Stewart is perfect for anyone looking for extra space."
"Set within outstanding landscaped private garden grounds, a creatively designed split level detached house commanding wonderful open aspects."
"Falling within the school catchment area for both Bearsden Primary and Bearsden Academy, 14 Rose Dene Drive is a stunning, seven apartment family home, situated in the popular Kilmardinny Gait development."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a main door, six apartment, upper duplex conversion within a detached Victorian period building situated within the desirable Thorn district of Bearsden."
"Benefitting from a peaceful setting within a desirable address near the edge of Milngavie, this exceptional professionally extended detached villa offers extremely comfortable, versatile accommodation and benefits from paved driveway, impressive garden grounds and detached garage - a perfect h..."
"* Nearly New, Exquisite, Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Fantastic Location Boasting Modern & Neutral Decor Throughout - Walk In Condition * Spacious L-Shaped Family & Dining Room With Open Plan Stunningly Fitted Kitchen * Separate Lounge, Four Bathrooms, Five Gene (cont.)"
"***** A SIMPLY STUNNING AND STYLISH HOME IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA ***** * Bright & Spacious Four/Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Highly Specified, Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Heating & Double Glazing Throughout, Photovoltaic Solar Panels * Sp (cont.)"
"Hello, are you looking for an absolutely stunning 5 bedroom detached, 3 storey townhouse with integral single garage in the new Glenburn Manor Estate, Robertson Homes development in Jackton, close to East Kilbride? Would you like it to be beautifully finished throughout with an elegant (cont.)"
"NEW BUILD, detached home with GARAGE. Spacious KITCHEN/FAMILY AREA and LARGE LOUNGE both with doors to TURFED GARDEN. Ground floor also features a UTILITY ROOM, DINING ROOM and W.C. The first floor includes 5 BEDROOMS all with integrated wardrobe. Bedrooms 1 and 2 have EN-SUITES."
"*A TRULY IMPRESSIVE, SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME SET IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION * Bright & Deceptively Spacious Four/Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Fabulous Rear Facing Open Plan Kitch (cont.)"
"This stylish Top Floor Flat is situated within a convenient and sought-after locale. The property is presented in walk-in condition and would be an ideal purchase for a first-time buyer, young couple or buy-to-let. Internally comprising hall, lounge with working fireplace and elevated views, inst..."
"Magnificent Grade B listed country home with circa 3 acres of beautifully presented garden grounds. Enjoying a delightful position within locally admired Jackton, this sizeable period property is of a size and style seldom available within the open market and should prove of interest t..."
"This extended Traditional detached villa with double garage and multiple car driveway is within East Kilbride Village Conservation Area. It is close to the train station, Town Centre, Kingsgate Retail Park, primary and secondary schools and sports and recreational facilities."
"- Next to Forge Shopping Centre - Development Opportunity - Potential for residential, hotel, retail, carehome etc. - 0.55 acres - Currently car parking space - 15min walk to Duke Sreet Station - Offers Invited"
"The Darroch is a beautifully spacious 5 bedroom detached home, boasting an open plan kitchen, dining and family room with bi-fold doors our to your private rear garden, complete with feature island and integrated appliances. Making the perfect space to entertain family and friends"
"22 School Drive is a three bedroom mid terrace mews property, part of the Cedar Collection at Jordanhill Park."
"Trade up with Part Exchange. A brand new end-terrace home in Glasgow's West End. Enjoy your own driveway, open plan living with bi-fold doors out to private rear garden, composite decking and artificial lawn. Plus designer kitchen & bathrooms and a truly impressive bedroom one."
"This magnificent, detached villa is the largest style built by Mactaggart and Meikle in Polnoon, their award-winning site within the ever-popular village of Eaglesham, ideally placed for highly regarded East Renfrewshire schooling. This particular property enjoys an enviable position ..."
Modern Thomas Bone apartments. This beautiful three bedroom apartment boasts 3 generously sized bedrooms all including built in wardrobes as standard with bedroom one benefitting from an ensuite. With plenty of storage and a separate utility room this is the perfect apartment to grow into
Superb family home in desirable location.
"This impressive, detached, 5 bedroom villa, built by Cala, enjoys aspects towards The Campsies and parkland to the rear. Presented in impeccable order the property has been meticulously maintained and upgraded offering exceptional family accommodation. Accommodation comprises: <..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after addresses in Bearsden, this three bedroom main door conversion enjoys a stunning private garden to the rear and is a short stroll from all the amenities on offer at Bearsden Cross.Forming the entire first floor of a commanding Victorian sandstone..."
"The ground floor is the perfect family space with an open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and a spacious lounge/dining room; both featuring French doors opening out to the back garden.
 
A useful utility room is located in the kitchen, helping to keep the house clutter-free.
 
Downstairs also benefit..."
"An impressive 5 bedroom family home, the Helmsdale has lots of space to adapt to busy family life. LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER, Separate lounge, integrated garage and lots of storage. Up stairs there are 5 bedrooms, TWO WITH EN-SUITES. And a family bathroom with separate shower cubicle."
"Discover the Crichton, Cala's stunning 4-bedroom home designed with modern living in mind, enjoying a spacious open plan kitchen with integrated appliances and bi-fold doors out to the rear garden. Trade up with Cala's Part Exchange service, making your dream move easier than you think. "
Modern Thomas Bone apartments. This beautiful three bedroom apartment boasts 3 generously sized bedrooms all including built in wardrobes as standard with bedroom one benefitting from an ensuite. With plenty of storage and a separate utility room this is the perfect apartment to grow into.
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Sunningdale is a superb 5-bedroom family home which benefits from generous, open-plan living with French doors, a utility room, a front-facing living room and an integral double garage. "
Thomas Bone building - This beautiful three bedroom apartment boasts 3 generously sized bedrooms all including built in wardrobes as standard with bedroom one benefitting from an ensuite. With plenty of storage and a separate utility room this is the perfect apartment to grow into. 
Benefitting from a prime location in Dowanhill and offering substantial family accommodation over two levels - this beautiful four bedroom lower conversion is presented in stunning order throughout and as such will appeal to a broad spectrum of buyers. Marchmont Terrace is an exquisite address...
"This fabulous family home has been greatly enhanced by the present owners, including the installation of a breath-taking new kitchen. The property offers a practical layout of generous apartments. Early viewing is advised to fully appreciate the standard and scale of the accommodation on offer.  ..."
"A spacious detached house enjoying an idyllic, woodland setting of approximately 1.8 acres or thereby."
"A beautifully presented and extended, detached villa, located within this sought after residential enclave of Newton Mearns."
"HOME REPORT £480,000 - Nestled within arguably one of the finest addresses in Craigmarloch, this impressive five bedroom Cala Home built on the “Eighteen” development which is small established development across from Dullatur Golf Club.  This stunning detached property promises an outstanding fa..."
"137 Maxwell Avenue is a stunning seven apartment blonde sandstone semi detached house, situated on an elevated plot, offering fabulous views over Glasgow."
A breathtaking penthouse with enviable views over The River Clyde and beyond.
Superb penthouse apartment in iconic building
"THE ARGYLL: Fantastic 4-bed duplex apartment. Extensive storage space in entrance hallway, stunning fully fitted kitchen. Main bedroom with double wardrobe and Jack-and-Jill bathroom/en-suite with separate shower. Upstairs bedrooms feature Velux Cabrio window systems, which open up as a balcony."
"This truly impressive 2 bed apartment within the historic David Stow building offers luxury West End living. With ceiling heights of up to 3.8m, and a West facing position plus double height windows. Excellent storage + separate utility. Interiors package included so this home is ready for you."
"Brand new apartments, refurbished from the historic David Stow teaching school. Featuring a generous living and dining area, streamlined kitchen with integrated appliances and built in wardrobes in the bedroom, this modern city apartment is as functional as it is stylish."
"The Peploe by Dickie & Moore is a prestigious 4/5-bedroom detached villa with driveway, detached garage, and many additional features. The area is convenient for Hairmyres Train Station, regular bus services, and the M77 motorway network."
"Rarely available, two storey, detached bungalow located in the Crossmyloof district in Glasgow’s Southside, between Pollokshields and Shawlands. This property offers a wealth of features and is in walk-in condition. Also enjoying easily maintained gardens and a handy location close to excellent t..."
Coming Soon - Claremont Apartments is a bespoke collection of 10 luxury 2 bed apartments and 4 bed duplexes situated within the Park District of Glasgow close to Kelvingrove Park.
"* Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious, Four Bedroom Detached Home * Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Lounge, Separate Dining Room & Large Rear Conservatory * Modern Kitchen With Breakfasting Area & Separate Utility (cont.)"
An exciting development of two semi detached architect designed family homes by MLB Properties boasting exceptional specification with light and open living spaces in an outstanding school catchment. Specification includes:- - Tiling by Porcelanosa - Contemporary Kitche...
"The Burgess is a spacious family home which features an open-plan kitchen, breakfast and dining area with utility room and French doors to the rear garden. Upstairs, there are 4 large double bedrooms and 2 en suite shower rooms."
"THE STIRLING. A stunning 3-bedroom duplex apartment. Kitchen opens into the large open lounge.The main bedroom has a fitted wardrobe, dressing area and a Jack-and-Jill bathroom/en-suite with separate shower. The upstairs hallway features a GENEROUS area that can be used for home working."
Two-bedroom duplex apartment contained within Victorian sandstone villa. Conserved period features complement luxury specification & high energy performance. German-manufactured kitchen & Siemens appliances. Ample storage includes integrated wardrobes. Designer bathrooms. Allocated parking. 
"A larger style, traditional detached house set within impressive garden grounds with detached double garage."
A truly unique family home in a prestigious Netherlee address offering masses of traditionally built accommodation always in high demand with discerning family buyers. This especially spacious sandstone end terraced villa offers substantial accommodation with the pleasing layout on offer providin...
"Forming part of the much sought after Bishops Meadow development, is this beautifully finished and highly versatile detached villa. The property offers ideal accommodation, thoughtfully designed to meet the demands of modern family life.  EPC BAND - B"
An exceptional 2 bedroom duplex apartment featuring smart pocket doors providing separation between the spacious living area and dining kitchen with an additional mezzanine gallery room.
"50% OFF LBTT!!* Five South is a beautiful development of 56, two and three bedroom apartments and penthouses within the sought-after locale of Giffnock in Glasgow's Southside. 3 bedroom ground floor executive apartment with private balcony. Call now for more information.*Plot 26 -T's & C's apply. "
"A stunning five bed detached home in Bothwell, Immaculate condition, built only 18 months ago, with incredible views of the Clyde"
"Immediately impressive and individual, this beautifully presented DETACHED VILLA built circa 1976, comprises a meticulously maintained family home. Situated adjacent to Peel Park with uninterrupted aspects, the property is just a short walk to Cowgate offering a wide and varied range of shopping ..."
"Rarely available 3 bedroom detached, beautifully set in a highly sought after location - Bearsden, Stunning Garden with private access to woodlands, Easy Attic Conversion opportunity"
"** EXTENSIVE, STUNNING PROPERTY IN SEMI RURAL SETTING ** * Beautifully Presented & Spacious, Executive Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Highly Sought After Residential Location - High Quality Fixtures & Finishes Throughout * Spacious Lounge, Fabulous Open Plan Kitc (cont.)"
Attractive area of woodland in a rural yet accessible location close to Neilston on the outskirts of Glasgow. The woodland extends to about 43.98 Ha (108.67 Acres). For sale as a whole or in 3 lots.
"A fabulous split level bungalow with spectacular views, located in this quiet pocket of Pollokshields. Offerings generous family accommodation over two levels, along with scope to extend further into the loft to create an extra level, this impressive family home really is a must for vi..."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Burgess is a 4-bedroom family home which presents an open-plan kitchen, breakfast and dining area, four spacious double bedroom and two en suite shower rooms. The home also benefits from an integral double garage."
"This end-terrace townhouse features an open-plan kitchen, living dining area which leads to the spacious garden, a separate utility room ideal for family life and 4 double bedrooms."
"4 bedroom home. Open plan LIVING ROOM. DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLDS as well as GARAGE. Main bedroom complete with EN SUITE. "
A beautiful semi-detached villa offering generous family accommodation over three levels that has undergone thoughtful and sympathetic refurbishment. A must for viewing in order to be appreciated. The house is approached via spacious driveway with ample parking for several cars with tw...
A handsome traditional home set amidst considerable garden grounds and boasting an ideal position within the popular conservation village of Eaglesham with impressive views captured to the front over the Eaglesham 'Orry'.
"The Elmford offers instant appeal with the LOUNGE, and KITCHEN DINING offering the flexibility to form one single space. Sharing the downstairs is a LAUNDRY ROOM, downstairs WC and DOUBLE GARAGE. Upstairs, TWO BEDROOMS ARE EN-SUITE, and a WALK-IN DRESSING AREA adds a luxury touch to the principal..."
"*A UNIQUE AND EXPANSIVE HOME SURROUNDED BY NATURE * Stunningly Presented, Bright & Spacious Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Formed Over Four Floors Offering A Flexible Multi Purpose Layout * 5 Spacious Bedrooms & Three Bathrooms (Main, En-Suite & Shower Room) < (cont.)"
"Spacious, highly energy-efficient two-bedroom apartment with views across Newlands Park. Luxury specification as standard including German-manufactured Leicht kitchen with Siemens appliances and designer bathrooms. Integrated storage and wardrobes. Lifft accessibility. Allocated car parking."
"Occupying a fantastic plot on this attractive tree lined avenue, this stunning detached bungalow has been meticulously upgraded and thoughtfully extended in recent years. EPC BAND - D"
A distinctive and unique four bedroom detached family home enjoying a corner plot within what is considered one of the most sought-after and prestigious areas in Stepps and with views from the first floor bedroom and roof garden to the Campsies and with ease of access to the M80 interchange.
"SHOWHOME AVAILABLE. This impressive 3-bedroom duplex apartment offers chic city living at its best. Set over two levels, with a truly impressive open plan kitchen, dining & living area - plus separte utility and pantry. Incentives available."
"The Sloan is a 4-bedroom townhouse at Pacific Quay, designed with modern living in mind, enjoying a designer kitchen with appliances & separate utility room. The open plan kitchen, dining and living area leads out to the private rear garden, complete with artificial lawn and slabbed patio area"
"The Balloch is a stunning family home, perfect for those looking for extra space.
 
The heart of the home is the open-plan kitchen/dining area including a cosy family area, it's the perfect space for entertaining friends & family.
 
Along the hallway you'll discover your comfortable lounge, extra..."
Plot 46 - FIRST FLOOR - TWO double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes. EN-SUITE to the principal bedroom. UTILITY. Private BALCONY. 970 sq ft!
"The Braemar is an impressive family home. The open-plan kitchen diner and family area provides a great space to entertain guests with French doors opening onto the garden via a glazed bay. There's also an adjoining utility area, perfect for storage.
 
Along the hallway, the comfortable lounge pro..."
"This stunning family home has a light and spacious lounge with a bay window providing a great space for all the family.
 
The open-plan kitchen offers dining and family areas with walk in bay and French doors that open onto the your private garden. A ground floor home office is the perfect soluti..."
"Traditional sandstone one bedroom first floor flat located within the heart of Mount Florida which provides excellent transport links to Glasgow City Centre and surrounding areas. Access to the property consists of a secured entry phone system, which in turn leads to a communal stairwell gi..."
This wonderful townhouse by Cala Homes enjoys a fantastic position with the highly regarded Jocelin Gardens development in  Bishopbriggs. Presented in fabulous condition throughout this property displays high quality finishes which we come to expect from this particular builder.Further benef...
• Stunning five bedroomed detached villa • Completely refurbished and remodelled since first built • Most amazing attic conversion – now a cinema room/double bedroom • Highly adaptable internal accommodation • Eight principal apartments (inc. gar...
"A lovely, detached house within the conservation centre of Eaglesham and set in splendid, larger style garden grounds."
An extended modern Detached Villa in en excellent location close to local amenities including primary and secondary schools. Spacious apartments throughout and viewing highly recommended.
7 Bedroom property with 10 person HMO licence
This split level upper conversion is quite extraordinary and delivers an opportunity to customise according to taste.
"The Crombie is a detached family home featuring fantastic open-plan living.
 
The centre of this home is the open-plan family kitchen. With French doors to the back garden - perfect for keeping the family together.
 
Downstairs you'll also find your bright & spacious lounge with plenty of space t..."
"Explore the Braemar, featuring an open-plan kitchen with family/breakfast area that opens onto the garden via French doors. Entertain your guests here or the spacious lounge is spacious offering you a peaceful retreat to relax in the evening. Whilst the study offers a space to work from home. ..."
"Five South is a beautiful development of 56, two and three bedroom energy efficient apartments and penthouses within the sought-after locale of Giffnock in Glasgow's Southside. Call now for more information. - PLOT 42 - GROUND FLOOR with PRIVATE BALCONY."
"The CASTLEFORD - FIVE-BEDROOM DETACHED home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, FAMILY and DINING AREA, featuring FRENCH DOORS to GARDEN. A SEPARATE LOUNGE, is ideal for formal entertaining, with the DEDICATED STUDY ideal for home working. The LAUNDRY room aids household management. Upstairs, two of the fiv..."
"Allen & Harris are delighted to offer to the market this stunning three bedroom extended detached villa located within the popular area of Bishopbriggs, Glasgow, This property would ideally suit younger and older families alike and early viewing is highly advised to avoid any disappointment."
"Located within this highly regarded cul-de-sac of larger style detached family homes within the ever-popular West Craigs development, this executive 6-bedroom detached villa offers excellent, versatile living space. This impressive property is a wonderful, modified family home whilst se..."
"***PLEASE SEE OUR PROFESSIONAL HD VIDEO*** Beautifully presented executive detached family home, occupying probably the biggest and most sought after plot within this highly regarded development in Mount Vernon. Offering all the conveniences and flowing space which is perfect for modern fami..."
Plot 46 is a spacious 3-bedroom apartment located on the 5th floor at Holmwood Heights
"* Beautifully Presented & Spacious, Larger Style Six Bedroom Executive Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition Boasting Quality Finishings Throughout - Viewings Essential * Spacious Lounge, Separate Dining Room, Large Open Plan Breakfasting Kitchen, Separate Utility * (cont.)"
"• Three bedroomed detached villa by Stewart Milne • Beautifully presented throughout • Highly popular, family friendly address in North Baljaffray • Three bedrooms, lounge, dining room, sun room, two baths • Super rear garden set over three principal..."
"Kirkland Estate Agents proudly to present to the market this truly amazing ground floor tenement flat in the sought after locale of Glasgow Street, Hillhead, Glasgow. "
"A lovely, detached house by Cala set within enclosed level gardens with driveway and garage."
The Thomas Bone apartments - This beautiful three bedroom apartment boasts 2 generously sized bedrooms all including built in wardrobes as standard with bedroom one benefitting from an ensuite. With plenty of storage and a separate utility room this is the perfect apartment to grow into. 
"Built by David Wilson, this modern, four bedroom detached family home offers excellent accommodation over two levels. The accommodation comprises; entrance hallway with WC, front facing lounge with bay window, large dining kitchen with a good range of floor, wall-mounted units and integrated ap..."
"The Cullen is a stylish four bedroom home.
 
The ground floor offers a generous lounge, an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the garden, a utility room and WC.
 
Upstairs you'll find all four double bedrooms, with the main bedroom featuring an en suite shower room. The family bat..."
"NOW WITH PART EXCHANGE OR A 5% MORTGAGE DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION PAID WORTH £20,550!"
"Now available with PART EXCHANGE or a 5% MORTGAGE DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WORTH £20,550!"
"An attractive ground floor 'Quarter villa' boasting the John Dickie seal of build quality and set within an ever popular modern Giffnock development. Delivering a bright and notably spacious interior the accommodation comprises formal reception hallway with storage off, spacious lounge, compre..."
"**UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON MARKET, FIXED PRICE, £10K BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE**This detached villa has been extended to create a fabulous family home. The property boasts four generous double bedrooms in addition to the spacious living accommodation. The house is ideally positioned close to loca..."
"This beautiful, detached red sandstone villa with an elevated position retains a wealth of character and is set amidst enclosed private gardens within a much admired and seldom available address. Offering characterful and spacious apartments with high ceilings, this wonderful family home..."
"A stylish mid-terrace townhouse featuring open-plan kitchen, living, dining area which leads to a spacious garden. A separate utility room, principal en suite with private balcony."
"The Maxwell is a stunning 3-bedroom home close to Finnieston & the SEC, boasting a designer kitchen with integrated appliance and master bedroom with walk-on balcony. Move in this Spring and look forward to summer in your brand new Cala Home in the city."
"This rarely available, five apartment mid terraced villa is located in central Broomhill and offers bright and spacious accommodation over two levels with large gardens, South facing views, and a detached garage. Broomhill is an extremely popular area of the West End and has a collection of l..."
"The Balloch is a beautifully presented family home, fully designed for flexible living.
 
As soon as you enter the home, you will find the study - great for working from home. Across the hallway the spacious and welcoming lounge is the perfect spot for relaxing after a long day.
 
The open-plan k..."
"Highly energy-efficient, first-floor apartment with Juliet balcony and park views. Open-plan living/dining complete with German-manufactured kitchen with Siemens appliances. Two bedrooms include master-ensuite and designer finishes to bathrooms. Integrated storage. Allocated parking provision."
"This 4 bedroom home with detached single garage is perfect for flexible family living. 
 
Boasting a large lounge and impressive kitchen/dining/family room ideal for entertaining. There is also a handy study and utility space. 
 
Upstairs, the main bedroom features an en suite shower room and the..."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** BRAND NEW and CHAIN FREE* The Avondale is a 4-bedroom family home which benefits from a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area along with an impressive master bedroom with en-suite, as well as a Juliette balcony."
"A well-presented four bedroom detached villa by Miller Homes, set on a superb corner plot and professionally extended, the home provides excellent family accommodation across two spacious levels. Located within the quiet residential area of Waterside Avenue, just off Barrhead Road and close to Me..."
"The Lauder is an exceptional looking 4 BEDROOM HOME with lots of detail and architectural interest that really sets it apart. It includes a large BREAKFASTING KITCHEN, separate dining room, STUDY and double aspect lounge. Upstairs there are 4 BEDROOMS, bathroom and EN-SUITE."
"The Crombie is an impressive four bedroom detached home with an integral garage.
 
The entrance hallway takes you to the front-facing lounge and to the back of the house where you'll find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with a family area. 
 
A utility room and WC are located just off the kitch..."
"The Oakmont is an expansive family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area with French doors to the rear garden and a utility room/clock room. Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms with an en suite and fitted wardrobe to bedroom 1 plus a modern family bathroom "
"Set on a generous plot in this popular location, this property has been extended to provide spacious and versatile accommodation. The property sits within the catchment area of prestigious schools at primary and secondary levels. EPC - C"
"Offering great kerb appeal, the 4 bedroom Maxwell has plenty of space for the whole family."
"Situated within a highly desirable pocket within Gardenhall is this architecturally designed four-bedroom split-level detached villa. It is convenient for all local amenities, highly regarded schools, Hairmyres Train Station, regular bus services and motorway network. "
Thomas Bone apartments now available. This beautiful two bedroom apartment boasts 2 generously sized bedrooms all including built in wardrobes as standard with bedroom one benefitting from an ensuite. With plenty of storage and a separate utility room this is the perfect apartment to grow into.
"• An extended Detached House • Built in 1970 by John Lawrence • Extended both 1976 and 1987 • Two/three Public Rooms, three Bedrooms • Two Shower Rooms plus Ensuite Bathroom • Smart Kitchen, Box room, Utility • Floored and lined Att..."
"This beautiful four bedroom home enjoys plenty of space for all your family. 
 
The modern open plan kitchen diner is the perfect space for your family with French doors opening onto the garden. 
 
The separate lounge features plenty of space to relax for nights at home.
 
Upstairs you will find ..."
"The Cullen is a stylish four bedroom home. The ground floor offers a generous lounge, an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the garden, a utility room and WC. All four double bedrooms are on the first floor, with the main bedroom featuring an en suite shower room. A home office/..."
"The Crombie is a thoughtfully laid out 4 bedroom detached home - perfect for families.
 
The hub of the home is the open-plan kitchen/breakfast area and a spacious lounge with French doors leading to the garden - providing the perfect space for entertaining.
 
Through to the spacious lounge, this..."
"The Campbell is a stunning detached home, ideal for growing families looking for extra space.
 
The ground floor features a spacious open-plan kitchen with dining/family area and French doors leading into a fully turfed garden. You will also find a large utility room and spacious lounge, perfect ..."
"Available with an entirely flexible entry date, Ruthven Avenue is a rarely available three bedroom, extended semi-detached bungalow located within one of Giffnock's more desirable residential pockets. Set amidst beautiful, landscaped gardens which deliver a superb child and pet friendly proposit..."
"The Crombie is a thoughtfully laid out home - perfect for families.
 
The hub of the home is the open-plan kitchen/breakfast area and a spacious lounge with French doors leading to the garden - providing the perfect space for entertaining.
 
Through to the spacious lounge, this is the perfect spa..."
"The Cullen is the perfect family home. Featuring a large open-plan kitchen and dining room with French doors onto the garden. There is also a downstairs WC and handy utility room. while your spacious lounge is the ideal place to relax with the family. Upstairs, you will find 4 bedrooms, with an..."
"The Falkland is a stunning home ideal for families with the inside designed very much for modern family life.
 
The hub of the home is the expansive open-plan kitchen, which has dining and family areas with French doors to the garden and a separate utility room. 
 
The spacious lounge features an..."
"Now available with PART EXCHANGE or a 5% MORTGAGE DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WORTH £19,750!"
An exceptional two bedroom duplex apartment set within this award winning Belmont West Church conversion.
"Now available with PART EXCHANGE or a 5% MORTGAGE DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WORTH £19,500!"
"** Open 7 Days A Week *** * Home Report Available on Our Website Homeconnexions.co.uk * * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Five Bedroom Executive Detached Family Home * Fantastic Location Boasting Modern & Neutral Decor Throughout - Walk In Condition * Sp (cont.)"
"This modern four bedroom home makes great use of space and light. 
 
On the ground floor you will find a bright open-plan kitchen with French doors to the garden and a separate utility room. The spacious lounge is a perfect place to relax, while great storage space, helps keep everything neat and..."
"The Campbell is a stunning detached family home.
 
With a light and airy feeling thanks to its large windows, the ground floor offers a generously sized open-plan kitchen with family and dining areas, featuring French doors which open onto the back garden.
 
There is also a utility room, and spac..."
"Set around a central courtyard, this four bedroom, stone built, converted steading offers well proportioned and versatile accommodation with a sizeable garden and incredible panoramic views over neighbouring countryside.The property is formed over two levels and extends to over 3,000 sq..."
An immaculately presented four bedroom-duplex conversion occupying the first and second floors of this handsome blonde sandstone building located in the incredibly popular and sought-after conservation District of Hillhead Tastefully presented and of excellent proportion the accommodat...
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Victoria is a four bedroom detached family home that boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with an impressive master bedroom to the upper floor. *10 years NHBC warranty*"
"The Balloch is a beautifully presented family home, fully designed for flexible living.
 
As you enter the home, you will find a separate study - great for working from home and spacious lounge.
 
Through to the open-plan kitchen and dining area there's glazed French doors to the back garden and ..."
"• Impressive red sandstone fronted semi-detached villa by John MacDonald • Originally constructed in the 1930’s and located in Bearsden’s Burnbrae district • Three bedrooms, lounge, dining/sitting room, kitchen, family bathroom • Highly useful floor..."
"Beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious, four bedroomed, detached villa with large conservatory added to the rear and enjoying a delightful, cul-de-sac position with a high degree of privacy ..."
"The LIMEWOOD is as practical as it is stylish. From the elegant LOUNGE, to the OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINING ROOM forming a natural hub for family life. Upstairs offers space for a HOME OFFICE. The principal bedroom features BUILT-IN WARDROBES, while a private shower room shared by two bedrooms means ..."
Set within the restored and reimagined Steiner School this beautiful duplex apartment accessed from the Secret Courtyard Garden is the essence of luxury west end living.
"The Dean is an impressive detached home offering an open-plan kitchen with a dining and utility room. Benefit from French doors leading out onto the garden from the kitchen. You will also find a hands downstairs WC. Along the hall you'll find your spacious lounge, offering plenty of space to rel..."
" Superb FAMILY HOME with open plan kitchen and INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, GENEROUS BEDROOMS, and an INTERNAL GARAGE store"
"""QUIET LOCATION CLOSE TO TRANSPORT AND AMENITIES WITH SPECTACULAR VIEWS"" A spectacular first-floor luxury apartment within locally admired Phillipshill sure to delight all who view. This exceptional flat enjoys the premier position within the building with panora..."
"Nestled in the sought after 'Moray View' (Barratt Homes) development, you'll find this immaculate detached villa offering you everything you need for family living. Highlights include open plan kitchen/living, utility room, 3 WC's, patio (& rear door) access to garden, integrated garage & much more."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Avondale boasts an open-plan kitchen and dining area with an adjoining utility room, a front-facing living room, and an integral garage. Upstairs, there are two en-suite shower rooms, a Juliette balcony to bedroom 1."
Enjoying an excellent position in the highly regarded Kings Meadow development this detached villa offers wonderful family accommodation over two levels. The professional garage conversion provides and additional reception space/bedroom 5. The property is within the catchment area for Bishopbrigg...
"** Unexpectedly back on the market**Plot 41 is an open-plan, 4th floor, 3 bedroom apartment at the stunning new development Holmwood Heights."
"WOW ! THE EDMONTON IS HERE! OUTSTANDING & STUNNINGLY BEAUTIFUL LARGE 4 BEDROOM HOME. Lounge, HOME OFFICE, LARGE Dining kitchen/living, BI FOLD DOORS, UTILITY ROOM, WC,4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, TWO EN-SUITES, Integrated APPLIANCES, VANITY, PORCELANOSA WALL TILING, Large Detached Garage.MONOBLOC DRIVEWAY"
"WOW ! THE EDMONTON IS HERE! OUTSTANDING & STUNNINGLY BEAUTIFUL LARGE 4 BEDROOM HOME. Lounge, HOME OFFICE, LARGE Dining kitchen/living area with BI FOLD DOORS, UTILITY ROOM, WC,4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, TWO EN-SUITES, Integrated APPLIANCES, VANITY, PORCELANOSA WALL TILING, Large Detached Garage ,Monobloc DW"
"***SAVE £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Pinehurst is a spacious chain free home with generous ground floor living accommodation, including an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area with French doors to the rear garden and a utility room."
"An extended traditional mid terrace villa set in the heart of Strathbungo, offering deceptively spacious accommodation with a flexible layout."
"Situated in the award-winning Burngreen Brae development in Kilsyth, this large 5 bedroom detached villa is the first property to come onto the open market since the Stanehill Avenue cul-de-sac was built just over 5 years ago. This street was reserved for the largest properties on the developmen..."
"Please Call Susan on for more information. FORMER SHOW HOME This is a great looking, well designed four bedroom home. The hallway has a spacious and welcoming feel and leads to the loung..."
"A substantially extended & significantly improved, 4/5 bedroomed home, sitting on a neatly laid out garden plot in one of Cambuslang’s premier addresses.  EPC – D."
"Luxury upper duplex apartment enjoys extravagant ceiling heights, period windows and exceptional specification with access to the beautifully landscaped secret courtyard garden."
"An impressive, detached villa set within a sought-after residential development."
"A lovely sized detached family home.
 
The Dunbar has plenty of space for all the family with an open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors that lead out to the garden and a large lounge.
 
On the first floor you'll find four double bedrooms, an en suite to the main bedroom and a family ..."
"The Dean is a stunning family home - perfect for flexible living.
 
With a spacious kitchen/dining area which is great for entertaining friends & family - French doors flood the room with light and your separate utility space will help keep everything neat and tidy.
 
Your spacious lounge is the ..."
An attractive traditional sandstone mid terrace villa set within the much admired district of Strathbungo. The accommodation throughout retains a wealth of traditional features with contemporary fixtures and fittings. The property sits within landscaped private front and rear enclosed gardens wh...
"An extended detached family villa located towards the end of a desired address with amazing corner position, ideally suit the professional family market. Early viewing highly advised!"
"The Cedarwood- A substantial FOUR BEDROOM home, with FAMILY KITCHEN and GARDEN DINING ROOM. Featuring a PRIVATE STUDY and SEPARATE LOUNGE there is also striking PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and generously sized DRESSING ROOM. Bedroom 2 also features an en-suite, making this home as practical a..."
Carol Ann & Narindar at Keller Williams are exciting to bring to the market this eight apartment duplex in Pollockshields the heart of Glasgow’s southside. Within a minute walk from Nithsdale Road & Strathbungo this family home will appeal to all!
Well presented main door four bedroom apartment within this traditional sandstone building originally dating from 1900 or thereby. Internally the property offers flexible accommodation over 5 principal apartments formed all on one level. A number of period features are retained most notably origi...
"A bright and well presented semi detached villa located within this sought after residential pocket of Newton Mearns, yet only a short walk to local shops at the Broom and nearby transport links on Mearns Road."
"Seldom available, a well presented three bedroom home overlooking The Orry, set within the historic conservation village of Eaglesham, close to local amenities."
A rare opertunity to own a fantastic and unique family home offering countryside views and spacious open plan living!
Set amidst a substantial plot within a prestigious Bothwell ‘Glebe’ address lies the beautifully renovated three bedroom detached bungalow. This home presents a true ‘one off’ chance to own an enviable position on almost an acre of land.  The accommodation in full comprises; welcoming r...
Located in the heart of Bothwell Village lies this immaculately presented and seldom available two bedroom ground floor conversion. This stunning traditional sandstone home full of original features offers versatile accommodation over one level with bright and spacious room sizes. The current own...
"Discover the Boclair designed for flexible family living.
 
On the ground floor of this home you will discover an open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors onto the garden ideal for entertaining guests on the weekends. In the evening the lounge is the ideal place to relax.
 
As you head..."
"The Lockwood – An elegant DETACHED four-bedroom home. With OPEN PLAN family living in mind, the kitchen/dining room features FRENCH DOORS to the GARDEN. The SEPARATE lounge is perfect for unwinding. Upstairs is the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE. BEDROOM 2 with EN-SUITE and HOME OFFICE SPACE. GA..."
"A rare opportunity arises to acquire within a premier address, a beautifully presented and spacious semi detached chalet style villa. The home benefits from an excellent blend of retained 'period' and modern feature throughout and will undoubtedly appeal to both the family and professional market..."
"The Dunbar is a spacious family home.
 
With a large lounge at the front and an open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the private back garden, this is the perfect home for those looking for a little more space.
 
Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms with the main bedroom bene..."
"Final apartment remaining at Beechwood Lea, a large two bedroom ground floor apartment. Set within the affluent village of Thorntonhall offering views over the rolling countryside."
"* BRAND NEW HOME, SEMI-RURAL LOCATION, FANTASTIC TRANSPORT LINKS *** OPEN 7 Days A Week *** * Assisted Moves Available * Orkney Style New Home * Fantastic Open Plan Kitchen/Dining Area Ideal For Entertaining * Four Double Bedrooms Bedroom One With En-Sui (cont.)"
"With its traditional exterior, the 4 bedroom detached Hume is charming both inside and out."
"**NEW FIXED PRICE** Generously proportioned, four bedroomed, detached villa enjoying a delightful plot with far reaching views from the rear and set within this sought-after development, on..."
"A wonderful, highly developed four-bedroom semi-detached villa with exquisite views over Cathcart Castle Golf Course, Glasgow City and the Campsie hills beyond.   Reimagined, reconfigured and redesigned this home truly stands out as unique, offering fantastic family accommodation ..."
"Positioned in sizable garden grounds on King's Park Avenue, this spacious family home originally dates from the early 1900s. The property has been well maintained by the current owner and boasts a number of period features."
First-floor 2-bedroom apartment contained within Victorian sandstone villa. Period features complement luxury specification & high energy performance. German-manufactured kitchen & Siemens appliances. Ample storage includes integrated wardrobes. Designer bathrooms. Parking & communal grounds.
"An immaculately presented modern detached villa which has been altered and upgraded throughout and is located within this admired and sought after development. The home was built by Miller Homes in the style of the ""Humber"" featuring a large master bedroom with a dressing room. The prope..."
"**BEAUTIFULLY EXTENDED UNIQUE FAMILY HOME** * Fantastic Flexible Family Living & Multi Purpose Floorplan * Spacious Family Room & Additional Lounge/Bedroom Four * Modern Fitted Kitchen & Open Plan Dining Room * Separate Utility Room & Three Bathrooms, Great Stora (cont.)"
"Accessed from the beautifully landscaped secret courtyard garden this two bedroom duplex apartment enjoys extravagant ceiling heights, period windows and exceptional specification."
"* Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Highly Sought After Stewartfield Location - Viewings Essential * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Lounge & Dining Area, Modern Fi (cont.)"
"The Dunbar is a stylish detached home with an integral garage. The entrance hallway leads to the spacious lounge at front of the home. Further along the hall you will find the open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden.
 
Downstairs also hosts a WC and utility room of..."
"PRICE REDUCTION. Macallans bring to the market this lovely red sandstone lower quarter villa situated on one of Burnside's most sought after streets. Accommodation comprising of Lounge, Sitting/Dining Room, bedroom, kitchen and bathroom. Early viewing is recommended."
"The OAKWOOD – FOUR-BEDROOM DETACHED home with DEDICATED STUDY and SEPARATE LOUNGE. The OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining with separate LAUNDRY room is ideal for household management. The FRENCH DOORS to garden are perfect to enjoy the summer months. This home is filled with premium features, including PRI..."
"***SAVE UP TO £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Oakmont is an impressive, detached family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with four spacious double bedrooms to the first floor."
THE BERWICK. A stylish 3-bedroom apartment. Kitchen opens into the large open lounge with balcony. The main bedroom has a large double wardrobe and an en-suite shower room. Bedrooms two and three also have fitted wardrobes and positioned near to the family bathroom.
"The Kinloch is a bright, open-plan home - perfect for growing families.
 
The large integral garage offers extra security and the front-aspect lounge is a great space for relaxing after a long day.
 
Through to the back of the home you'll discover the welcoming kitchen/dining space, with separate..."
"This charming 2 bed, terrace cottage, ""Millview"" is situated on Pilmuir Road. It offers all the qualities of a modern home, set within beautiful garden grounds with shared sweeping driveway and enjoying a wonderful tranquil semi-rural setting. Early viewing is highly recommended. There are al..."
"******* SOLD AT CLOSING DATE FRIDAY 27 JANUARY 2023 ******* Super gorgeous, this utterly immaculate traditional end terrace cottage offers a superb balance of period features and flexible modern living accommodation. A stunning property set on a popular leafy cul-de-sac which is close to th..."
"Situated in a highly sought-after Newton Mearns locale, this semi-detached bungalow offers generously proportioned accommodation over two main levels. The floorplan and video will provide a better idea of form and layout with the internal accommodation comprising; entrance hallway with staircase ..."
"A superb two bedroom penthouse apartment, set in the desirable Cathcart House development, with South West facing full width terrace offering open aspects."
"The Dean is perfect for families. 
 
Downstairs, the open-plan dining kitchen is an ideal space to entertain with French doors leading out onto the garden. A separate utility room and handy cloakroom add extra practical space whilst a generous lounge is a great place to relax.
 
4 double bedrooms..."
"Situated within a stunning, blonde sandstone, serpentine address within the peaceful West End district of Dowanhill - this attractive three-bedroom, lower duplex conversion offers spacious accommodation over two levels and benefits from access to a charming shared garden at the rear. Grosvenor..."
"Beautiful DETACHED home with a BAY-WINDOWED lounge, DEDICATED STUDY, OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining with SEPARATE LAUNDRY room and FRENCH DOORS to garden. PRINCIPAL BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE."
"Situated in the bold new building this two bedroom apartment enjoys full height windows, private balcony, exceptional specification and luxury fixtures."
"An outstanding apartment within the prestigious “Silvertrees” development of Bothwell enjoying superb views of the surrounding grounds and the River Clyde. This particular flat is on the elevated ground floor which has a private balcony from the lounge and offers spacious, bright and air..."
"Situated within a popular Newton Mearns development, this detached villa offers excellent accommodation over two main levels. The floorplan and video will provide a better idea of form and layout, with the internal accommodation comprising; entrance hallway with W/C, staircase leading to the uppe..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Victoria is a stunning chain free, energy efficient home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors to the rear garden and utility room with sink facilities."
"The HARTWOOD - FOUR-BEDROOM DETACHED family home boasting OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and FAMILY DINING AREA with FRENCH DOORS leading to the GARDEN. THE lounge has a feature BAY WINDOW. Upstairs, the stunning EN-SUITE PRINCIPAL BEDROOM incorporates a BUILT-IN WARDROBE, while a further two bedrooms share a..."
"This unique traditional detached chalet style villa occupies a prominent corner position, set within delightful, landscaped private gardens. The property, which does require internal modernisation, offers flexible accommodation over two levels."
"Impressive four bedroomed detached villa enjoying a level plot within this sought-after development on the outskirts of Stepps, yet with ease of access to the local amenities including the schooling a..."
"Enjoying some of the finest aspects of out over Glasgow and beyond is this pristine, three bedroomed, penthouse apartment. With lift access and private parking, not to mention generous accommodation with fabulous views, this expansive flat really is a must for viewing in order to be ap..."
"Are you looking for a seldom available and beautifully presented, larger style four bedroom semi detached villa with a bathroom on each level, set on a terrific plot, well positioned within a quiet cul-de-sac in a established and highly sought after locale in Newton Mearns, Glasgow? Hemmings H..."
"A spectacular, 5 apartment main door upper conversion, with many original features, driveway & a private south facing rear garden, occupying the entire upper floor of this substantial detached villa in one of best addresses in Cambuslang.  EPC - E."
"A modern 2nd floor flat holding a preferred position within this popular residential development. Internally presented in walk-in condition comprising vestibule, hall, lovely lounge, modern kitchen, two double bedrooms and bathroom with shower. D/Glazing. Elec Heating. Sec Entry. Parking."
"Set in a desirable pocket and formed over three levels is this four-bedroom detached villa with detached double garage and many features listed. It is convenient for all local amenities, regular bus services and sports and recreational facilities. "
"Deceptively spacious, six bedroom detached villa occupying a delightful position in semi-rural location with a good degree of privacy to the rear garden, which backs onto the Luggie Water and is also ..."
"Stunning four bedroom detached villa formed over three levels, boasting stylish modern kitchen and bathrooms, and a south west facing rear garden, early viewing is advised to avoid disappointment. On the entrance level, the property comprises spacious welcoming reception hallway with handy WC, a ..."
Former pet hotel with development potential close to Glasgow. Approximately 1.83 Ha (4.52 Acres) of land. For sale as a whole.
"***A Pristine Family CALA Property *** Located within a highly desirable development, this 4 bedroom detached property has been well maintained and presented throughout, making early viewing imperative. The property benefits from a formal lounge, separate formal dining room(Bed 5), utility area, ..."
"The Inverness is a stylish four bedroom detached home complete with an integral garage.
 
Downstairs features a comfortable and spacious lounge, with plenty of space for cosy nights at home.
 
Through to the large open-plan kitchen/ding area you'll find French doors out to the back garden as well..."
"The Kenmore is a beautiful four-bedroom home. The kitchen has French doors to the rear garden. There’s a front-aspect lounge, a family/dining room, utility room, WC and handy fitted cupboard. Upstairs there are four good-sized bedrooms - bedroom one benefits from an en-suite - and a family bathroom."
The Inverness features impressive open-plan living and plenty of storage space throughout. At the front of this home you will find a spacious lounge and the back of the home features a large open-plan kitchen with family and dining areas which lead out onto the garden through French doors. There...
"Welcome to West Steading, Parkhouse Road where this absolutely gorgeous four bedroom Barn Conversion enjoys a semi-rural position with views over the Gleniffer Braes, less than a ten minute drive to Newton Mearns."
"FOUR bedroom home. LIVING ROOM with bay. DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRAL GARAGE and BI-FOLDS. Main bedroom includes EN SUITE. "
"Enjoying a fantastic, secluded position within the beautifully presented Rawcliffe Gardens development, this easily accessibly 3 bedroom ground floor flat also has direct access to private enclosed gardens."
"Designed with modern lifestyles in mind, the 4 bedroom Drummond offers plenty of social living space to enjoy."
Four Bedroom Detached - Open Plan Living Area - Bifold Doors to Rear Garden - Family Room - Integrated Garage - Double Driveway - Solar Panels - Home Report Available - Financial Advice Available - Viewing Strictly by Appointment
CCL Property are delighted to offer a fantastic investment opportunity to acquire a property portfolio based in Glasgow. The properties are all held within a limited company and all fully compliant with current letting standards and regulations. All properties are currently let out with long t...
"Immaculate 4 bed detached villa in small cul de sac, deceptively spacious. Comprising hall, lounge/dining, hi spec kitchen, cloaks/wc, tv/ dining room, insulated integral garage, 4 bedrooms, master en suite, bathroom, gch, dg, fresh décor, Mossneuk catchment "
"Enjoying a wonderful location at the centre of the highly regarded Kenmure district of Bishopbriggs, this four-bedroom property has been extended to create a superb family home. The property now enjoys a fabulous open plan dining kitchen at the rear.   EPC BAND - C "
"Now Available- This exceptional 2 bedroom third floor apartment features open plan living, Juliet balcony and exceptional specification throughout."
"A most impressive & rather substantial, 8 apartment family home over 3 levels, with a large conservatory & stunning garden, set within a small cul-de-sac in a much-admired development in Cambuslang.  EPC - C"
"Spacious 4 BEDROOM home with EN-SUITE, downstairs WC, BIFOLDS, and designer OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with FRENCH DOORS and INTEGRATED appliances."
"The Oakmont is an expansive family home which boasts a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area with French doors to the rear garden and a utility room/clock room. Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms with an en suite and fitted wardrobe to bedroom 1 plus a modern family bathroom"
"The Fenton is a combination of stylish, modern and spacious living. The kitchen is a perfect space for entertaining as its open-plan design includes a dining area and access to the back garden. The ground floor also offers a separate utility room and WC. Upstairs comprises four double bedroom..."
"* Sought After Residential Pocket - Great Local Amenities, Commuting Links & Schooling * Stunningly Presented, Bright & Spacious Four Bedroom Executive Detached Family Home * Recently Built in a Fantastic Location with Modern & Neutral Decor Throughout - Walk In Condition < (cont.)"
The Greenwood four-bedroom home. French doors add a premium touch to the OPEN PLAN FAMILY KITCHEN and DINING ROOM. Sharing the ground floor is a bay-windowed LOUNGE. Upstairs there are four bedrooms and bathroom. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM features an EN-SUITE and TWIN WARDROBES.
"This very stylish and luxurious three-bedroom warehouse conversion offers contemporary loft living. The apartment is exceptionally generous at circa 1715 sq ft, beautifully refurbished and upgraded during its current ownership. The sixth floor apartment forms part of the iconic Speirs Wharf Devel..."
"Cleverly extended, five bedroomed, detached villa, enjoying a delightful cul-de-sac position, within this matured development, which has blossomed into one of Moodiesburn`s most sought-after and desir..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this substantial modern 5 bedroom/8 apartment detached family home, presented in true walk in condition, providing an expansive, flexible, contemporary living space, located in the heart of Cardonald on the Southside of Glasgow. Cul-de-sac location. GCH & DG"
"Jane Buchan, Keller Williams is delighted to bring to the market, this incredibly sought after three bed end terraced villa in a beautifully picturesque street in Stepps."
"This imposing, characterful and rarely available semi-detached sandstone villa is set centrally located in Uddingston and is conveniently placed for all of it's amenities."
An outstanding luxury apartment set within this prestigious development built by award winning Westpoint Homes which is conveniently nestled within the highly regarded Village of Thorntonhall. The development is made up of twenty eight luxury apartments and penthouses. This particular ap...
Situated in list one Jordanhill School catchment area this charming traditional blonde sandstone mid terrace family home is formed over two levels. This sought after West End location also offers residents convenient access to local shopping together with excellent road and public transport links...
• Three bedroomed detached villa by Stewart Milne • Superb location in quiet pocket of Milngavie’s Mains Estate • Presented to market in fine condition • Addition of conservatory/sun room to rear • Potential for garage conversions (subject to per...
"An immaculately presented modern detached villa set within beautifully kept gardens within this admired and sought-after development. The home was built by Miller Homes in the style of the ""Kennoway"" featuring an exceptionally large master bedroom. The property has been finished to a ver..."
"This beautiful 4 bedroom home features modern open-plan living that's ever popular with families.
 
Discover a stylish kitchen diner with a walk-in glazed bay leading to the back garden.
 
There's a useful utility room and WC, plus a your comfortable lounge - perfect for nights at home.
 
Upstair..."
"The Maplewood - DETACHED family home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN /FAMILY DINING. Separate lounge, BAY WINDOW to the lounge, Principal bedroom with EN-SUITE with double wardrobes, and GARAGE."
"Occupying the top floor of an impressive blonde sandstone townhouse and positioned within one of Downhill’s most exclusive addresses, this well-appointed two-bedroom conversion enjoys magnificent views overlooking Athole Gardens, one of the finest private residents gardens the West End has ..."
"Comprehensively upgraded detached villa by Taylor Wimpey, occupying a much admired plot position with aspects over open countryside to the side and rear of the house. The property is situ..."
This superb two-bedroom conversion is positioned within the garden level of a converted blonde sandstone townhouse and has a large private garden with electric gate which allows access to off-street parking. Victoria Crescent Road is one of the oldest terraces in Dowanhill and was constructed bet...
"Set comfortably back from Crown Road North and forming part of a comprehensively refurbished End Terraced blonde sandstone townhouse, this is an immaculate three-bedroom second floor conversion. The property enjoys an attractive front outlook over to Crown Circus and side aspects over ..."
"*** Fixed Price !!! *** This Stewart Milne property has been tastefully presented and immaculately maintained by the current owners. ""The Dunkeld"" house type offers exceptional family accommodation over two levels. The 4 bedroom detached villa with garage provides flexibility, ideal for modern f..."
"The Leawood - four-bedroom home, with SEPARATE LOUNGE, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING, with French doors leading to the garden. Upstairs, there are three bedrooms and a PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with built-in wardrobe and EN-SUITE."
"***New Fixed Price *** A Pristine Family Property *** Located within a highly desirable development, this 4 bedroom detached property has been well maintained and presented making early viewing imperative. The property benefits from a contemporary open plan kitchen/dining area, formal lounge, uti..."
"The Kinloch is the perfect home for growing families looking for a little more space.
 
The heart of the home is the stylish open-plan kitchen with a dining/family area and French doors - filling the space with natural light.
 
Complimenting the ground floor is the spacious lounge, perfect for th..."
"The Fenton is a stylish, modern and spacious home. 
 
The kitchen is a perfect space for entertaining as its open-plan design includes a dining area and access to the back garden. 
 
The ground floor also offers a separate lounge, utility room and WC.
 
Upstairs comprises four double bedrooms, wi..."
"This is an excellent opportunity to acquire a superb larger style extended detached villa with well- proportioned family living accommodation and early viewing is a must to avoid disappointment. The accommodation comprises a hallway with storage, lounge with bay window, dining room, kitchen with ..."
Now Available - An exceptional 2 bed apartment with Juliet balcony situated on the first floor of the exclusive New Steiner collection.
"A spacious, well maintained three bedroomed apartment which enjoys a fantastic first floor position within the Ellangowan development with Southerly aspects over the residents' gardens."
"Magnificent extended family home available, perfect location"
"Forming part of the exclusive and highly regarded Cathcart House development, is this rarely available and stylish penthouse apartment boasting an expansive wraparound terrace with wonderful panoramic views. Cathcart House is the reimagining of what was originally a Victorian Mill, now comprising..."
THE LOTHIAN. Stylish 2-bedroom apartment. STORAGE CUPBOARD space integrated within the entrance. Double-aspect lounge with large picture window and patio door. High-specification kitchen at one end and PRIVATE BALCONY at the other. Main bedroom features a FITTED WARDROBE. 
"*SHOWHOME NOW OPEN* The Moray is a chain free and energy efficient home. Downstairs benefits from a large open-plan kitchen/dining area with utility room and French doors, a separate living room and garage. Upstairs has 4 double bedrooms, with an en suite & fitted wardrobes to bedroom 1."
"Situated in the popular King’s Park area of Glasgow, this southwest-facing, four bedroom, semi-detached house offers generous accommodation, having been extended and converted to include a self-contained annex, as well as multiple reception areas and bathrooms."
"Enjoying a wonderful position within a locally admired development, this fully refurbished first floor flat offers a size and style of accommodation rarely seen on the open market. This luxury apartment is sure to delight all who view and will be of great interest to a variety of buyer..."
"Stunning four-bedroom detached villa set within a quiet location with Newton Farm in Cambuslang and only a short walk to the local school. Features include beautiful tiled flooring throughout ground level, impressive kitchen diner, separate dining room/office space, master en-suite and large garden"
A really impressive semi-detached villa by David Wilson Homes with sizeable accommodation enhanced by a garage conversion offering further public space. This cleverly designed family home offers spacious. low-maintenance accommodation within a locally admired modern development ideall...
An attractive and well located mixed conifer and broadleaf woodland with a productive core of high yielding Sitka Spruce extending to 29.67 Ha (73.32 Acres).
"CLOSING FOR OFFERS ON WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH AT 12 NOONEnjoying a fabulous corner plot, this detached villa is presented to the market in wonderful order throughout having undergone a significant programme of modernisation under the present owners.  EPC BAND - E"
"• Fantastic three bedroomed, top floor apartment • Part of Milngavie’s coveted Ellangowan Court development • Brilliant position in close proximity to Milngavie Village • Versatile accommodation including large lounge and breakfasting kitchen • N..."
"**UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET** **HOME REPORT VALUE £375,000** Individually designed and built around 1960, this beautifully presented five bedroom detached one and half storey Bungalow is a credit to the current owners. Set within the popular commuting village of Chryst..."
"The OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING with FRENCH DOORS to the GARDEN, makes OUTDOOR DINING an easy option. Upstairs the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE has BUILT-IN WARDROBE while the second bedroom can be used as a HOME OFFICE SPACE or HOME GYM."
"The Corgarff is a beautiful home featuring modern open-plan living that's ever popular with families.
 
Discover a stylish kitchen diner with French doors leading to the back garden - great for entertaining friends & family.
 
There's a useful utility room and WC, plus a your comfortable lounge -..."
Feel-good vibes come from a home with DESIGNER KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. BI-FOLD doors into the rear garden. A main bedroom with EN SUITE.
Beautifully appointed and sizeable 3-bedroom semi-detached property set within the Westerton district of Bearsden. This home has been improved over the years and is enhanced by enclosed private garden grounds and has a panorama across the surrounding cityscape from the front of the house as there...
"Maintained to the highest standard is this substantially extended four-bedroom detached villa with double garage. It is convenient for all local amenities, bus services and sports and recreational facilities. "
"* Stunningly Presented, Larger Style Four Bedroom Executive Detached Home * Fantastic Residential Location Within Desirable Location - Walk In Conditions * Spacious Front Facing Lounge, Large Open Plan Kitchen Dining Family Room * Four Double Bedrooms, Three Bathrooms ( (cont.)"
"Built by Gartconnell Homes in the late 1980’s, this beautiful upper flat occupies an enviable position within this prestigious development with open outlooks, a parking space and separate garage.This rarely available property has a main door entrance and is formed over one level which w..."
"This stunning detached family home is placed within a quiet cul-de-sac to the north of Glasgow Centre which is just a quick drive away. Boasting 5 bedrooms, 4 bathrooms, living room, dining room, conservatory, and generous layout inside and out."
"A quite magnificent 3 bedroomed conversion, occupying the entire upper floor of this substantial detached villa, set amidst beautiful, established gardens in a much sought-after pocket of Burnside.  EPC – D."
"An attractive traditional red sandstone semi detached villa offering family accommodation set within this highly sought after address in the popular locale of Newlands.. The accommodation includes; entrance vestibule, welcoming reception hallway, impressive bay windowed lounge with fe..."
"*BRAND NEW and CHAIN FREE* The Erinvale is an attractive, 3-bedroom family home which benefits from a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and dining area, along with a spacious separate living room. The property's master bedroom features an en suite and a Juliet balcony. *10 years NHBC warranty*"
Three-storey living as it should be. FLEXIBLE living spaces with a DESIGNER kitchen. MAIN BEDROOM features an ENSUITE shower room.
"The Aberlour II is a four-bedroom detached home. It features a welcoming hall with a storage cupboard, dual-aspect lounge, dining room, kitchen/diner with French doors leading to the rear garden and a downstairs WC. Upstairs bedroom one is en suite, and there’s a family bathroom and more storage."
"A quite superb three bedroom town house set within this sought after residential pocket of Muirend. The property offers flexible family accommodation set over three levels and includes private driveway parking, garage and well equipped rear garden. Brought to market in superb order throughout, t..."
"Located within a most favourable local address, this well presented semi-detached bungalow provides spacious accommodation over two levels. The home will appeal to a wide range of prospective purchasers and is sure to impress on viewing. Comprises, reception hall, bay windowed front fac..."
"A modern, spacious four bedroomed detached villa built by Miller Homes, occupying a corner plot with Southerly rear garden. Situated within a popular and sought-after residential area clos..."
This rarely available family home enjoys a popular location within a sought after residential development.
"The Blackwood - FOUR-BEDROOM home, with SEPARATE LOUNGE, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY DINING ROOM and LAUNDRY ROOM. Upstairs, offers flexibility for a home office space. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE features a BUILT-IN WARDROBE."
"Well-presented three bedroom semi-detached traditional property. The property is positioned within the admired Maxwellton conservation area and really must be seen to be fully appreciated. The property comprises entrance porch via storm doors, downstairs hallway offering access to all ..."
57 Lora Drive offers a unique opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented and rarely available traditional semi detached villa. The property boasts many luxury modern features and is uniquely suited to purchasers seeking a home in true walk-in condition. The property comprises welcoming recep...
"Available for cash purchase only. This is an excellent duplex apartment, comprising of three-bedrooms and two very generous living spaces, it spans over 1874 sq ft and is one of the larger style of apartments within the development. Situated on the first and second floor of the southeast corner o..."
"Positioned within a most preferred part of this highly popular local address this larger sized three bedroom semi detached villa has undergone substantial upgrading by the present owners and is sure to impress on viewing. Comprises, broad reception hall, front facing lounge, good sized dinin..."
"3 bedroom detached home with OPEN PLAN living, BI-FOLD doors, DESIGNER kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, integral GARAGE, downstairs WC and utility and en-suite to the main bedoom"
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Erinvale is an attractive, 3-bedroom family home which features an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the rear garden, along with separate living room. Upstairs, the double master bedroom features an en suite."
Three storey living as it should be. FLEXIBLE living spaces with BI-FOLD doors and DESIGNER kitchen. Main bedroom features ENSUITE shower room.
Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! Three storey living as it should be. FLEXIBLE living spaces with BI-FOLD doors and DESIGNER kitchen. Main bedroom features ENSUITE shower room.
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Kingston is a wonderful chain free and energy efficient home which boasts an open-plan kitchen and dining area with utility area, plus a separate living room. Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms"
A modern detached house set within popular residential development.
"Enjoying a prominent position on Mount Annan Drive, this traditional semi-detached villa offers great room sizes, original features and has been priced to reflect the need for modernisation."
"Located within a short and child friendly cul-de-sac, a rare opportunity to acquire an all on one level semi-detached bungalow providing good sized accommodation throughout. The property will appeal to a wide range of prospective purchasers’ and it is sure to impress on viewing. C..."
"Immediate internal viewing is strongly recommended to fully appreciate this extended and converted detached villa Persimmon Homes that offers truly deceiving family accommodation throughout that is conveniently located close to a wide range of local amenities that include schools, public transpor..."
• Brilliantly extended detached family villa • Great location close by excellent schooling • Super rear garden with summer house – ideal for child’s play or home office • Off street driveway parking with new epoxy drive • Recently re-roofed...
"This professionally extended, 3/4 bedroom detached property is located a short distance from Lenzie Academy and Lenzie train station. Immaculately presented and maintained throughout early viewing is essential. The property boasts flexible family accommodation including the garage conversion whic..."
"Immaculately presented and extended semi detached villa occupying a prime location within Glasgow's Southside. Agents highly advise early internal viewings to fully appreciate the size, style and quality of accommodation available."
"CLOSING DATE - Friday 17th March at 12pm - DJ Alexander are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous four bedroom, family home in immaculate conditon with large enclosed garden."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this unique Contemporary styled 3 Bedroom (previously 4), Immaculate Terraced House offering deceptively spacious, adaptable living accommodation over two levels. The property itself has been well maintained and upgraded to an exacting standard "
"This stunning larger style Detached Villa at Duncolm View was built by Miller Homes in 2018. The immaculate, four bedroom family home is formed over two levels and set within a good size plot with a driveway and garage. The property is located close to local schooling and countryside on the outsk..."
"A truly impressive, bright and beautifully proportioned four bedroom detached villa occupying a superb location within a modern sought after estate. We have tried to put into words what this fantastic home has to offer but only internal viewing will confirm this."
"Seldom available, a three bedroom semi detached villa within the historic conservation village of Eaglesham, close to local amenities and services."
"The Larchwood- FOUR BEDROOM home with OPEN PLAN LIVING/ DINING and SEPARATE KITCHEN. FRENCH DOORS to GARDEN. The PRINCIPAL BEDROOM features an EN-SUITE, while the remaining three bedrooms offer flexibility to accommodate a HOME OFFICE."
Alan Ferguson of Keller Williams presents an ideal family home in Bishopbriggs to the market. Call now to book your viewing!
"The Avon is a stunning two bedroom apartment. 
 
The open-plan living area is an ideal base for entertaining and relaxing featuring a a kitchen/dining area and lounge space. 
 
The hallway leads to two double bedrooms, a family bathroom and convenient storage cupboards.
 
Within the apartment blo..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Sherwood is a stunning chain free and energy efficient family home that features an open-plan kitchen, dining and living area with a set of elegant French doors onto the rear garden. Upstairs, there are 3 double bedrooms and 1 sin"
"The perfect home for those looking to take the next step.
 
On the ground floor of the Craigend you will find a spacious lounge and at the back of the home, you'll find the spacious kitchen/dining/family room leading to the back garden through a patio door. 
 
A utility room and WC are located ju..."
"An impressive four bedroomed, split level detached villa, delightfully set on a mature, end of cul-de-sac plot on the outskirts of the town in what is recognised as one of the most desirable addresses..."
"NEW BUILD PROPERTY NEST Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this brand new four bedroom detached property built by Wilson Developments (Scotland) Ltd within the sought after area of Myrtle Road, Uddingston. This luxury property promises an outstanding family home characterised b..."
Allan Brown of Keller Williams is delighted to present to the market this newly refurbished 3 bed 2 bath traditional sandstone tenement apartment with a private front garden and main door access.
"Enjoying an excellent location in the popular Rosebank area, this detached villa has been extended to create a fabulous family home. The property now provides flexible living space and generous bedrooms.  EPC - D"
An impressive traditional two-bedroom main door lower conversion in one of the West End's most cherished addresses. The subjects have been modernised by the present owner to offer stylish well-proportioned accommodation and finished to a luxury exacting standard. The accommodation comprises...
"'Charing Cross Mansions', a superb 4 bed apartment within an iconic A listed building, With HMO potential"
"One of the development's flagship configurations, this recently decorated, spacious family home occupies a wonderful corner position with four excellent bedrooms, a recently upgraded kitchen, high specification fit and finish throughout, solar panels and a stunning South-East facing private garden."
"Allen & Harris are delighted to offer to the market this rare three bedroom extended detached bungalow located within the popular area of Bishopbriggs, Glasgow. This property would ideally suit older couple that are looking to downsize and early viewing is highly advised to avoid any disappointment"
"*** New Price - Home Report Val £330K !!! *** This tasteful, detached family home, offers spacious accommodation over two levels. The current owner has maintained and presented the property to an exceptional throughout with the addition of many additional up-grades. Early viewing is imperative. ..."
Shan-Gri-La Charming and deceptively spacious detached bungalow sitting within a quiet idyllic location with private south facing mature gardens. The property was built in the 1950’s and later adapted and upgraded over the years by the present owners and offers a spacious and flexible...
"A truly unique, extended red sandstone fronted detached bungalow, dating from the 1930s, with six flexible apartments on the level, and a substantial attic room, sitting on a lovely south facing garden plot in the heart of Burnside, only minutes’ walk away from a variety of excellent amenities. E..."
"* Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Five Bedroom Detached Family Home * Spacious Front Facing Lounge, Separate Dining Room & Large Conservatory * Modern Fitted Kitchen & Separate Utility Room, Four Modern Bathrooms * Five Good Sized Bedrooms Over Both Floors - F (cont.)"
***Open House Saturday 18th March 11am - 1pm*** A truly magnificent and substantial luxury family home perfectly positioned within the highly desirable Ellismuir Park development in Uddingston. Built circa 2021 by Messrs Taylor Wimpey in the style of the ‘Geddes’ and offer...
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £3600! Exceptional THREE bedroom DETACHED home with DESIGNER kitchen, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, BI-FOLD doors, downstairs utility and WC, separate bathroom and EN-SUITE"
"The Cameron is a spacious 2-bedroom garden floor apartment, boasting a generous open plan, kitchen, living and dining room with access out to your private patio. Enjoy a designer kitchen with integrated appliances included at no extra cost. "
"FINAL APARTMENTS REMAINING. A brand new, top floor 2 bed apartment with a corner position. Boasting a high specification throughout, lift access to all floors and allocated parking. Don't miss out, final apartments remaining."
"This attractive FAMILY HOME benefits from a contemporary, open-plan kitchen and dining area, along with a spacious separate living room. The property's master bedroom features an en suite and a Juliet balcony."
"An exceptional three-bedroom detached home, plot 105 at Jackton Green, The Impstone. Modern, open-plan home with a designer specification. The hallway leads to a light and spacious kitchen with integrated appliances including a fridge freezer, oven, and hob. Beyond is a separate living a..."
Now Available - An exceptional 2 bedroom ground floor apartment situated within the bold new building.
"A stunning one bedroom apartment, set within the former David Stow teaching school building surrounded by lush parkland. This brand new home features Cala Homes' high specification throughout, with impressive entrance lobby, ground floor storage and mail room. "
"A beautifully presented three bedroom detached villa, well placed for amenities within the surrounding district."
***PLEASE SEE OUR PROFESSIONAL HD VIDEO*** Occupying a superb end position within a quiet cul-de-sac in the exclusive development of Gartloch Village lies this beautiful four bedroom detached villa. This bright stylish home with neutral décor offers spacious family accommodation over ...
"Located within the Canniesburn area of Bearsden, this luxury, two bedroom, first floor apartment is located in the popular Westerly development by McCarthy and Stone."
"Discover luxury living in the heart of Dennistoun! This stunning period sandstone property has been lovingly restored and converted into three modern luxury apartments. Steeped in history and charm, the building retains many of its original features."
"This substantial three bedroom detached villa, occupies a fairly large plot within one of the most desirable and sought out addresses in Bishopbriggs.  The home has an extremely flexible and adaptable layout and is extremely well located for local amenities."
"Tastefully presented and well appointed traditional sandstone 3 bedroom semi detached villa, enjoying a large level plot situated in the popular commuters town of Chryston with easy access to a range ..."
"63 Holehouse Road A well-maintained semi-detached bungalow set within beautifully kept garden grounds and offering an attractive rural outlook. Internally, the accommodation comprises; entrance vestibule opening onto the hallway, bright and spacious front facing living room, kitchen with a go..."
"A garden level townflat forming part of the Queens Drive terrace, beautifully presented and on the doorstep of the thriving Strathbungo scene."
"This is a stunning detached home with an impressive open-plan kitchen/diner/family room. The Newton's features include a living room, separate dining room and a utility room. The top floor bedroom enjoys a large en suite. The first floor is home to four further bedrooms - one of which is en suite."
"Deceptively spacious detached villa, enjoying a cul-de-sac position within this sought-after development with open parkland opposite and delightful views to The Campsies in the distance, especially fr..."
"******** FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE - £295,000 ********* * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Four/Five Bedroom Detached Home * Spacious Front Facing Lounge & Fabulous Open Plan Kitchen Dining Family Area * Four Very Well Appointed Bedrooms, Three Bathrooms, Additional (cont.)"
"A substantial, three-bedroom traditional tenement apartment which benefits from a desirable first floor, corner position and a convenient setting in the Heart of Hillhead within seconds' walk of Glasgow University. Hillhead Street enjoys a desirable, central position within a leafy West End po..."
This is an incredible two bedroom flat set on the third floor within this exclusive modern building in Hyndland
SPACIOUS & BRIGHT ELEVATED GROUND FLOOR WEST FACING 2 BEDROOM RED SANDSTONE TENEMENT APARTMENT WITH PRIVATE OUTDOOR SPACE SET IN THE LEAFY AND SOUGHT AFTER WEST END DISTRICT OF HYNDLAND.
"Extended five bedroom semi-detached villa offering flexible family accommodation located within the popular Kings Park locale. Early viewing is highly recommended.Located within the popular Kings Park locale, this property offers easy access to a host of local amenities including nearby shops, sch"
"Enjoying larger corner-appointed gardens within a popular residential development is this beautifully presented family detached villa. The property has been modernised and upgraded throughout, offering an array of well-proportioned apartments which have all been finished to a very high s..."
"Nestled in a fantastic corner plot, this four bedroom detached property makes a superb family home! With spacious open plan lounge/dining room/kitchen, this is a really sociable space ideal for modern family living. In the popular Balloch area of Cumbernauld, this is a spot popular with commute..."
An extended and exceptionally well presented four bedroom semi-detached family home with generous garden in the ever popular Kelvindale close to good schools and easy transport links. The property has been beautifully maintained and modernised and offers a very flexible layout for modern family l...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this wonderful five bedroom detached property in the sought after location of Lindsayfield, East Kilbride. The property would attract all types of buyers and make a great family home. Early viewing would be highly recommended. Entering the prop..."
"An exceptionally flexible, spacious and well laid out three bedroom semi detached family home in a highly sought after location in Kessington close to local amenities and excellent transport links. The property has been extended to the rear and would be perfect for a family looking to live close ..."
An extended end terraced villa enjoying a lovely cul-de-sac location.
"Discover your dream home... Ready for you; Lights & Blinds, Flooring & Full LBTT Brand new to Prince's Quay, the Cameron features a stylish open plan kitchen and dining area, two spacious bedrooms and contemporary fixtures and fittings throughout. The L-sh..."
The Thurso is a superb home for first-time buyers and growing families alike. The open-plan kitchen/dining area is the perfect space for hosting friends and family and also offers easy access to the back garden. The bright and spacious lounge is also found downstairs alongside plenty of practic...
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £3600! Exceptional four bedroom-three storey home living with OPEN PLAN living, EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. "
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Glencoe is an energy efficient, chain free home with benefits from a large kitchen including selected integrated appliances and French doors to rear garden. There is also a large separate living room and integral garage. "
"**UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET** **FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE** ** Open 7 Days A Week *** * Home Report Available on Our Website Homeconnexions.co.uk * * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern Decor, (cont.)"
"An attractive, three bedroom detached bungalow, enjoying a spacious plot within this popular residential area, conveniently located to the local amenities including public transport and schooling...."
"This detached bungalow enjoys a splendid cul-de-sac setting and offers spacious and genuine on-the level accommodation. The pleasing layout of accommodation includes canopied entrance, reception hall with extensive fitted storage, sizeable front facing lounge/dining room, breakfasting ..."
"This immediately impressive, three-bedroom duplex penthouse apartment spans over 1182 sq ft and having been refurbished throughout its current ownership, offers a high specification finish and benefits from fantastic, south facing river views and undercover allocated car parking. Situ..."
"This impressively sized detached family home is set within the highly popular Parklands residential development and is surrounded by homes of similar quality. The home will ultimately appeal to the growing family market, and with its high standard of finish and flexible accomodation, it is s..."
Phase 1 sold out. Phase 2 now available. Plot 39 is a superb 2-bedroom apartment located on the 4th floor at Holmwood Heights.
"A wonderful, three-bedroom semi-detached family home set within an especially desirable and centrally positioned Newton Mearns crescent. The property provides spacious accommodation arranged over two levels and benefits from modern fixtures and fittings along with fresh wiring and plum..."
"**CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 16TH MARCH @ 12 NOON** Built by Beazer Homes in the late 90s, an extremely large & impeccably well-presented 6 apartment detached villa, set upon a level, south westerly facing garden plot within the much sought-after 'Hunterfield' development in Cambuslang.  EPC- D"
"A superb 2nd floor apartment formed within a B-Listed Townhouse. The property is presented in walk-in condition and offers stylish well laid out accommodation that will appeal to a variety of buyers. Extends to hallway, lounge with ample space for dining, open plan breakfasting kitchen, two gener..."
"FINAL APARTMENTS REMAINING. Discover the C-type apartment new to Balgray Gardens, Newton Mearns. Boasting a high specification throughout, lift access to all floors and allocated parking. This two bedroom apartment offers a spacious open plan kitchen, dining and living room with a private balcony. "
"Join Cala's first time buyers event, 4th & 5th March. The Cameron is a spacious 2-bedroom garden floor apartment, boasting a generous open plan, kitchen, living and dining room with access out to your private patio. Enjoy a designer kitchen with integrated appliances included at no extra cost. "
"This modern apartment provides plenty of light and space throughout. 
 
An open-plan living area with kitchen and dining space is flooded with natural light from the large dual-aspect windows. 
 
There are two double bedrooms, a family bathroom and additional storage/utility space off the hall. T..."
"Brand new to Prince's Quay, the Cameron features a stylish open plan kitchen and dining area, two spacious bedrooms and contemporary fixtures and fittings throughout."
"A Larger Style 4 Bedroom Corner Sited Detached Villa With Excellent Size Gardens, Conservatory, Dining Room/Family Room, Downstairs WC, En-Suite And Family Bathroom, Viewing Advised. "
"*****FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE***** ** RARELY AVAILABLE, EXCLUSIVE POCKET OF STEWARTFIELD ** * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazi (cont.)"
"Substantial & stylish detached family home awaits you! You'll love the stunning kitchen with dining space, conservatory, recently upgraded bathroom & en-suite, bright living room with semi open plan dining room (also perfect for home office), 4 bedrooms, integrated garage & triple car driveway!"
"***HD 360 VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE*** Keys Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market, this traditional detached bungalow, set within the popular and much sought after address of Wester Road,..."
"• Two-bedroom Conversion within dramatic Gothic building. • Lower ground floor position includes a private access from courtyard. • Both bedrooms have ensuites. • Very impressive, renewed (2019), kitchen with quality appliances. • Renewed double glazed..."
"** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** CITY CENTRE PENTHOUSE 3 Bed, 2 Bath Duplex with full length Terrace & Covered Parking Space. Interior designed, Â£10k Furniture Included. Size: 87 sqm (936sqft). Rent estimate Â£30-36k pa. HR Â£330,000. ."
Plot 29 is a superb 2-bedroom apartment located on the 3rd floor at Holmwood Heights.
"* Beautifully Presented & Spacious, Larger Style Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Lounge, Modern Re-Fitted Kitchen With Space For Dining, Three Bathrooms * Four We (cont.)"
Located in the popular Colquhoun Park area of Bearsden this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi detached home opposite the park and playing fields. The property offers a huge amount of potential in an area perfect for young families close to the Primary School. The ac...
"Immaculately presented and spacious, three-bedroom, Mid-Terrace family home with stunning upgrades and in walk in condition. Show Home style kitchen/dining room along with private driveway and a private back garden that has been decked for entertaining."
11 Kinarvie Gardens offers a unique opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented and rarely available detached bungalow situated within a secluded and leafy enclave. The property boasts many outstanding features and is uniquely suited to purchasers seeking a home on one level. The property com...
"An attractive end terrace villa in what is arguably one of Stepps most desirable and established residential areas, close to the local amenities including schooling and the train station. P..."
Enjoying a truly fantastic position within this prime cul-de-sac setting within the highly regarded Tannochside area of Uddingston is this beautifully appointed 4 bedroom detached villa. 
"**Price Reduction**Located within the sought after locale of North Kelvinside, Century 21 present this 3 bedroom basement flat to the market. Forming part of a traditional red sandstone tenement with some internal work required, early viewing is essential. EPC - Band C "
"* Stunningly Presented, Bright & Spacious Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, GCH & DG Throughout * Spacious Front Facing Lounge With Semi Open Plan Access To Dining Room * Modern Fitted Kitchen Dining Room With A Separate Util (cont.)"
This traditional detached sandstone bungalow is set within a charming courtyard which dates back to the early 19th century. Centrally positioned within the village of Uddingston this quaint property is sure to be of attraction to the downsizing market therefore early viewing is strongly advised. 
"Occupying a second-floor position within a red sandstone tenement building in the Glasgow’s City Centre, this five-bedroom property holds an HMO licence - valid till 2024 and for 5 occupants. It is currently occupied on a PRT and generates a monthly rental income of £2,575 and therefo..."
"Occupying a prominent, elevated position within a quiet yet convenient residential pocket is this comprehensively upgraded three bedroom semi detached villa. 192 Weymouth Drive has been tastefully upgraded by the current owner and benefits from excellent natural light and a comfortably proportion..."
A luxurious ground floor flat set within a highly sought after development.
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £3600! Exceptional four bedroom-three storey home living with OPEN PLAN living, EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS, and bifold doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Kinloch is lovely energy efficient and chain free family home which boasts a large, open-plan kitchen and dining area with stylish fitted units and elegant French doors onto the rear garden. "
Village Estates are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic opportunity to purchase this modern 3 bedroom detached villa with a side conversion. Viewing is essential to fully appreciate the accommodation on offer on this modern 3 bedroom detached villa. 
"Well presented modern detached villa set within a much sought after and central Southside residential location. The accommodation on offer comprises entrance hallway, beautifully presented lounge with dining area, lovely conservatory, modern kitchen, utility room, cloaks/w/c and sitting room/bed..."
"NEW FIXED PRICE, THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN PRICED TO SELL ! £10,000 UNDER HOME REPORT VALUE ! David Dunn and RE/MAX Property Marketing Centre are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom end-terraced house within the highly sought after suburb of Kings Park. The property which ..."
"Set in a much sought after Bishopbriggs residential pocket this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a stunning extended semi-detached villa. This property has been beautifully maintained throughout and early viewing is highly recommended. The accommodation comprises a hallway, modern w/c..."
"Hoppers present this modern, extended semi-detached villa, located in a quiet cul-de-sac close to local amenities and transport links. This spacious family home benefits from off-road parking, a garden room, 2 bathrooms and superb garden areas"
"Allen & Harris are delighted to offer to the market this extended three bedroom semi detached villa located within the popular area of Bishopbriggs, Glasgow. This property would ideally suit younger and older families alike and early viewing is highly recommended to avoid any disappointment."
"This chic, stylish and contemporary two-bedroom warehouse apartment is very generously proportioned at over 1200 sq ft (GIA). Providing luxury living in the heart of Glasgow City, it has an impressive open plan living space, flooded with light from a wall of five feature windows facing east over ..."
Plot 3 is a superb 2-bedroom apartment located on the ground floor at Holmwood Heights.
"Deceptively spacious, four bedroomed, detached chalet style villa, enjoying a delightful position within this popular residential area and with the benefit of a mature tree backdrop to the rear garden..."
"Beautifully presented four bedroom villa in sought after avenues development in Uddingston. Boasting landscaped front gardens and mono block driveway, this property is a superb family home and is in true walk in condition."
"As fresh as a daisy and as sharp as a tack this is an exceptionally fabulous, super-luxe home of residential brilliance. Setting a high bar of top end Merchant City living and distinctively chic this amazingly stylish 2 bedroom flat is in one of the area's most pre-eminent buildings, built as No..."
"A rarely available and well presented traditional semi detached villa which has been upgraded by the current vendor to offer a stylish family home. This spacious property is situated in a popular residential area, well placed for local schooling, shopping facilities and transport links."
"Unexpectantly BACK ON market, wonderful 3 bedroom semi-detached Carnoustie is a fabulous property both inside and out. It is beautifully stylish with its' modern look and design and is perfect both for the discerning first time purchaser or for those looking to downsize from a larger home. "
"This house is walk-in showhome condition with a sumptuous kitchen to match! Impressive throughout and the most perfect canvas for a large family home. Immaculately decorated, this detached home provides executive living on a sizeable plot, a low maintenance fully enclosed garden and off-street p..."
"A particularly spacious and well presented, two bedroom/two public room first floor apartment, built by Stewart Milne and set within attractive resident's grounds, close to local amenities and transport links."
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £300,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. A rare and promising find for any house hunter, this spacious detached property has been throroughly modernised and renovated throughout, meaning it is ready for ..."
"This beautiful blonde sandstone period apartment successfully blends modern specifications with traditional charm and appeal. This stylish property comprises L-shaped entrance hallway, spacious lounge with feature fireplace, contemporary breakfasting kitchen, two bedrooms and well-appointed showe..."
"* Beautifully Presented & Spacious, Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Open Plan Lounge, Dining Room & Modern Fitted Kitchen * Separate Rear Sunroom & Living Room - Viewings Essential (cont.)"
"Seldom available, a well presented and spacious two bedroom garden apartment, located within the exclusive Ravenscourt development."
Truly outstanding and professionally extended detached villa which offers outstanding family accommodation throughout and benefits from being located within the ever popular Drumsagard Village. 
"*** MORE AIMED TOWARDS THE INVESTMENT MARKET *** *** EXTREMELY LIMITED VIEWS DUE TO CURRENT AIRBNB BUSINESS SET UP *** *** £30,000 NET PROFIT - 10% YIELD, COMPLETELY LICENSED & HANDS OF MANAGEMENT *** * Beautifully Presented & Spacious Four Bedroom Detached Family Home (cont.)"
"A magnificent traditional second floor flat within blond sandstone tenement building. The subjects have been extensively and meticulously upgraded by the present proprietor to offer stunning internal accommodation comprising security entry, communal entrance hall with stair, reception hallwa..."
"*****FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE £275,000***** * Beautifully Presented & Spacious, Four Bedroom Detached Family Home * Open Plan Lounge & Dining Room, Beautiful Fitted Kitchen & Separate Utility * Four Good Sized Bedrooms, Three Bathrooms (W.C., En-Suite & Main Bathroom) "
"A beautifully presented traditional mid terraced villa providing outstanding family accommodation and set in a cul-de-sac position within what is arguably one of Muirheads most desirable addresses. Finding a home of this style in this location is very difficult, so when one as good as thi..."
An outstanding first floor conversion which sits in the flourishing Strathbungo district and is presented to market in beautiful condition.
"Set within the desirable Landsdale Gate development is the ""Erinvale"" by ""Bellway Homes"", a three-bedroom detached villa. It is convenient for Hairmyres Train Station, regular bus services and the motorway network making it ideal for commuters. "
"**Closing Date for offers Friday 17th March at 12 noon** Yates Hellier are delighted to present this substantial three bedroomed, elevated ground floor property set in a well kept, traditional red sandstone tenement building. Enjoying an excellent position within Thornwood in Glasgow’s W..."
A well appointed first floor three bedroom flat enjoying a highly convenient Strathbungo location.
"***CLOSING DATE SET FOR FRIDAY 17TH OF MARCH AT NOON, LAST OPPORTUNITY TO VIEW!*** Properties in the sought-after Ladeside Drive cul-de-sac in Kilsyth very rarely come onto the market, which is why we highly recommend buyers move quickly to view this five bedroom detached villa. Boasting an ..."
"A spacious semi-detached home situated that is ideal for first-time buyers and growing families. 
 
Your new home has an open-plan dining kitchen with a patio door leading to the private turfed garden. Downstairs is complete with a spacious lounge and a handy cloakroom. 
 
Upstairs, you will find..."
"The perfect home for first-time buyers. The Traquair features an open-plan kitchen diner with easy access out onto your turfed private garden. You'll also find a handy store cupboard and WC on your ground floor. Your stylish lounge features plenty of space to relax with friends & family.
 
Ups..."
"A brand new home with 3 bedrooms and thoughtful touches throughout, enjoy more as standard such as integrated appliances and fitted wardrobes. The Arisaig is the perfect family home to grow into boasting a generous open plan lounge and dining room with French doors out to your private rear garden."
"The Arisaig is a contemporary 3 bedroom family home. The ground floor enjoys a spacious open plan living and dining area, complete with French doors to your garden. The separate kitchen offers the perfect space for preparation and washing up, while your family and friends enjoy the lounge. "
An incredible one bedroom flat set with the iconic David Stow building by Cala Homes in this exclusive Jordanhill Park development. 
"Presented to the market in immaculate condition throughout is this expansive three bedroom traditional lower villa with private garden situated within a highly sought after Rutherglen address. Located at the end of a quite cul de sac, and boasting a plethora of period features, this beautiful fam..."
"Brand new apartments, refurbished from the historic David Stow teaching school. Featuring a generous living and dining area, streamlined kitchen with integrated appliances and built in wardrobes to the bedroom, this modern city apartment is as functional as it is stylish."
"Truly stunning and contemporary four bedroom, three bathroom modern semi-detached villa split across three floors. Set within a sought after residential area down a quiet cul-de-sac. This is a property not to be missed and early viewing is advised. It is in better than turn key condition. <..."
"Enjoying an ideal location in the popular Balmuildy area of Bishopbriggs, this property is presented to the market in excellent order throughout. The property offers spacious accommodation and has attractive gardens.   EPC BAND - "
"Enjoying a wonderful position within highly desirable Mearnskirk, this substantial John Dickie Homes built first floor flat is sure to delight all who view. This modern apartment benefits from attractive views front and rear, an especially high degree of privacy and generously sized ap..."
"A truly outstanding three bedroom fourth floor apartment of over 1600 sq ft by Cala Homes and forming part of the highly popular Glasgow Harbour development. The flat benefits from private parking, has exceptionally flexible open plan living space and boasts spectacular views up and down the Rive..."
"• Three bedroomed semi-detached villa • Cul-de-sac setting in popular Milngavie address • Nicely presented throughout – contemporary fixtures, fittings and finishes • Open plan dining/kitchen area to rear • Great rear garden – level, priva..."
"Allen and Harris are delighted to present to the market this seldom available, exceptionally well presented and appealing traditional mid terraced villa situated in a desirable area of Barrhead. This wonderful home is ideally placed for access to amenities and early internal viewing is essential!"
3 Bedroom Flat in the Heart of The West End
This apartment is a beautiful two bedroom property at the stunning Merchants Gate development in Pollokshields. ***Incentives Available***
"**SOLD AT Closing date **This three bedroom detached villa, occupies a fairly large plot within one of the most desirable and sought out addresses in Bishopbriggs. The property is positioned within reasonable walking distance of a diverse range of shops and amenities and of course nearby local re..."
Located within the leafy West End district of Hillhead this superb two-bedroom tenement is exceptionally well placed for every possible local amenity. Set off Byres Road and just above the cobbled pedestrianised section of Vinicombe Street which is home to an excellent selection of highly rated c...
"Putting the zing into amazing this very desirable and super stylish 2 bed, 2 bath signature apartment is amongst the City's most immediately appealing lifestyle flats. Set in a cornerstone development the flat provides urban lifestyle living at its best. This well appointed flat is on the 5th flo..."
"***UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET ***Discover luxury living in the heart of Dennistoun! This stunning period sandstone property has been lovingly restored and converted into three modern luxury apartments. Steeped in history and charm, the building retains many of its original features."
"Rarely available semi detached villa located in a prime position enjoying an open outlook with golf course views and award winning East Renfrewshire schools nearby. The accommodation comprises; entrance vestibule, reception hallway with stairwell to the upper level including bespoke un..."
"* Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Three Bedroom Top Floor Duplex Apartment * Large & Spacious Plan Lounge With Semi Open Plan Dining Kitchen, Separate Utility * Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout, * Three Generous Double B (cont.)"
"A truly impressive, bright and beautifully proportioned detached villa occupying a superb position within a modern sought after estate. The accommodation has been well maintained to an extremely high standard by its present owners. Viewing advised."
"Spacious and well-presented four bedroom detached villa with south east facing garden set within a child friendly cul-de-sac in Lindsayfield. The property comprises reception hallway, a spacious front facing living room with bay window and a generous sized open plan kitchen/diner. The kitchen has..."
"Larger style Detached Bungalow in Stewartfield. Comprising hall, large lounge/dining, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, all with storage and master with en suite shower, bathroom, gch, dg, level driveway to garage, level gardens. Minutes from Morrisons, handy for motorway network. Viewing highly recommended."
"Plot 18 is a 2 bedroom apartment with study situated on the third floor which benefits from open plan kitchen and living area, 2 double bedrooms with principal en suite."
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £3600! A home made to different standards. LIGHT and BRIGHT OPEN spaces, BI-FOLD doors, and CONTEMPORARY specifications. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room."
"Occupying a wonderful plot within the highly sought-after village of Bothwell, lies this impressive three-bedroom detached bungalow. The property offers great versatility and would be an ideal opportunity for those looking to seek a bungalow which is seldom available in today's market."
"The Erinvale is an attractive, 3-bedroom family home which features an open-plan kitchen/dining area with French doors to the rear garden, along with separate living room. Upstairs, the double master bedroom features an en suite and a Juliet balcony, whilst the remaining share a family bathroom"
"Absolutely stunning three bedroom ground floor flat, finished to an extremely high standard. The property has been tastefully decorated and in our opinion is one of the finest properties of its type currently available. Internal viewing is imperative to appreciate the standard of accommodation."
"Don't miss this beautiful brand new 2 bed apartment by Cala Homes in Newton Mearns. With flooring, lighting and blinds package incuded at no extra cost. Boasting a high specification throughout, lift access to all floors and allocated parking. Ground floor, with walk-on balcony and video entry"
"The Kelburn at Arrolbridge is a luxurious four bedroom home, perfect for growing families. Set over three floors, this stylish home offers an open plan kitchen / dining area with a light and spacious lounge. It also comprises a convenient downstairs W.C. and ample storage space. The first floor i..."
Immediate internal viewing is of paramount importance to fully appreciate the truly outstanding family accommodation with this professionally extended and converted detached villa that occupies this fantastic corner plot and is enhanced by the open panoramic aspects to the front. The propert...
** CLOSING DATE - WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH AT 12 NOON ** A traditional detached bungalow set within generous garden grounds.
"New. Superb two bedroom apartment with exceptional outlook, GCH, DG and private garage."
"Generously proportioned, four bedroomed, detached villa situated in a delightful, position within this small development on the outskirts of Gartcosh and Muirhead and enjoying tree lined aspects to th..."
"This spacious two bedroom apartment features French doors with a Juliet balcony.
 
An open-plan living space contains the lounge, kitchen and dining area. 
 
The main bedroom comes complete with en suite. 
 
Further benefits include a second double bedroom, modern family bathroom and good storage..."
"Reduced in price. Must be viewed to be full appreciated. Beautiful extended detached family home in much admired and sought-after Strone Gardens area of Kilsyth.This extended villa has a perfect balance of four bedrooms, two bathrooms and two living spaces and a study which offers great versatili..."
34 CARDYKE WAY Unique modern Stewart Milne built 3 bedroom end terrace villa. Enjoying a wonderful position backing onto the grounds of Lenzie Golf course which is an appealing backdrop as well a...
4 Bedroom property with 4 person HMO licence Fabulous opportunity for investors to acquire this 4-bedroom traditional flat with long standing HMO licence for 4 people
"Enjoying an enviable position within the highly regarded Cadder area of Bishopbriggs, this larger style semi-detached villa offers wonderful family sized accommodation. The property has been enhanced by an extension and loft conversion.  EPC - D "
A sizeable three-bedroom semi-detached villa enjoying a fine position with substantial garden grounds within ever popular Clarkston. This property is an excellent example of its kind with the premier end of road position providing both a high degree of privacy and potential to extend s...
"Tastefully presented and spacious, four-bedroom, modern, detached family home with gardens, a driveway, and an integrated garage. Located in a modern development in the village of Gartcosh, North Lanarkshire, just east of Glasgow centre. A welcoming entrance hall leads into a front-facing..."
"A most impressive, stone fronted mid terraced villa, with a fabulous dining sized kitchen, 3 bedrooms & study, set within a much sought-after & established pocket of Rutherglen.  EPC – D"
"A beautifully appointed detached villa benefitting from bright accommodation over two levels. The subjects comprise of a reception hallway with cloakroom off, lounge to the front with bright aspects, Sitting room to the rear generous, dining sized kitchen with wall and base mounted ..."
"We're delighted to present to the market this immaculate two bedroomed flat. Set on the preferred first floor within a well-kept red sandstone tenement building, the flat is situated in a prime position within the sought after district of Hyndland in Glasgow’s West End. 105 Clarence Dr..."
"*** New Fixed Price!!! ***Located within a quiet pocket of this popular development, early viewing is recommended. This 3 bedroom detached property, boasts conservatory, large rear garden plot, driveway and garage. Lenzie Academy Catchment EER - D"
This lovely two-bedroom duplex penthouse apartment has been refurbished during its current ownership to a high standard and is configured to offer a wonderful open plan living space with its kitchen separated by a peninsula and offering an excellent open outlook across the River Clyde to the sout...
"CODA Estates are delighted to present this semi-detached villa, occupying a delightful position in Larkfield Road. The property offers a flexible internal layout and excellent family accommodation over two levels. Requiring slight modernisation in areas however offering huge potential, this prope..."
Beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached villa occupying a prime location within a convenient locale and local amenities. Early internal viewings are highly advised to fully appreciate this family home
"Situated on the corner of Crow Road and Marlborough Avenue this well presented, bright and generously proportioned two-bedroom flat occupies a nice open and elevated second floor position within an elegant red sandstone tenement building. The property retains a number of period features and while..."
"A brand new home with 3 bedrooms and thoughtful touches throughout, enjoy more as standard such as integrated appliances and fitted wardrobes. Enjoy a generous open plan lounge and dining room with French doors out to your private rear garden. Move in this summer. Part exchange available."
"This spacious two bedroom apartment features French doors with a Juliet balcony. An open-plan living space contains the lounge, kitchen and dining area. 
 
The main bedroom comes complete with en suite. 
 
Further benefits include a second double bedroom, modern family bathroom and good storage ..."
"The Erinvale is a 3-bedroom home that benefits from an open-plan kitchen, dining, and family area, a separate living room, two double bedrooms, and an en suite to bedroom 1. French doors in the dining area open out onto the rear garden."
"Enjoying an excellent position within this extremely popular and sought-after residential locale of Lenzie, this extended, semi-detached, chalet style villa offers a flexible living space that accommodates a versatility of uses and is within easy reach of the local amenities including the train s..."
An elegant and well-proportioned elevated ground floor traditional flat which commands an excellent position within this highly desirable location and is regarded as one of Shawlands best. The accommodation is truly in walk-in condition and retains a wealth of character and is finis...
"****Closing Date Thursday 16th March at 12 noon ****Located in the desirable ‘Kensington Gate’ development this McLean built detached villa offers extensive accommodation ideal for family life. Modernisation is required throughout, this has been reflected in the asking price. Early viewing will b..."
"*PRICE REDUCTION* A truly impressive, bright and beautifully proportioned three bedroom detached villa occupying a superb location within a modern sought after estate. Presented to the market to a truly excellent standard throughout, this delightful modern detached villa will not..."
"Set within this much sought-after residential pocket is this four apartment detached bungalow. The property is located in popular area of Kings Park and offers versatile accommodation comprising entrance vestibule leading to reception hallway, spacious bay window lounge, kitchen, bathroom a..."
"This exceptional home has been thoroughgoingly rebuilt from the inside to out, once a derelict building now an immaculate six bedroom semi-detached family home sitting in an ideal central location for access to both the North and South side of Glasgow City.  Entry to the home via ..."
"A very spacious and beautifully presented, ground floor, traditional three bedroom tenement apartment. This flat benefits from east and west aspects bringing ample natural light through the flat. Set in a superb location in the Woodlands area of Glasgow's West End. The accommodation i..."
"Situated within the prestigious landmark Palazzo Building in Glasgow’s Merchant City, this 3rd floor, two-bedroom high quality apartment has dual aspects towards both the Italian Centre and the Sheriff Court Building. The development was completed by Manor Kingdom in 2009, it is located on ..."
***LAST FEW REMAINING*** This wonderful 3 bedroom Dundonald townhouse is a fabulous property both inside and out. It is beautifully stylish with its' modern look and design and is perfect both for...
"**UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET** This beautiful 3 bed detached villa has been extensively upgraded to high standard, sporting a single story extension with wc and potential for 4th bedro..."
"Lanarkshire Law Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi detached property situated in a highly sought after area of Kings Park, Glasgow. An outstanding opportunity for an array of buyers. Properties of this style are rarely available."
"A successfully extended, corner appointed three bedroom detached villa offering a spacious and well-proportioned layout of apartments formed over two levels. The property offers flexible accommodation throughout, and is ideal for the family market, nestled close to all local popular schooling, am..."
"
Well presented and expansive first floor traditional flat set within substantial sandstone building which enjoys a most central and convenient location. The property offers well laid out and good sized accommodation which in full comprises welcoming reception hallway, well presented lounge with ..."
"* Beautifully Presented & Spacious Five Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home * Rarely Available & Highly Sought After Residential Area Of St Leonards, East Kilbride * Tastefully Extended Offering Flexible Family Living - Viewings Essential * Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas C (cont.)"
"A beautifully presented and refurbished, three bedroom second floor apartment set within this continually sought after development by Dickie Homes, set with attractive landscaped resident's gardens, close to the Giffnock amenities."
"Deceptively spacious, three bedroomed, detached villa, enjoying a delightful, cul-de-sac plot with the benefit of not being directly overlooked at the rear and situated within this popular residential..."
"Set within a short cul-de-sac setting and surrounded by homes of similar quality, this professionally extended detached villa is ideal for the growing family market. Comprises, entrance vestibule, reception hall, front facing lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen and bedroom four/Tv roo..."
"Ground floor retirement flat in popular Muirend location. Handy for shops and transport, this delightful flat will appeal to all who view. Age restrictions apply. Sec door entry, hall, lounge, kitchen, bedroom, shower room, excellent cupboard space, electric heating, double glazing, parking."
"A bright and well presented three bedroom end terrace villa set within this established and popular small modern development, built by MacTaggart & Mickel, well placed for local amenities, transport links and popular East Renfrewshire schools."
"Well presented and maintained by the current owner, this three bedroom semi-detached villa offers an ideal family home located in a prime corner position within a highly popular, quiet, residential district. The accommodation internally comprises of welcoming reception hallway with u..."
Right at the heart of town and one of The Merchant City's most desirable addresses The Chrysalis Building is a central point around which much of the character of the area radiates. This really smart and swish 2 bed flat is a most perfect place to be and has a unique hidden courtyard garden to hi...
"Perfectly placed within this charming conservation area. This impressive semidetached villa is offered for sale in walk-in condition and is sure to impress on viewing. The home will ultimately appeal to the family market looking for village living, which includes a popular primary schoo..."
"A fantastic, 3 bedroomed detached family home, sitting on a substantial garden plot at the corner of Cedar Gardens/Larchfield Drive, in a much sought-after and established pocket of Burnside.  EPC – C."
Phone Lines Open 8.00am to 10.00pm 7 Days a Week! Download HR From EPC Link on the Listing. Click on the video to see the interactive 360-degree Virtual Tour.
"Plot 15 at The Picture House is a 2 bedroom third floor apartment benefiting from bay window, open-plan kitchen and living area, 2 double bedrooms with master en suite."
"Perfect for first-time buyers or professionals, featuring a private parking space. 
 
With a welcoming hallway and handy utility space, off the hall leads to an open-plan kitchen, dining and living area with added storage space providing the perfect space for entertaining. 
 
The apartment is com..."
"Perfect for professionals or downsizers, featuring a private parking space. 
 
With a welcoming hallway and handy utility space, off the hall leads to an open-plan kitchen, dining and living area with added storage space providing the perfect space for entertaining. 
 
The apartment is complete w..."
"The Kinloch is an energy efficient and chain free family home which boasts a large, open-plan kitchen and dining area with stylish fitted units and French doors onto the rear garden. Upstairs, there are 2 double bedrooms and 1 single."
"The Cupar is a 3 bedroom home, perfect for first-time buyers and second steppers. 
 
Featuring a stunning open-plan kitchen/dining area with easy access to your private garden, there's plenty of space to entertain all your friends and family
 
On the first floor, the main bedroom features an en s..."
"Located in the ever desirable Annan Drive within the Colquhoun Park area of Bearsden, this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a modern semi detached villa which would suit a wide range of buyers and early viewing is highly recommended. The property comprises : reception hallway, lounge/ dinin..."
"Deceptively spacious, detached villa enjoying a delightful situation within this popular residential development, close to the centre of Stepps and with a mature tree-lined backdrop creating a good degree of privacy to the rear garden. The combination of house and plot is difficult to..."
CLOSING FOR OFFERS FRIDAY 10TH MARCH 2023 AT 12 NOON! This truly immaculate and spacious three-bedroom semi-detached property is conveniently situated within the ever popular Oatlands Gate development by the highly regarded Avant Homes. Presented to the market in true turn- key condit...
"This is a fantastic opportunity to secure a lovely three bedroom detached home in the ever popular Carrickstone area of Cumbernauld. Popular with families and ideally placed for commuters, this home features a converted garage which offers additional living space, a driveway, dining area, master..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this rarely available three bedroom detached property in Balloch of Cumbernauld. Rarely available and spacious in layout throughout, this property would attract all types of buyers however would make a great family home. Downstairs you enter via ..."
A fabulous detached villa forming part of this incredibly popular modern development. This three bedroomed house offers generous family accommodation over two levels and is a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. The house is approached via monoblocked driveway and la...
"An incredible, main door apartment situated in this incredibly popular and quiet pocket of Pollokshields. Having undergone a full and extensive renovation, this stunning three bedroomed flat is a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. The flat is accessed via its own, ..."
*** Magnificent Family Property *** This splendid family home has been tastefully finished and presented throughout by the current owners. Early viewing is essential to appreciate the standard of finish. The garage has been converted to provide additional space and there is a substantial timber f...
Beautifully presented and rarely available 3-bedroom/6apt semi-detached bungalow; located in the popular locale of Cardonald on the Southside of Glasgow. The property has been maintained to a high standard throughout - it will delight all who view. Early viewing is highly recommended.
"Well presented extended semi-detached villa, enjoying a prime location set within the Braehead development within Cathcart. The property is located close to local shops and transport and within easy reach of both Clarkston and Shawlands. The accommodation extends to entrance hallway..."
Set within the amazing Commonwealth Games Athletes' Village is this fantastic 4 bedroom end terraced property which is set over 3 levels and is located approximately three miles East of Glasgow City Centre. There is also planning consent for a single level extension to the rear of the property
"Located within quiet cul-de-sac is this beautifully presented detached villa. The property has been professionally extended and upgraded to a high standard throughout and offers ideal family accommodation. The subject extends to a welcoming reception hallway, guest WC, good sized lounge with Fr..."
"Prepare to be impressed, with this signature show stopping duplex apartment boasting an incredibly impressive double height living space in the heart of the Merchant City. The mighty former Sheriff Court development offers residents a concierge service. A well-equipped gym, choice of ..."
"Brand new, three bedroomed, mid-terrace town house, set in a cul-de-sac position within this new development, which is immediately off Cumbernauld Road opposite Lethamhill Golf Course. Dece..."
"HomeLink are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom detached villa located within the popular area of Gartcosh, Glasgow. The accommodation, sitting on a prime corner plot, comprises on the lower level; reception hallway, spacious lounge with feature fireplace and French doors lea (cont.)"
"Experience LIGHT and BRIGHT OPEN spaces, BIFOLD doors and CONTEMPORARY sanitaryware. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE."
"Plot 1 being the only 3 bed detached property located within the development of Nethercroy is certainly unique, and not to be missed. This home benefits from a spacious open plan lounge, kitchen and dining area which can be very beneficial for those social occasions. The garden to the rear is a..."
"The Fyvie is a spacious and airy three bedroom home. It offers a luxurious family accommodation with energy efficient; PV solar panels at an affordable price tag.The ground floor boasts an open plan kitchen/dining area with French doors, perfect for entertaining as it not only brightens the room ..."
"With 3 bedrooms, the Baxter is a wonderfully comfortable home for professional couples and families."
"A superb and spacious three bedroom semi detached property, enjoying a sought after positioning within this residential setting of Pollokshields. This attractive property benefits from gas fired central heating, double glazed windows throughout, loft access and an expansive rear garden. Furthermo..."
"Benefitting from two secure parking spaces, this spacious two-bedroom apartment is situated on the 2nd floor of the original Lancefield Quay warehouse building. Located on the edge of the River Clyde, our property offers south facing aspects over the river and beyond, from both the bright sunroom..."
"Plot 135 is a stylish 3 bedroom end-terraced family home set over 3 floors. With creative storage solutions throughout and top floor dedicated to the master ensuite., The Roxburgh is an ideal home for growing families."
Showhome now open. Design-led living in this home features OPEN PLAN living with EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM.
"A brand new two bed apartment by Cala Homes. The open plan kitchen and living area is bathed in light with a patio door to your walk-on balcony bringing the outdoors in. Complete with allocated parking, integrated appliances and secure video entry system."
Superb ground floor garden apartment in the popular area of Clarkston within walking distance to local amenities.
"Professionally extended family property, offering flexible accommodation over two levels. Located within a very desirable residential pocket of the village early viewing is imperative. 4 bedrooms(master ensuite), large sun room, GCH, DG, Driveway and additional downstairs w/c EER - C"
"Well presented four bedroom villa extended over two levels and offering a versatile layout, the generously proportioned accommodation extends to entrance hallway, lounge with under stair storage, large modern kitchen leading through to the dining room, utility and a great sitting room / bedroom ..."
This wonderfully trendy upper duplex conversion in the picturesque conservation village of Eaglesham boats generous living space and exceptional garden grounds. Sitting within one of the best addresses within the village this home enjoys open outlooks over The Orry Park and Woodland area.
"A three bedroom semi detached villa, extremely well placed for amenities within the surrounding district."
"Three bedroom detached villa nestled on a good sized plot, with private rear garden and off street parking. Situated within a popular pocket of Stewartfield, early viewing is advised to avoid disappointment. The property comprises entrance porch with handy WC, through to a spacious lounge with fe..."
"A spacious and highly sought after two-bedroom flat, with allocated underground parking, located in the heart of the desirable Kelvinside area."
"This is an excellent opportunity to acquire a superb 'Wimpey' built semi-detached villa set on a corner plot. The property offers direct access to The Leisure Drome, primary schooling and the Forth & Clyde Canal. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, sitting room, dining room..."
"*** New Price !*** This substantial 4 bedroom family property is located within a highly desirable cul-de-sac close to all local amenities and transportation links. Boasting separate dining room/tv room, downstairs w/c, garage and driveway, early viewing is essential. EER - D"
"Delightful three bedroom first floor flat, with lift access and balcony, situated within the ever popular Norwood Park development."
"MQ Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this wonderful traditional tenement, ground floor flat in the ever popular and bustling Pollokshields area. The flat comprises of entrance hallway accessed via storm doors, spacious lounge, dining kitchen, three bedrooms, bathroom and communa..."
"The Ardbeg is a three-bedroom home designed for modern family living. Features of the Ardbeg include an entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, front-aspect lounge and a spacious open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading out to the rear garden. Bedroom one has its own en-suite facility."
Plot 134 is a stylish 3 bedroom end-terraced home. The Buchanan features a stunning bay window & French doors to rear garden.
Plot 131 is a stylish 3 bedroom end-terraced home. The Buchanan features a stunning bay window & French doors to rear garden.
"** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** Stunning 2 bedroom, top floor, executive property with large balcony and underground parking located in desirable development of luxury apartments within the affluent suburb of Giffnock. ."
"CHICAGO LARGE 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME. This stunning home offers large lounge, family dining kitchen with quality integrated appliances. family bathroom with vanity & shower, master bedroom with EN-SUITE. A further 2 good sized bedrooms, French doors to large private garden, monobloc driveway"
"This two bedroom semi detached property must be viewed to be appreciated its beauty, it is situated adjacent to Calderglen and offers spacious and flexible accommodation over two levels. It comprises on the ground level welcoming reception hallway, through to a bright and spacious lounge with Fre..."
The 3 bedroom Boswell home is perfect for those searching for extra space while enjoying contemporary living.
"Building site with original planning consent for Eight Apartments and associated parking, situated right in the heart of Stepps village and bound by the park on two sides. All apartments ha..."
"A Fully Refurbished Larger Style 2 Bedroom Terraced Villa With Quality Finishes Throughout, New Modern Flooring, Dining Kitchen With Plumbed Utility Cupboard, Approved Plans For Extension, Gas Central Heating, PVC Double Glazing, Viewing Advised."
"A beautifully presented, two bedroom plus en-suite apartment set in a cul de sac location within this former fire station building, Offering spacious and flexible accommodation and enjoying east and west aspects has been upgraded to an exacting standard by the present owners. "
Mad March Savings 3 fantastic offers from the builder to choose from Your New Home Mortgage free for 1 year Deposit Boost £10k cashback Homelink are delighted to offer this beautiful new development to the open market. These impressive three-bedroom homes are practical (cont.)
"Set within a lovely quiet pocket just off Orchard Park Avenue, this well-presented semi-detached villa offers a modern specification and contemporary décor which should appeal to an array of buyer groups. Internally, the accommodation comprises; initial entrance hallway with staircase to upper le..."
A wonderful opportunity to acquire this three bedroom detached bungalow set within a substantial plot located in the heart of Bothwell. Old Bothwell Road offers superb development opportunities whilst requiring significant upgrading and modernisation throughout. The accommodation in ful...
"*CLOSING DATE WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH 12 NOON* Allen and Harris are delighted to welcome this fantastic Three bedroom detached villa situated in the sought after Estate in Darnley. Located in a highly sought-after area, this property is well placed for local amenities, transport links, and sc..."
"This is an exceptional first-floor two-bedroom apartment that sits in the small Ladywood Estate in the center of Milngavie. It is a short walk to the train station and the shops. The development is surrounded by impressive mature gardens, the kind of size that is rarely seen in modern developments."
"Set within this highly popular local address and benefiting from views overlooking open countryside, this spacious semi-detached will ultimately appeal to the family market. Comprises, broad reception hallway, front facing lounge with focal point feature fireplace, dining room with rea..."
"Cleverly extended, four bedroom semi-detached villa enjoying an end of cul-de-sac position with Southerly aspects to the rear garden. Set in the sought-after locale of Lenzie the property is in walkin..."
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^***The Hanbury is a modern chain free and energy efficient home that features a spacious open-plan kitchen, living, and dining area with integrated oven, hob/hood plus French doors to the rear garden and a cloakroom."
"Built by Springfield Homes circa 2017, this beautifully presented three bedroom mid terraced villa is conveniently placed for all the local amenities in Uddingston. This lovely family home across two levels offers stylish and bright accommodation throughout.  Features include gas centra..."
"Three bedroom open-plan MID-TERRACE home with designer kitchen, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, BI-FOLD DOORS, downstairs WC, EN-SUITE to the main bedroom."
Top Floor Apartment | Great Condition | 2 Bedroom | Private South Facing Balcony | Modern Kitchen | Three-Piece Bathroom & Ensuite | Large Rooms | Secure Parking Space | Ideal Location Within Giffnock With Walking Distance Access to Amenities
"Held within a landmark development and benefitting from an extremely central position near all West End amenities, this substantial two/three-bedroom, apartment offers spacious accommodation, features two private balconies and has the added advantage of a private garage. Kelvin Court is an exc..."
"Located within the List 1 catchment for Jordanhill School, this three/four-bedroom extended villa occupies a corner plot and with vast gardens to the front and rear with a single garage. Windyedge Crescent is located just off Southbrae Drive and is well placed for amenities in Anniesland and ..."
"Stunning, 3-bedroom semi-detached home up to 1008sqft complete with generously-proportioned living space, kitchen & bedrooms. Integrated appliances and storage are provided as standard. Highly energy-efficient with solar PV panels. 2 car parking spaces. Spacious rear garden."
A delightful ground floor flat with two bedrooms forming part of this popular modern development in the heart of Pollokshields. The building is accessed via secure door entry system into a well-kept communal hallway. The accommodation of the flat itself comprises welcoming r...
"The LOUNGE opens, through a separate lobby, into a beautifully designed KITCHEN and dining room with FRENCH DOORS that keep the room fresh and make OUTDOOR DINING an easy option."
Located in a sought-after pocket of Mount Vernon lies this bright and spacious three-bedroom semi-detached villa. This wonderful home boasts generous living space over two levels and benefits from substantial garden grounds. 
A well presented and extended three bedroom/two public room end terrace villa set within this popular cul de sac development.
**50% OF THE DEVELOPMENT RESERVED ** ** GROUND FLOOR ** A unique development of only 8 contemporary two and three bedroom apartments in the converted Stonelaw High School Annexe. The luxury sandstone conversion will retain original features from the school while contemporary interiors ...
"Well-presented extended two-bedroom semi-detached house presented in ‘walk in’ condition set on a desirable plot within a quiet cul-de-sac. The property has a spacious and flexible layout, which will attract a variety of viewers, and is set in an extremely sought-after residential area within Bis..."
"This impressive, two-bedroom warehouse conversion is very generously proportioned at over 1042 sq ft, it has a balcony with fabulous west over the city’s skyline, excellent leisure facilities and residents parking. Situated on the second floor, the property forms part of the iconic Speirs W..."
"A spacious 2 bedroom ground floor conversion of an attractive stone fronted townhouse, which is presented to the market in turn key order."
**50% OF THE DEVELOPMENT RESERVED** *GROUND FLOOR* A unique development of only 8 contemporary two and three bedroom apartments in the converted Stonelaw High School Annexe. The luxury sandstone conversion will retain original features from the school while contemporary interiors and f...
"Maintained and upgraded throughout to a very high standard is this three-bedroom detached villa, with conservatory, garage, multiple car driveway and many features listed. It is convenient for all local amenities, primary and secondary schools, sports and recreational facilities, and regular buses"
"A fantastic modern three bedroom Detached Bungalow with generous room dimensions and enclosed private gardens set within an extremely sought after and established locale. The property also has lounge/dining area, modern fitted kitchen and family wet room. Early viewing is advised."
"The Blyth End 3-bedroom home features PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and BUILT-IN WARDROBE, space for HOME OFFICE, separate LOUNGE and more."
"Enjoy three-storey-living with The Skibo, a chain free and energy efficient home. This home features and open-plan living, kitchen and dining area with French doors opening to the rear garden. Upstairs features 3 spacious double bedrooms and an en suite to bedroom 1"
"***UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET***360 VIRTUAL VIEWING TOUR AVAILABLE****Keys Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this modern detached villa, set within the popular and sought after a..."
"The City is a two-bedroom apartment with fantastic space, available on each of the six floors of Block A. Accommodation comprises of open plan living area and kitchen, two double sized bedrooms, ensuite and sleek modern bathroom. The City prices are from Â£233,000 within th..."
"The most significant and stylish Glasgow City Centre development of the past decade the chic, stylish and spacious ' Upper Bell Street' development offers a range of 1, 2 or 3 bedroom apartments providing high quality City living nested in a revived community. With the social, nightlife and foodi..."
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Sandhill is a stunning chain free and energy efficient home, which features an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area with built in oven, hob and chimney hood and French doors to the rear garden. "
"2 bedroom semi detached villa with converted attic room, set in the popular Stonedyke development of Bearsden. This well proportioned family home is formed over two levels with the internal accommodation comprising of; Reception hallway, leading to a large lounge open plan to the dining room ..."
"Beautifully presented 3 bedroom detached villa, situated in the much admired Glen Iris development. The property has been tastefully decorated and is in walk in condition. An excellent family home s..."
"Upload Abode is delighted to present this expansive 4 bedroom first floor duplex flat. Set within the desirable surroundings of Cathcart and offering generous rooms, a flexible layout as well as traditional character and modern finish."
"Well presented spacious four bedroom / two public room traditional duplex flat, set within reroofed building and located close to local amenities and services.
Well kept communal entrance hallway and stairwell. Spacious reception hall with ample storage and staircase to upper level. Generous bay..."
"****** CLOSING DATE MONDAY 27TH FEBRUARY 2023 AT 2PM ****** Located in the ever popular Briarcroft Drive in Robroyston, this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a truly stunning detached villa with direct access to the M80 and supermarket shopping. Early viewing on this property is highly..."
"Beautifully presented and rarely available traditional sandstone mid terraced villa situated within the much sought after locale of Linthouse. The spacious family accommodation comprises welcoming reception hallway, stunning bay windowed lounge, impressive modern dining size kitchen, utility are..."
"Enhanced enormously by virtue of a full side extension, this attractive family home now offers a superb balance of family accommodation and is set within one of Giffnock's more popular residential pockets and sought-after school catchment zones."
"Located on a desirable cul-de-sac in Robroyston, this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a truly stunning modern detached villa which is in turn key condition with direct access to the M80 and supermarket shopping. Early viewing on this property is highly recommended to avoid disappointment. ..."
"Seldom available, a well presented three bedroom/ two public room terraced home, with private landscaped gardens, located in this continually popular cul de sac development, close to local amenities."
"Hoppers present this modern semi-detached villa, located in a quiet cul-de-sac close to local amenities and transport links. This tidy family home benefits from generous off-road parking, a garage, a conservatory, superb garden areas and its own pub!"
"This extended two bedroom semi detached villa, occupies a fairly large plot within one of the most desirable and sought out addresses in Bishopbriggs.  The home has an extremely flexible and adaptable layout and is extremely well located for local amenities."
This Modern 2 bedroom Top Floor Flat was built in 2007 by Messers CALA homes and is in one of the quieter locations with benefit of attractive views from the lounge onto Cairnhill Wooods
"Harbor Property are delighted to welcome to the market this 4 bedroom end terrace townhouse set within a modern development in Cardonald. Built circa 2021, this home will appeal to a wide range of buyers. We would recommend early viewing to avoid disappointment."
"A 2 Bedroom Mid-Terrace Villa Which Has Been Externally Refurbished In The Popular Sandyhills Area With Good Size And Shape Garden Grounds To Rear Enclosed With Patio Area, Gas Central Heating, PVC Double Glazing, Viewing Advised."
"Set within the sought-after East Renfrewshire school catchment pocket, this superb end-terraced family home has been professionally extended to now deliver an impressive five apartment compliment of accommodation."
"Situated within an extremely peaceful cul de sac and offering bright, airy accommodation and an impressive internal specification - this attractive, three-bedroom modern apartment benefits from a first-floor position and is located within a luxury development that benefits from a resident's sw..."
"A contemporary styled main door duplex apartment, designed with open plan living foremost in mind and benefitting from private gardens to the rear."
An immaculately presented 'Dutch-style' semi-detached home; thoughtfully converted to deliver the perfect complement of family accommodation within this ever sought--after pocket of East Renfrewshire.
"The Coull is a stylish three bedroom home perfect for young families or those taking their first step.
 
The ground floor features a generous sized lounge, as well as an open-plan kitchen/dining area with access to the back garden. 
 
There is also plenty of storage space and a WC.
 
Upstairs, th..."
#CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 16TH MARCH AT 10AM# Located in the heart of the much sought after Dowanhill District this immediately impressive double aspect two bedroom apartment forms part of the landmark development built by Notman and Lodge which was constructed in 1966-1967. The property ...
"Set in a desirable pocket is this substantially extended 5-bedroom semi-detached villa. It is set on a large corner plot, has a garage and parking to rear and is convenient for all amenities, regular bus services and primary and secondary schools. "
"The Benbecula is the perfect chain free, energy efficient home which features a front-facing kitchen/breakfast area, plus spacious living room with French doors to the garden. The home features 1 double bedroom and 2 single - all sharing a contemporary family bathroom with quality Roca sanitaryware."
"The Blair plot 124 is a stylish 3 bedroom end-terraced home, perfect for growing families."
"An impressive own door, ground floor flat within a handsome blonde tenement, located in the heart of a thriving Southside community of the Pollockshields area. This substantial three bedroom flat is presented in immaculate condition and is sure to impress any discerning purchasers."
"Situated on the fourth floor this two bedroom apartment enjoys open-plan living/kitchen/dining, family bathroom, principal en suite and separate utility area."
"SHOW APARTMENT NOW AVAILABLE TO VIEW. Spacious, OPEN-PLAN, 2 bedroom, THIRD FLOOR apartment available in CATHCART by Westpoint Homes. ALLOCATED PARKING. £227,000. Only £99 to reserve and no deposit required until March 2023!"
"There is a real shortage of new build properties in the local area, so we expect these contemporary three bedroom semi-detached villas on the edge of Croy village to be popular! Presented to the market by award-winning local agent Kelvin Valley Properties, it is recommended that interested partie..."
"A sought after three bedroom mid terrace house with allocated parking, situated within the Anniesland district."
"A beautiful and stylish townhouse offering exceptionally well-presented accommodation and scenic views over the canal. Likely to attract family buyers or professionals the accommodation is well laid out over three levels extending to hall, downstairs w/c, spacious and bright lounge with access to..."
"Discreetly positioned at the head of a small cul-de-sac, a fabulous modern 3 bedroomed detached villa with driveway and a particularly large garden from which there are tremendous views across the city.  EPC – D"
"Occupying a bright top floor position within this attractive blonde sandstone tenement building, a sizeable duplex flat extending to five principal apartments with open aspects to front."
"Set in a highly desirable pocket close the ""James Hamilton Heritage Loch"" is this extended 4-bedroom semi-detached villa with 3 car driveway. It is convenient for East Kilbride Train Station, Village, Kingsgate Retail Park, primary and secondary, schools and sports and recreational facilities."
"The Halston End is an ideal home, designed for maximum practicality and convenience; the kitchen shares the ground floor with a living-dining room where french doors opening to the garden fill the interior with fresh, natural light. Sharing the ground floor is the handy downstairs WC. Upstairs, t..."
"In one of the best residential locations in the area, as bright as a button, as sharp as a tack and as fresh as a daisy this is a truly fabulous corner set 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom flat in a prestigious development at the corner of Albion and George Street in the heart of the Merchant City. Accesse..."
"Located within the Charing Cross area of Glasgow, this spacious, four bedroom duplex flat offers spacious accommodation over two levels with a South facing balcony and secure under ground parking. Berkeley Street is well placed for quick and easy access to West End and City Centre amenities, incl..."
"The property comprises a superb and spacious two bedroom flat contained within a red sandstone tenement building occupying a popular and central West End location. The accommodation from secure entrance enters into a welcoming reception hallway , superb lounge , fabulous re-fitted dining kit..."
"Allen & Harris are delighted to offer to the market this extremely rare 4 bedroom extended semi detached villa located with the popular area of Kelvindale, Glasgow. This property would ideally suit younger and older families alike and early viewing is highly recommended to avoid any disappointment."
"A most charming traditional four apartment terraced cottage with rear driveway and private enclosed child safe garden. The accommodation comprises reception hallway, attractive lounge with wood burning strove which leads directly into a lovely modern bright kitchen with feature skylight windows, ..."
"Centrally situated within this sought after high amenity district, this SEMI VILLA offers easily maintained family accommodation formed over two levels. Situated within a cul-de-sac the property is only a few minutes from the Greenlaw Retail Park and The Avenue shopping centre, Parklands Sport..."
STYLISH & CONTEMPORARY 5TH FLOOR 1 BEDROOM MODERN APARTMENT SITUATED WITHIN THE ICONIC PARK HOUSE BUILDING WHICH IS SET ON PARK CIRCUS PLACE IN ONE OF THE MOST SOUGHT AFTER DISTRICTS IN GLASGOW
"An impressive ground floor modern flat in the prestigious Burlington Gate development close to a wealth of local amenities. The principal accommodation comprises security entry system, large reception hallway with good storage off, fabulous lounge with bay window and additional space for dining,..."
"Rarely to grace the open market within this most sought after local address, this spacious three bedroom semi-detached villa will ultimately appeal to the family market. The home is offered for sale in walk-in condition and benefits’ from traditionally sized accommodation through..."
"Located within a sought-after location in Glasgow’s city centre, we are delighted to present this rarely available spacious two bedroomed flat in Dunlop Street."
"Solid, snazzy and self confident, much like our amazing City itself, this stunning corner flat is a masterclass of Victorian building heretige and is as great as Greater Glasgow gets. Exceptionally fabulous this super-luxe home of residential brilliance sets a high bar of top end urban living. Di..."
"***Prime West End Location***MQ Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this seldom available, first floor, freshly decorated, traditional tenement flat in Glasgow's west end, just off the city centre. The property comprises of a welcoming entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen, two doub..."
"UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET A beautiful, ground floor, drawing room conversion set in one the West End's premier locations. The accommodation comprises of a stunning communal entrance hallway with access through to the flat off this level. A private entrance hall gives a..."
"Impressive corner situated SECOND (TOP) FLOOR APARTMENT within an exclusive landscaped development, just a short walk from excellent local amenities. Attractively decorated throughout and enjoying panoramic aspects over the surrounding district and beyond, the property offers generously proporti..."
"Spacious garden apartment featuring open-plan living/kitchen/dining area, family bathroom and principal en suite."
"Situated on the third floor this two bedroom apartment enjoys open-plan living/kitchen/dining, family bathroom, principal en suite and separate utility area."
"The Blair plot 129 is a stylish 3 bedroom mid-terraced home, perfect for growing families."
"The Blair plot 127 is a stylish 3 bedroom mid-terraced home, perfect for growing families."
"**FLOORING AND LBTT PAID ** This stylish two bedroom apartment has been designed with modern living in mind. The open plan kitchen and living area is bathed in light thanks to the large windows and doors leading to your private balcony, creating a beautifully bright space."
"* Very Well Presented, Bright & Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached Home * Modern & Neutral Decor As Well As Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Rear Facing Lounge Dining Room, Modern Kitchen, Additional Family Room * Two Spacious Bedrooms & Two (cont.)"
"There is a real shortage of new build properties in the local area, so we expect these contemporary three bedroom terraced houses on the edge of Croy village to be popular! Presented to the market by award-winning local agent Kelvin Valley Properties, it is recommended that interested parties mov..."
"Ideally located in the sought-after Netherlee address, this ground floor flat offers comfortable, well laid out accommodation with local amenities and transport links within easy reach. Accessed via a secure entry and communal hall, the accommodation comprises; a large welcoming entrance hallway ..."
"This detached modern Semi-detached Bungalow is presented to the market in walk in condition on a commanding corner site. Comprising of - hall, lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, 3 beds and modern bathroom. Gas c-h. D-glazing. Lovely Enclosed Gardens. Garage and driveway."
"The Merchant is a generous two-bedroom apartment with excellent views towards the city centre, available on each of the six floors of Block A. The Merchant prices are from Â£220,000 with in this block. Accommodation comprises of open plan living area and kitchen, two double..."
"* Beautifully Presented & Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home * Highly Sought After Stewartfield Locale - Viewings Essential * Modern & Neutral Decor As Well As Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing * Spacious Front Facing Lounge, Modern Kitchen & Large Rea (cont.)"
"Set within one of the South-side's most desired locations, 15 Quentin Street offers a unique opportunity to purchase one of the most beautifully presented first floor flats in the area. The apartment boasts the perfect combination of traditional style and luxury modern features and is unique..."
"A stunning top floor (third) penthouse style apartment with private balcony, situated in a modern development with tree lined aspects to the rear and far reaching views over rooftops from the lounge a..."
"FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION THURSDAY 30TH MARCH 2023 AT 9.00AM. Residential development land circa 1470sqm, with planning permission for 8 two-bedroom flats with private parking. Potential for larger social housing complex, subject to permission. Prime south side location."
Offering spacious and flexible accommodation is this 3 bedroom elevated ground floor tenement flat which has recently had a new kitchen installed and offers a unique layout between the kitchen and lounge. Accommodation Communal entrance with audio security entry Entrance ves...
This is an immaculately and tastefully presented two bedroom flat occupying a preferred first floor position within an elegant red sandstone tenement building constructed circa 1900. The property enjoys a superb outlook along Crow Road in both directions and over to Broomhill Cross. Internally th...
Zone Group are delighted to introduce to the market this two bedroom third floor apartment.
"Kirkland Estate Agents are proud to offer this fantastic 3 bed semi-detached villa in Ellismuir Park, Uddingston. Presented in true walk-in condition, this home provides comfortable family living over two levels. Early viewing is advised."
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Hanbury is a modern 3-bedroom home that features a spacious open-plan kitchen, living, and dining area - which benefits from French doors to the rear garden - two double bedrooms, and a well-equipped family bathroom."
"The Newmore is a three-bedroom home designed for modern family living. This home features an entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, front-aspect lounge and spacious open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading out to the rear garden. Bedroom one is en suite and there’s a family bathroom."
"***HD 360 VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE*** Keys Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market, this rarely available, modern 5th floor flat, set within the popular and much sought after address of Wa..."
"This is a particularly stylish two-bedroom ground floor which forms part of a handsome red sandstone tenement building on Melrose Gardens, a quiet residential “no through road” street just off Wilton Street. The interior of the flat is absolutely immaculate and has been re..."
"Located within an extremely popular address in the Woodlands district of Glasgow's bustling West End - this spacious, two bedroom first floor tenement apartment offers airy accommodation and is conveniently-placed for gaining quick, easy access to a broad selection of amenities including Glasgow ..."
Plot 133:
"An outstanding traditional first floor flat, fully and extensively refurbished, offering stylish interiors, luxurious specifications with an abundance of period features. The flexible, well-proportioned accommodation comprises security entry, fabulous original communal stairway with period..."
"Situated on the first floor this two bedroom apartment enjoys open-plan living/kitchen/dining, family bathroom, principal en suite and separate utility area."
"~Shared Ownership Option~ ''The Lennox'' is a spacious and modern two bedroom apartment, located on the second floor of the stunning new build extension at Moncrieff View. Featuring an open-plan living and dining room as well as a stylish fully-fitted kitchen and a master bedroom with en-suite sh..."
"Setting a high bar, and then sailing right over, this is a very stylish light filled 2 bedroom apartment with large windows and a broad balcony. With a brand new kitchen, bright, fresh and good to go the property is in an amazingly central location and has a flexible floor plate. Providing a col..."
With breathtaking open views from your own private roof terrace this stunning 2 level apartment is filled with light. In the best position in the development with broad aspects to the West this is a really exceptional City property. At the very heart of Glasgow's International Financial Services...
"The Blyth Mid - 3-bedroom home features PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE and BUILT-IN WARDROBE, space for HOME OFFICE, separate LOUNGE and more."
D J Alexander are delighted to welcome to the market this impressive two bedroom apartment positioned on the 6th floor of a modern city centre development.
**SECOND FLOOR ** A unique development of only 8 contemporary two and three bedroom apartments in the converted Stonelaw High School Annexe. The luxury sandstone conversion will retain original features from the school while contemporary interiors and fixtures and fittings provide all the c...
"MQ Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this spacious and modern, semi-detached family home in the great Parklands residential estate in Glasgow's south side. The property enjoys open outlooks to the front and rear of the property and comprises of a lounge area, dining kitchen, c..."
"New. Excellent two bedroom apartment, GCH, DG, en-suite shower and private terrace in the very heart of the West End."
"Coming Soon - Quarter West by Westpoint Homes, a stylish development of 35 one, two and three bedroom apartments in the popular area of Partick within Glasgow's vibrant West End."
35 Inverlair Drive is an impressive apartment occupying a first position in a beautiful modern development. It offers lovey views of across the grounds over the nearby water and beyond. Stunning internal specification and offered in immaculate walk-in condition. The accommodation reception hal...
"Beautifully presented and well-appointed three bedroom Barratt built semi-detached villa, enjoying an end position within this new development. Situated on the outskirts of Kirkintilloch close to Gar..."
"Immaculate traditional red sandstone first floor flat set in extremely popular spot within Anniesland and conveniently placed for West End, transport links, easy access to motorway networks, Clyde tunnel, West End, shopping, acclaimed restaurants & bars, and retail park with a superb range of pop..."
"Imaginatively altered and extensively improved, this impressive END TERRACE VILLA offers flexible family accommodation formed over three levels, whilst enjoying tree lined aspects to front and panoramic rooftop aspects to rear over the surrounding district. The specification includes double gl..."
"This extremely well-presented semi detached home sits within a popular modern development in the popular family pocket of Crookston and enjoys a convenient proximity to a variety of amenities and transport links. Delivering a stylish and thoughtfully configured interior, the ground floor layout ..."
"This two-bedroom flat is held on the ground floor of a traditional tenement building with a private front garden and is well placed for all West End amenities. Partick has a fantastic selection of bars, restaurants, and cafes, as well as a well serviced train and bus station on Dumbarton Road. By..."
An elevated terraced house set within private garden grounds
This large home is well placed to take advantage of all the Glasgow and the West End have to offer. The city centre is also easily reachable and there is a nearby subway station at St George's Cross.
"Set in a sought after centralised address within Bishopbriggs, this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a superb extended semi detached chalet villa which offers direct access to local amenities and schooling. This property is a must view to avoid disappointment. The accommodation compris..."
"There is a real shortage of new build properties in the local area, so we expect these contemporary three bedroom terraced houses on the edge of Croy village to be popular! Presented to the market by award-winning local agent Kelvin Valley Properties, it is recommended that interested parties mo..."
A highly unique five apartment duplex with private balcony overlooking the Whitecart Water.
"This beautifully presented family home is located within the ever popular and sought-after Hallside Farm Development. The property has been beautifully decorated throughout and finished with a mixture of quality floor coverings. Features include gas central heating, double glazing, moder..."
"A charming three bed bungalow, set within a small private cul-de-sac area of six properties. Accessed down a private lane with surrounding trees and bushes, this home is ideally suited for those looking to be close to the centre of town. The property requires some internal modernisation but has t..."
"PHASE 4 - FINAL PLOT - AVAILABLE FOR ENTRY - 'The Kingfisher' is an attractive 3 bedroom semi-detached property located with the exclusive Broomfield Crescent Development. This property offers quality accommodation over two levels, benefiting from master bedroom ensuite and additional downstairs ..."
A lovely mid terraced villa set within a popular residential development.
Tenanted 2 bedroom buy-to-let investment located in the centre of Glasgow. This property is in the Garnethill area of Glasgow and has a Home Report value of £220K. 
"FIND YOUR BEAUTIFUL HOME HERE! Exclusive development set within a much sought after locale. 2 bedroom semi detached home is generous in size. Lounge, dining kitchen, quality integrated appliances, 2 double bedrooms, bathroom with vanity, bath with shower, WC, MONOBLOC driveway, PRIVATE GARDENS"
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached villa set within a family friendly a cul-de-sac. The property accommodation extends to an entrance vestibule, bright and spacious lounge, modern fitted dining kitchen with French doors leaving to the enclosed gardens and guest WC. The ..."
"FIND YOUR BEAUTIFUL HOME HERE! Exclusive development set within a much sought after locale. 2 bedroom semi detached home is generous in size. Lounge, dining kitchen, quality integrated appliances, 2 double bedrooms bathroom with vanity, bath & shower, WC, monobloc driveway, private GARDEN"
"The Halston Mid is an ideal home, designed for maximum practicality and convenience; the kitchen shares the ground floor with a living-dining room where french doors opening to the garden fill the interior with fresh, natural light. Sharing the ground floor is the handy downstairs WC. Upstairs, t..."
"Enjoying a sought after location at the heart of the ever popular Meadowburn area, this semi-detached chalet villa has been reconfigured to create a spacious two bedroom house.  The property could easily be converted back into a three bedroom home, subject to consents.EPC BAND - D"
Second floor apartment..Plot 202 is our contemporary and practical 2 bedroom second floor apartment.
"****CLOSING DATE TUESDAY 7TH MARCH 12NOON**** Set within one of 'Muirends' addresses, this traditional red sandstone mid terraced villa provides good sized accommodation throughout. The property is offered for sale in need of substantial upgrading and is sure to appeal to the D.I...."
This fabulous three bed semi detached villa sits within a quiet crescent and has beautifully kept gardens with large driveway. The property is bright airy and is thoughtfully laid out. The large dining kitchen to the rear incorporates a range of modern base and wall mounted units with Fr...
"Enjoying an enviable position within the ever-popular Heather Gardens, this lovely three-bedroom semi-detached villa. This property was constructed in 2005 by Turnberry Homes."
"** FANTASTIC FIXED PRICE £210,000 - WELL UNDER HOME REPORT ** * Beautifully Presented, Spacious Three Bedroom Detached Family Villa * Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heating & Double Glazing Throughout * Spacious Front Lounge & Rear Facing Dining Room, Fitted Kitc (cont.)"
"The District layout is an ideal two-bedroom apartment for city-living, with views to both the north and south and is available on each of the six floors of Block A. The District prices are from Â£210,000 with in this block. Accommodation comprises of open plan living area a..."
Fantastic two bed city centre apartment
"This is an excellent opportunity to acquire a superb semi-detached villa with direct access to a bus link and local shops. The accommodation comprises a hallway with storage, lounge, dining room and a kitchen with access to the rear garden. Upstairs there are three well sized bedrooms and a moder..."
Harbor Property proudly present this beautifully presented top floor two-bedroom apartment. The property is well placed for local amenities with easy access to the city centre. Excellent opportunity for first time buyers and property investors alike.
"Sitting in a peaceful cul-de-sac in the sought after area in Glasgow, Newford Grove offers a wonderful level of luxury and comfort within its walls and sits just a stone's throw from the bustling High Street of Clarkston"
"Rarely available, larger style four bedroom mid terrace villa occupying a prime position within a quiet pocket of Merrylee. Agents highly advise early internal viewings to fully appreciate the size and quality of accommodation available."
"A beautiful home within a prime location in the heart of Shawlands. This ground floor flat has been extensively refurbished throughout and boasts an impressive private garden to the front of the property. The property is centrally sited, within easy reach of Queens Park and a host of Shawlands am..."
"A traditional red sandstone Ground Floor Flat which has been tastefully upgraded to provide modern, fresh accommodation throughout."
"New to the market is this spacious 3 bedroom semi-detached property in a sought after Earls Seat development within Lennoxtown. Positioned within a large corner plot with impressive gardens and conveniently close to the children play area, this modern family home is presented in immaculate condi..."
"A Rarely Available 3 Bedroom Larger Style Terraced Villa With Gas Central Heating, PVC Double Glazing, Open Plan Integrated Kitchen Diner, Downstairs WC Bathroom, Excellent Gardens, Viewing Advised. "
"Buy-to-Let Opportunity | Long Term Tenant Currently Situated | 4 Bedroom Town House | Private Driveway & Garage | Rear Garden Space | Bathroom, Shower Room & WC | Prime Glasgow City Location"
An attractive luxury apartment occupying a prime position within a much sought after and exclusive modern development located close to the heart of vibrant Shawlands. Early viewing is strongly advised to fully appreciate this fantastic property.
"Set within one of the South-side's most desired locations, 74 Dundrennan Road offers a unique opportunity to purchase one of the best designed and beautifully presented first floor flats in the area. The apartment boasts the perfect combination of traditional style and luxury modern features..."
In truly walk-in condition throughout this modern apartment exudes quality of finish from every angle. Tastefully upgraded throughout the many fine features are evidence of the care and attention to detail bestowed upon this property by the current owners. A top-notch property in an eternally pop...
"A truly impressive & substantial tenement flat, with 2 double bedrooms and a large dining sized kitchen, enjoying a prime first floor position within a well-maintained blonde sandstone tenement building in one of the much sought-after ‘Drives’ in central Dennistoun.  EPC - C"
Located in one of Blantyre's most sought-after housing developments and presented to the market in excellent condition lies this three-bedroom detached villa. The property for sale boats generous living space over two levels and would be a great opportunity for the family market. 
"If you're on the hunt for a spacious family home in the sought-after area of Springhill, Bailieston, this 4-bedroom semi-detached house might just be the one for you."
"Tucked away down a leafy enclave, minutes from the West of Scotland Science Park, this three-bedroom mid terrace villa was constructed by Messrs Dickie and Moore Ltd circa 2005. Situated in the Killermont area, the property is well placed for easy access to the West End, Bearsden and Milngavie, a..."
"The Hanbury is a modern chain free and energy efficient home that features a spacious open-plan kitchen, living, and dining area with integrated oven, hob/hood plus French doors to the rear garden and a cloakroom. Upstairs there are 2 double bedrooms and 1 single plus a modern family bathroom."
"An utterly charming, 4 apartment, stone fronted mid terraced villa, set within lovely landscaped gardens in the much sought-after Bankhead district of Rutherglen.  EPC – D."
First floor apartment..The Montrose plot 200 is our stylish 2 bedroom first floor apartment.
"SHOW APARTMENT NOW OPEN! £99 Reservation fee. INCENTIVES AVAILABLE (PLOT 17 GROUND FLOOR) - No deposit until March 2023. Exclusive development of one and two bedroom energy-efficient apartments within CATHCART. EXTENSIVE communal landscaped areas, ALLOCATED PARKING to two-bedroom apartment"
An exceptionally well presented two bedroom end terrace town house in an outstanding location close to the Canal. The property was built to an uncompromising standard and has been well maintained since new. Stand out modern features are high efficiency heating/insulation and capacity for EV charg...
"In a city that's always on the move this outstanding duplex flat in the city's finest setting is a great place to slow down and contemplate the hubbub below from your stylish, voluminous, West facing apartment in the Merchant City's most gorgeous and significantly pre-eminent development. Facing ..."
"This beautifully presented and spacious two bedroom end terrace villa offers versatile family living accommodation and is located in a sought after location. Viewing is essential in order to appreciate the size, style and quality contained within.."
"***Closing Date Wednesday 15th March 12pm*** An immaculate, well-appointed three-bedroom link-detached villa situated within this ever-popular Deaconsbank estate, offering excellent family accommodation over two levels this home has undergone some reconfiguration work to the ground flo..."
"A delightful first floor positioned tenement flat with dining sized kitchen, situated in this incredibly popular pocket of Shawlands. The current owner has maintained and improved this spacious apartment to an impressive level, making it a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. T..."
"What could be more convenient than having the world on your doorstep and this 3 bedroom, 2 bathroom, traditional flat delivers that and more. Running North to Glasgow's heart in George Square, Queen Street has a rich and varied architectural heritage. With its origins in the late 17th century it ..."
"Minutes walk from Glasgow University's main campus and surrounded by a vast selection of amenities in Hillhead, this surprisingly spacious, two bedroom, second floor, tenement apartment is an excellent investment and will appeal to young couples, buy to let investors and parents in search of acco..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - CASH BUY. The lovely apartment is currently let through Rettie Lettings for £1,200pcm. It is suitable for investor and cash purchase only. Matterport Digital Tour available to view online. This spacious corner set, two-bedroom apartment offers ..."
"The beautiful Balmoral two bedroom home offers luxury with an affordable price tag, making it a superb first home, or the perfect purchase for savvy downsizers. The ground floor features a stylish and comfortably sized lounge, a contemporary, light and airy kitchen/dining area boasting French doo..."
"This spacious and recently upgraded two-bedroomed flat occupies an excellent position within this lovely gated development. Occupying the top floor position, the property was built circa 2006 by Anderson Homes and is neutrally decorated throughout whilst complimented with quality hardwoo..."
"Located within an attractive, leafy address in North Kelvinside, approximately 1 mile from Glasgow University - this impressive, rarely available main door two-bedroom apartment is within minutes walk of numerous West End amenities and would make a wonderful home for a young professional couple o..."
"Excellent three-bed mid-terraced, Immaculately presented, a very popular area close to Silverburn, Excellent Transport links"
"Introducing an exceptional three bedroom mid-terrace property located in the highly sought-after Busby area. This stunning home has been beautifully presented to an exceptional standard throughout, boasting modern decor, high-quality fixtures and fittings."
"Presenting this wonderful 2 bedroom, Semi Detached villa, built by Miller Homes which is brought to the market in turn key condition. Early inspection highly recommended. "
"An exceptional top floor tenement flat with two double sized bedrooms and dining sized kitchen. The current owners have undertaken extensive works to create a home of outstanding quality, a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. This blonde sandstone tenement building ..."
Area of woodland in a rural yet accessible location close to Neilston on the outskirts of Glasgow. The woodland in Lot 1 extends to about 19.89 Ha (49.15 Acres).
****UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET**** MQ Estate Agents have great pleasure in introducing Armour Court to the market. The property has been refurbished throughout to an exceptional standard and is in complete walk in condition. The property is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac and has open outlo...
"Presenting to the market this lovely 3 bedroom Mid Terraced Villa, situated in the ever popular Clarkston area. Likely to appeal to many, this deceptively spacious 3 bedroom Mid Terraced Villa sits in a quiet location within Hillend Crescent. Early viewing highly recommended. "
"This 2 bedroom home is of a style rarely available within this popular development and provides accommodation which is in move-in condition throughout. Accommodation Reception hall WC/Cloak room with two piece suite The impressive, south facing, open plan lounge and re-f..."
" Offers over £200,000 per acre. Horsehill strategic land of approx 1.9 acres with potential for a service station 0.2 miles from junction 3 of the M80 (Stepps). This land is only available subject to a developer securing planning consent for development. Arronhill Plantation: woodland of ..."
"Located in the enviable West End location of North Kelvinside, this stunning one bedroom flat is incredibly bright, spacious and generously proportioned with fabulous views over the city and towards the Campsie Hills."
"A rarely available, detached villa conveniently located for a host of amenities and transport links. This fabulous family home comprises a welcoming reception hall, spacious lounge, open plan kitchen with dining area, three well proportioned bedrooms with master en-suite, modern family bathroom, ..."
"An exceptionally spacious and well laid out larger style top floor two bedroom apartment at the heart of Woodlands close to the West end and City Centre, easy transport links and many independent shops, cafes, bars and restaurants. The property has been rented out successfully for years and would..."
"**CLOSING FOR OFFERS FRIDAY 17TH MARCH @ 12PM NOON** This extended, semi detached home is presented to the market in fabulous order throughout and offers an appealing modern configuration. The property is ideally positioned in the sought after Rosebank district of Kirkintilloch EPC - D"
"Deceptively spacious, mid terrace villa, set in a popular residential area within easy reach of schooling, Clober Golf Club and the town centre. Offering a spacious and flexible internal la..."
"Located in one of Knightswood's most favoured Crescents, close to Knightswood Golf Course and park. This home boasts a stunning rear garden offering potential for extending. A well presented, two bedroom semi detached home enjoying a superb , southerly aspect. This property also benefi..."
"Beautifully presented semi-detached villa located within a highly popular area. The property has been upgraded and is tastefully decorated to a high standard throughout. The accommodation on offer extends to a welcoming reception hallway, impressive lounge with feature fireplace, good size cons..."
"Well presented traditional, mid terrace residence within a popular district of Drumoyne. The accommodation extends to an entrance vestibule hallway, with access to a spacious living room, fitted kitchen and fourth bedroom with en-suite facilities. There is a generous front garden area with an ext..."
"Offered to the market in fantastic condition throughout, is this good sized semi-detached villa, positioned within the heart of this highly successful development by Messrs Redrow Homes and offers outstanding accommodation for today's discerning family buyer. The property comprises entrance ..."
"Welcome to what could be your next home! These brand new, stunning 3 bedroom properties boast superior specifications and are designed to provide you with the ultimate living experience."
"The Balmoral plot 122 is a stunning two bedroom mid-terraced home featuring handy storage, superb for first time buyers."
"The OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING with FRENCH DOORS, makes OUTDOOR DINING a great option in summer months. Upstairs the PRINCIPAL BEDROOM with EN-SUITE has BUILT-IN WARDROBE and additional STORAGE"
"Located within an attractive sandstone tenement within minutes walk of Glasgow University, this substantial two bedroom apartment benefits from a first floor position and is surrounded by numerous amenities including Kelvingrove Underground Station. The home for sale is held within an eye-catc..."
"Occupying a superb central position within a popular Shawlands address, this fantastic three bedroom apartment situated on the preferred first floor of a sandstone building. The specification includes gas central heating, double glazing and secure entry, and in full comprises; welcoming and broad..."
"Occupying arguably the finest, ground floor position within this prestigious, retirement development, well-situated for regular bus links and Milngavie town centre. Built by Whatlings in the mid 1980s, Elm Court is a highly sought after retirement development and this beautifully presented, one b..."
"Situated within a highly sought after pocket of Bishopbriggs, a three-bedroom semi-detached villa set over two levels. The home is set amidst well kept, level gardens and is impeccably presented throughout. Although peaceful, the home is well situated for a wide selection of local amenities inclu..."
"Located in a sought after pocket of Mount Vernon is this spacious five apartment semi-detached villa which offers ideal accommodation for today's growing family buyer. The accommodation on offer extends to entrance hallway, bright lounge with open plan dining room, fitted kitchen, thr..."
Seldom available two bedroom flat set within the central and sought after Lochleven Apartments Development. Early viewing is highly recommended to avoid disappointment. 
"Two Bed Omar Ikon (45x20) The Omar Ikon whilst largely retaining the exterior styling and floor plan of its predecessor, benefits from a new contemporary colour scheme with vibrant accent colours.  To the exterior, long slender windows, French doors (to the lounge), feature cladding detail and..."
"The Balmoral plot 128 is a stunning two bedroom mid-terraced home featuring handy storage, superb for first time buyers."
"Immediate internal viewing is of paramount importance to fully appreciate this truly superb semi-detached villa built by John Lawrence Homes and offering fantastic family accommodation throughout. The property comprises entrance hallway, good sized and bright lounge, family dining area with ..."
"Two bedroomed, semi-detached bungalow, enjoying a mature plot in a prominent location, close to the amenities of Stepps and Millerston with ease of access to the M8 and M80 as well as to schooling and..."
"Located in a sought after cul-de-sac in the ever popular Brookfield development in Robroyston this is an excellent opportunity to acquire a stunning semi-detached villa with direct access to the M80, supermarket shopping and access to Robroyston rail link. Early viewing on this property is highly..."
"Putting the zing into amazing this unique 1 bed signature duplex apartment is filled with light from its near full height windows which allow maximum natural brightness to flood in. With a large private terrace, this incredibly seductive flat, in the Merchant City's cornerstone development provid..."
Preston Property Group is delighted to bring to the market this substantial 2 bedroom traditional second floor flat in the ever popular Pollokshields area of Glasgows Southside. 
"This beautifully presented family home is located within the ever popular and sought-after Newton Farm Development. The property has been beautifully decorated throughout and finished with a mixture of quality floor coverings. Features include gas central heating, double glazing, modern ..."
"Sitting head and shoulders above the pack this thoughtfully presented and beautifully appointed 5th floor, dual aspect flat with lift access and high volume ceiling height is practically perfect. Set in the pre-eminintly prime position of the signature block in the development this stylish and sw..."
"HD Video Walkthrough and 360 Tour Available. A wonderful and beautifully maintained modern three bedroom mid-terraced family home located within The Boulevard, a highly sought after modern residential development. This property offers spacious and flexible accommodation over three levels."
"Immaculately presented, semi-detached villa enjoying a fabulous position within this popular estate. The property is conveniently located for Bishopbriggs Academy and enjoys great road links to the central motorway network, Bishopbriggs train station is also nearby.  EPC BAND - C"
PHASE 3 - **(SOLD OUT) ** 'The Falcon' is a three bedroom end terraced house offering spacious family accommodation over two levels. Located within the prestigious Broomfield Gardens development this dwelling benefits from master en-suite & additional downstairs w/c.
"***UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET*** A Very Rarely Available Linked Detached Bungalow With Gas Central Heating, PVC Double Glazing, Dining Kitchen, Two Large Double Bedrooms, Modern Décor And Flooring Throughout, Utility Room, Shower Room, Multicar Driveway With Enclosed Gardens."
"***VIDEO AVAILABLE*** Keys Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market, this modern end-terraced villa set within the popular and much sought after address of Penicuik Lane, Carntyne. The p..."
"Rarely available in this desirable locale, Century 21 are delighted to present this 3 bed end terraced villa to the market. Offered in immaculate condition, this well appointed Persimmons built property requires early viewing. EER- Band B"
"A bright & attractive, 2 bedroomed ground floor apartment, with direct access to a private, south facing terrace, forming part of the much admired ‘Homes For The Future’ development at Glasgow Green.  EPC – C"
"A lovely, bright 2 bedroomed apartment situated on the preferred 1st floor of this development with a south-west facing balcony. Located within the desirable List 1 Jordanhill school catchment area, this apartment comprises of a hallway with storage facilities, a nicely proportioned south-west f..."
"Beautifully presented and rarely available two bedroom apartment sits on the preferred first floor of this popular modern development in Anniesland, and is presented to a high standard throughout. This property is offered to the market in walk-in condition and will suit a wide range of buyers due..."
"This semi-detached bungalow has been thoughtfully extended and now offers spacious accommodation, all on the level, in a well-regarded cul-de-sac position. The property has been tastefully modernised and decorated throughout.  EPC BAND - C"
"The property has been INDEPENDENTLY VALUED at £195,000 by a Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (RICS) qualified surveyor. Representing a unique opportunity to acquire a move-in ready semi-detached property on the outskirts of Glasgow, this home is ideal for any house hunter looking f..."
"Beautifully appointed traditional sandstone semi-detached villa offering spacious and flexible family accommodation. The property has been internally upgraded and modernised, and is tastefully decorated to a high standard throughout whilst maintaining original features. On ..."
This rarely available upper level two bedroom cottage flat is located within a modern cul-de-sac development set off Crow Road in the popular suburb of Broomhill. The property has been recently decorated throughout to a high standard and is presented in a beautiful condition. Situated...
"Forming part of this fabulous modern development is this delightful, second floor flat situated in a quiet pocket of Cathcart. The property is accessed via secure door entry system into a well-kept communal hallway and stairwell with lift access. The accommodation of the fla..."
"Truly stunning and immaculately presented modern mid terrace villa situated within a much sought after residential location. The property offers well laid out family accommodation over two levels, and offers many modern contemporary features. The accommodation in full comprises most w..."
"Beautifully presented and significantly up-graded by the current owners, early viewing will be imperative. This 3 bedroom semi-detached property is located within a quiet cul-de-sac within this highly desirable residential development. To arrange a suitable viewing appointment please do not hesit..."
"This two-bedroom terraced villa is maintained and upgraded throughout to a very high standard. It is within the catchment for East Renfrewshire's highly regarded schools, and convenient for all sports and recreational facilities, regular bus, and rail links, and the M77 and M8 motorway network. "
Enjoying a desirable top floor position in this well regarded development. This is a particularly spacious flat with a corner lounge with a balcony enjoying amazing views. The property is ideally located for access to local amenities and transport links.
"****** CLOSING DATE SET FOR MONDAY 20TH MARCH 2023 AT 2PM. PLEASE SUBMIT ALL FORMAL OFFERS TO SALES. ****** * Beautifully Presented, Bright & Spacious Three Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home * Walk In Condition - Modern & Neutral Decor, Gas Central Heatin (cont.)"
" Shanta Residential are delighted to present to the market, this modern three bedroom apartment in the hugely popular centre of Glasgow. Entering the building into a well-kept close via secured entry, the property occupies the first floor position and is split over two levels. The property is of..."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire a traditional ground floor flat situated right in the heart of Pollokshields. The property itself is within walking distance of local amenities and public transport services. Retaining many original features such as its decorative cornice, the property is a f..."
"D J Alexander are delighted to welcome to the market this traditional third floor, two bedroom property conveniently located at the heart of Glasgow's city centre."
"Beautifully presented four bedroom semi-detached villa in a sought after estate in Cambuslang. Features include garage conversion, two reception rooms, modern kitchen with white goods, four double bedrooms with fitted storage, master en-suite, modern boiler and double glazing and large back garden."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this rarely available three bedroom semi-detached property in the much sought after location of Darnley, Glasgow. Spacious in layout throughout you enter the welcoming hallway, the lounge is bright and leads into the fully fitted modern kitchen w..."
CLOSING DATE THURSDAY 16th 12 NOON Outstanding end of terrace house Very special internal presentation Many upgrades throughout Large landscaped grounds Off street parking for multiple vehicles Floored and lined attic Garden room with office and laundry r...
Attractive semi detached villa is in a popular cul de sac location in the Southpark Village development in Darnley. Having been attractively decorated and in lovely walk-in condition. An excellent starter sized family home and with many benefits. Lovely landscaped rear gardens and child friendly...
"Enjoying the second floor position of a much admired red sandstone building, this bright, immediately impressive, and superbly spacious four-bedroom maisonette is immaculately presented in turnkey condition. Internally the property has been finished to a high standard and freshly decor..."
"Benefitting from a South facing garden with private gate access onto open grassland, this spacious 3 bed semi-detached home provides a great opportunity in a sought after location within the Bellway estate, Milton of Campsie."
"A beautifully presented and exceptionally spacious one bedroom second floor flat in a highly sought after address in Woodlands close to the West End and City Centre. The apartment has been modernised throughout and would be perfect for a first time buyer, professional or couple looking for a mode..."
"This two-bedroom apartment is located on the 2nd floor of this fabulous development offering parking, lift access and secure entry. Internally, it has been well maintained and would suit a first-time buyer or savvy investor ls the development and looking for a great location between Finnieston an..."
An attractive semi-detached family home delivering an extremely well-ordered interior whilst capturing a striking outlook towards the 'Netherton Braes' to the front.
"Located on Queen Margaret Drive, highly regarded as an extension to the ever popular Byres Road, this property is just a short walk from The Botanical Gardens. With an abundance of attractive amenities on the doorstep, from organic food shops to trendy bars and restaurants, this is fast becoming ..."
"Delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom mid terrace home set in the ever popular
Allander Road. Property comprises; well manicured front entrance garden and porch, spacious living room with dining area to the rear, large newly fitted kitchen with floor and wall mounted units and door to..."
"*** CLOSING DATE 15/03/23 12 pm *** Rarely available elevated ground floor flat. Converted from a handsome blonde sandstone town house this property retains much of its original charm and character. Perfectly located moments from the bars, restaurants and cafes of vibrant Byres Road and a short ..."
"Located a short walk from Glasgow City Centre in Tradeston, is this impressive two bedroom modern apartment boasting flexible and spacious accommodation featuring private and secure residents parking, a wonderful resident’s courtyard, gas central heating and double glazing throughout. The accommo..."
NOW AT A FIXED PRICE!! Professionally extended mid terraced villa on a quiet and much sought after cul-de-sac contained crescent within a popular and rarely available pocket in Yoker that is just off Yokermill Road and a short distance to local railway station. The property compri...
"Set within established level grounds in this sought-after residential pocket of Pollokshields, this substantial detached home has been professionally converted into four wonderful apartments. The apartment is on the upper level and boasts sizable accommodation and contemporary fixtures and fittin..."
"Well presented fully refurbished Three Bedroom Semi Detached Villa with spacious accommodation comprising entrance hallway, lounge and newly installed open plan kitchen fitted to the highest standard, three bedrooms (all with inbuilt storage, newly installed tiled bathroom and downstairs cloaks/..."
This expansive ground floor flat within a traditional blond sandstone tenement is presented to market in the North Kelvinside area of Glasgow's famous West End.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this modern three bedroom semi detached villa which enjoys an enviable position . Offering versatile accommodation formed over two levels, the well designed accommodation comprises of an open plan lounge with feature staircase, kitchen, three bedrooms, downstairs..."
"***HD 360 VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE*** Keys Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market, this rarely available modern semi-detached villa, set within the popular and much sought after address o..."
An attractive end terraced family home delivering well-ordered interior whilst capturing a striking outlook towards the 'Netherton Braes' to the front.
"This well presented thee bedroom mid terrace villa is located within a highly popular residential development and is surrounded by homes of similar quality. The home will appeal to families and the professional market alike, and with its modern decor and good sized accommodation it is ..."
"Set within one of the South-side's most desired locations, 20 Arundel Drive offers a unique opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented top floor flat. The apartment boasts the perfect combination of traditional style and luxury modern features and is uniquely suited to purchasers seekin..."
"Well presented and wonderfully spacious two bedroom semi villa situated in a well established residential pocket of Lenzie, enjoying both rural and southerly aspects whilst being well placed for acces..."
"AMARCO Estates are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom, two public, 2 bath + wc semi-detached home located within the popular area of Uddingston, Glasgow. This property has been professionaly extended would ideally suit a growing family. Early viewing is highly advised to..."
************ FIXED PRICE FOR QUICK SALE! *************** Eighth floor modern flat within the popular River Heights development ideally situated on the riverside within easy walk of the city centre
"*READY TO MOVE INTO* This chain free, energy efficient apartment is the perfect first time buyer home. This home features an open-plan kitchen, dining and living area, plus 1 double bedroom with en suite, 1 single and a modern bathroom. Both the bathroom and en suite boast white sanitaryware "
"Fourth floor apartment.Plot 213 is our modern and spacious one bedroom fourth floor apartment. Featuring an open plan kitchen/living area and a smart built-in home office space, making working from home easier."
"Third floor apartment .Plot 212 is our modern and spacious one bedroom third floor apartment. Featuring an open plan kitchen/living area and a smart built-in home office space, making working from home easier."
A spacious modern 3rd Floor (Top Flat) within an exclusive residential pocket set adjacent to Pollock Country Park. Enjoying a wonderful situation with lovely aspects around and offering quick access to the M77 and M8 Motorway Network which is only a few minutes away by car. Local sup...
"Perfectly placed within this highly popular local address, this impressively sized traditional end terraced villa is sure to appeal to the family market. Although the property requires a degree of upgrading, it gives the opportunity to purchase within a premier local address. Comp..."
"An exceptionally spacious and well laid out four bedroom duplex flat, which has an HMO licence, in a central location in Kelvingrove close to The West End, City Centre and Park. The property requires some modernisation yet offers huge potential in a sought after location. The accommoda..."
"Tastefully presented and deceptively spacious traditional mid terrace cottage style villa, set amidst an exclusive development with historic ties to the old Gartloch Hospital; well placed for access t..."
"****HD VIDEO VIEWING AVAILABLE****Keys Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market, this rarely available, corner positioned, semi villa. Set within the popular and sought after address of Rhi..."
Fabulous larger style top floor flat within a locally admired and central Bothwell development. This particular flat enjoys the premier corner position and benefits from spectacular views from all apartments and provides easy access to a wide variety of local facilities. Th...
Perfectly placed on the second floor of this highly regarded 'McCarthy Stone' retirement development and within easy walking distance to Clarkston's shopping and leisure facilities this splendid and rarely available two bedroom apartment offers spacious accommodation which is sure to impress on...
"If you're looking for a comfortable and homely 3 bedroom semi detached house in Sandyhills, then look no further. This property is perfect for families or couples who want a bit more space and a great location."
"Looking for a stylish and modern apartment in the heart of Dennistoun? Look no further than this immaculately presented top floor apartment! This two-bedroom apartment is one of the larger styles in the area, offering spacious and comfortable living for couples, small families, or professionals."
Fantastic three bed flat
"A two bedroom top floor tenement flat, located in the highly desirable Finnieston district."
"Rarely available and enjoying a highly sought after location at the head of a quiet cul de sac and commanding a larger corner site, this two bedroom semi-detached villa requiring upgrading offers comfortable family accommodation within minutes walk from all local amenities. Accommodation com..."
"A charming, stone fronted main door upper quarter villa with a flexible 4 apartment layout, driveway & a private landscaped rear garden, enjoying a highly convenient location just a stone’s throw from the many & varied amenities upon Stonelaw Road.  EPC – D."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this incredible two bedroom, first floor flat set within this popular development by Glasgow Green with secure private parking. Located moments from Glasgow Green, offering a great place to enjoy the outdoors along with the many events organised the..."
"In a landmark Italianate building of 1880 by Boston and Caruthers, gloriously refurbished in 2014 to reinstate its, previously hidden, magnificence this spacious and immaculately refreshed 2 bedroom flat is perfectly set amidst the all delights of the Merchant City. Well presented to maximis..."
"Situated on a delightful tree lined avenue, 46B Balshagray Drive occupies a quiet yet convenient location close to a wide selection of amenities together with excellent transport links and easy access to the wonderful Victoria Park. Rarely available and of generous proportions the acc..."
Allen & Harris are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom ground floor flat located within the popular area of Partick. This property would ideally suit first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder as well as retired people looking for a accommodation on the one level.
"Spacious three bedroom semi-detached villa, enjoying a delightful position and situated within this established and sought after residential area close to schooling as well as to the local amenities including the tennis club. Properties within this locale always prove to be popular for..."
"Beautifully presented ground floor apartment, nestling quietly in this sought-after residential pocket and boasting attractive views to the rear towards open countryside."
"Situated within sought after Academy Park development built by Messrs Bett Homes an impressive 3rd floor apartment. The property comprises security entry system into welcoming reception hallway with good storage off, fabulous lounge with space for dining, dining sized fitted kitchen with Fre..."
"Enjoying a prime position within this coveted pocketed of Stepps, this John Lawrence semi-detached villa is presented to the market in need of some modernisation throughout. The property is an excellent size and would make a fantastic family home.  EPC BAND - C "
"Perfectly placed on an enviable position with open aspect to the front, this well presented and larger sized mid terrace villa will appeal to the family and professional market alike. Comprises, reception hallway with deep set storage cupboard, spacious front facing lounge with semi open pla..."
"A south facing (rear), two bedroom, first floor tenement apartment with well proportioned rooms set in the heart of Partick/Thornwood, very close to Byres Road and Crow Road. The well laid out accommodation comprises reception hallway, a bright kitchen off the lounge to the front whic..."
"Modern build semi detached villa within quiet street which has multi car driveway, south facing gardens, modern kitchen, bathroom and en-suite. "
"Cul de sac, large corner plot, walk-in condition, garden room workshop and large private gardens, what more could you want from an extended modern two-bedroom semi-detached home in the suburbs?"
"Set within this brand new development is this 3 bedroom end terraced villa which offers bright and spacious accommodation and is of a style which is now sold out within the development Accommodation Reception hall Two piece WC/Cloaks Room Fabulous, bright lounge/dining r..."
"FIXED PRICE £180,000 - HOME REPORT VALUE £200,000. An excellent, first floor two bedroomed tenement flat situated in this popular pocket of Govanhill. Having undergone extensive improvements, this flat is a must for viewing in order to be appreciated. ..."
"Keller Williams Scotland presents to the market this rarely available, this two bedroom property on Calderwood Road is an excellent opportunity for renovation."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom detached bungalow in the the popular Moray park Avenue of Inverness
"
"Amazing opportunity to purchase a private estate. 5 Bedroom home with a 2 bedroom annex, agricultural outbuilding. Vast amounts of land with much potential for many uses. Council tax Band: H EPC Band: D"
Two luxury properties designed with uncompromising quality and meticulously detailed for an exquisite living experience.
"A distinctive B Listed home set in beautiful landscaped gardens, located in the sought-after Crown area of the city."
"Set in approximately one acre of garden grounds, viewing comes highly recommended for this six bedroom, one and a half storey villa along with a separate two bedroom bungalow located approximately four miles from the city centre. Ideal for the growing family or as a bed and breakfast/rental prope..."
A substantial home with manicured gardens and views to the Moray Firth and the Black Isle beyond. Offering spacious family accommodation with a well considered layout.
"Excellent opportunity to purchase 4 serviced apartments in immaculate condition close to the city Centre of Inverness. Currently run as successful holiday lets these would be Ideal for Investors or someone looking for a new business venture 
"
Stunning five bedroom home for sale on the edge of the city of Inverness
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this detached country property. The Ranch has amazing views, and has a bright spacious rooms, with a large glass frontage and set in approximately one acre of land with shared access. The layout of the house opens to amazing space perfect for a growing family."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a B Listed five bedroom detached villa set in approximately 0.88 acres of garden grounds on Caulfield Road North in the popular Cradlehall district of Inverness. The property offers many pleasing features including a modern kitchen diner with built in appliances, a ..."
"TAILORED INCENTIVES AVAILABLE! The Lawrie Grand is a fantastic family home with INTEGRATED GARAGE, offering nearly 2,300 SQUARE FEET of living space over THREE STOREYS. The downstairs area comprises a light and spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN, dining and family area which leads into the garde..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this five bedroom traditional property with extensive grounds in a sought after area of Inverness, with excellent views across the City & down to the firth.
Boasting spacious accommodation across two floors with private access road & parking, enclosed garden, lar..."
"*Part Exchange Available and Luxury Flooring Package Available*
Exciting opportunity to purchase a new build 5-bedroom detached family home in a beautiful new development located just three miles from the centre of the Highland Capital, Inverness."
"Move in for SPRING with PART EXCHANGE! Includes LUXURY FLOORING and a LANDSCAPED GARDEN! Plot 7 The Mackintosh Garden Room is a DETACHED FAMILY HOME offering 1,980 SQUARE FEET of living space and an INTEGRATED DOUBLE GARAGE.The downstairs space comprises a light and spacious OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and..."
TAILORED INCENTIVES AVAILABLE! The beautifully designed Leonardo Garden Room is a welcoming detached family home offering almost 1900 SQUARE FEET OF LIVING SPACE with a SEPARATE DOUBLE GARAGE. The downstairs area comprises a light and spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area which lead...
"A seven bedroom, semi-detached villa that holds potential to be run as a bed and breakfast, located in the popular, conservation area of Crown in Inverness."
"This generously proportioned family home is positioned in a sought after area within Milton of Leys. This five bedroom property with detached double garage enjoys spacious accommodation, two en-suites a large rear garden and would be ideal for a growing family.
"
"Introducing The Botanic Collection, Drummond Hill, Inverness; A beautiful avenue comprising six mews houses with garage and private gardens."
Inverness city centre guest house for sale
"Eight bedroom house for sale, Inverness city"
"Spacious five-bedroom detached bungalow situated in the desirable area of Milton of Leys, Inverness. "
"An opportunity to purchase a large four bedroom detached villa built by Robertson Homes to their Everett Garden room design that was completed in 2021. The property offers many pleasing features including a Jack and Jill en-suite shower room, a fitted kitchen with built in appliances and an en-su..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a stunning 5 bedroom detached family home with double garage and extensive family living space in the much sought after Cradlehall Park Inverness.
"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this four bedroom detached home in sought after area of Crown, Inverness. Accommodation comprises ~ Enclosed entrance porch with front door leading to the hall, off which is the main living room with open fire , Parque flooring and a large bay window providing..."
"The Corner House features open-plan living/kitchen/dining area, separate utility room and WC. Three double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes and study room or alternatively a fourth bedroom."
Two bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment offering 752 SQUARE FEET of living space. The OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING AREA with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES opens out onto a SOUTH WEST BALCONY with VIEWS OVER LOCH NESS. There are two double bedrooms including the primary bedroom with EN-SUITE and FITTED WARDROBES. T...
"The Annan features an open plan luxury Ashley Ann kitchen/dining room with French doors opening to patio in rear garden, front aspect lounge, downstairs cloakroom & understair storage, and 2 double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes. Turfed gardens. 10 year NHBC warranty."
"The Gardener at Scotia's sought after Highwood, Croy development is a spacious 3 bedroom detached house featuring a contemporary open plan ground floor with French doors opening to your rear garden. "
Extended Two Storey Semi-Detached Villa
"WITH £18,999 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS you will save thousands when you move to Ness Castle! You will be impressed by this 5 BEDROOM HOME IN INVERNESS. Downstairs, you will find a spacious lounge, a large kitchen/dining/family room ideal for entertaining, a han..."
"Fantastic development opportunity located in the much-sought-after Island Bank Road. This property, which overlooks the beautiful Ness Islands and River Ness, spans approx half an acre and currently houses a three-bedroom property with outbuildings."
"This comfortable family home enjoys a picturesque position backing onto mature woodland within the popular area of Inverarnie. Treetops is a bright and generousy proportioned home which boasts large garden grounds and a double garage. Viewing is highly recommended.
"
Well Proportioned Detached 5 Bedroom Villa Set in Highly Sought After Location
"The Clemente Garden Room is a DETACHED FAMILY HOME with INTEGRATED GARAGE, offering 1,326 SQUARE FEET of living space. The downstairs space comprises a light and spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area which leads into the statement GARDEN ROOM, with floor to ceiling CATHEDRAL STYLE W..."
"A beautifully presented, three-bedroomed, semi-detached villa, located in the sought-after Crown area of the city."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a very unique 4 bedroom family home with separate Studio Apartment, double garage and extensive living area in the sought after Drummond area of Inverness
"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious  dour bedroom unique  detached family home built in the 1800's in a prime position in Inverness.
"
This 3 Bedroom Executive Town House Was Built By Robertson Homes In Their Exclusive Great Glen Development. The Property Offers A Private Garden And Is Filled With Character Throughout.
"Did you know THIS HOME COMES WITH UPGRADES WORTH £3,699 included throughout? Move with £7,349 LBTT PAID OR A £16,999 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION! This new 4 BEDROOM property in Inverness is a great family home. Downstairs, an entrance hallway leads you to the lounge with the OPEN-PLAN kitchen and dinin..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a substantial detached villa in the popular Haugh area of Inverness within walking distance to the city centre. Having been recently decorated throughout and newly flooring fitted this property would make a comfortable family home but it has been previously run ...
Extended 2 Storey Semi-Detached Villa
This fantastic villa is located in the desirable residential area of Scorguie on the west side of the River Ness.
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a luxurious Architect designed new build, set in approximately 1/4 of an acre, with uninterrupted panoramic views over the open countryside. The home is located close to the villages of North Kessock and Munlochy and within an easy commute of Inverness."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a stunningly modern 4 bedroom detached family home built by Barratts in 2022 to their Dunbar design in the sought after Ness Castle devolpment of Inverness. 
"
"Delighted to present this substantial 3 Bedroom property in the much-sought-after Tornagrain Village. This high-spec home, was built in 2018 in a stunning new sustainable development between Inverness and Nairn."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this nearly new four bedroom detached home in the ever popular Ness Castle area of Inverness. Accommodation comprises ~ Entrance hall,off which is a good sized bright living room in neutral decor. Further down the hall is an open plan kitchen/diner with French ..."
"Viewing comes highly recommended for this immaculate, four bed detached villa recently built by Springfield Properties to their ""Arden"" design. The property sits within a private cul-de-sac and only by viewing will one appreciate the accommodation this family home has to offer. "
New show home now open! The Aspen presents exceptional living over 3 levels in prestigious location. Luxury open plan kitchen/family room with French doors to garden. Bedroom 1 offers en suite & separate dressing room. Lounge with Juliet balcony on 1st floor. 3 bedrooms & bathroom on top floor.
"Spacious 3 bedroom family home with open plan kitchen / dining area, utility room, sunroom, family bathroom and en-suite in bedroom 1. This home comes complete with integrated kitchen appliances, fitted wardrobes, turfed gardens and choice of paint colour for each room. "
"Beautiful, 4-bedroom detached house in popular area."
"The Tweed is a beautiful home comprising open plan Luxury Ashley Ann Kitchen with breakfast bar and Bosch appliances, front aspect lounge, separate utility & W/C. Upstairs, bedroom 1 benefits from en suite & fitted wardrobes. Sleek vanity units to bathroom & en suite. Turfed garden."
The Moorhen situated on the second floor apartment features contemporary open plan living/kitchen/dining area set within the tree-lined grounds of Drummond hill.
"The Alder offers flexible living at desirable Ness Side. En suite bedroom & utility room with garden access on ground floor. 1st floor offers open plan Ashley Ann kitchen/diner & lounge with Juliet balcony. On 3rd floor is bedroom 2 with Juliet balcony, bedroom 3 & bathroom"
The Sandpiper with breath-taking views of the Inverness landscape presents contemporary living with all of the luxuries you would expect living within this extraordinary setting.
"Nestled within the tree-lined ground of Drummond Hill this two bedroom ground floor apartment boosts open plan living/kitchen/dining, family bathroom and en suite to principal bedroom."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase this luxurious 3 bedroom townhouse in a highly desirable location in Inverness which is currently being used as a successful Holiday Let.
"
"This spacious family home offers versatile accommodation making it an ideal property for a variety of buyers. Quietly located at Drumchardine, Murellan is 8 miles from Inverness which makes for a very short commute. Viewing comes highly recommended.
"
"LBTT PAID WORTH 5,100 AND COMPLIMENTARY FLOORING! The Cornell is a DETACHED FAMILY HOME, offering 1,158 SQUARE FEET of living space. The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan space ..."
The Pintail is a spacious first floor apartment featuring modern open plan living/kitchen/dining area set within the tree-lined grounds of Drummond hill.
The Tweed features a luxury open plan Ashley Ann kitchen/diner with breakfast bar and Bosch appliances. Utility area off kitchen. WC. En suite shower room to main bedroom. Vanity units to en suite & family bathroom. Perfect home for growing family in a desirable location.
The Goosander apartment within The Birdhouse Collection presents contemporary living with all of the luxuries you would expect living within this extraordinary setting.
*** DEVELOPMENT POTENTIAL *** Large parcel of land extending to approximately 1.75 acres. Potential development site for multiple properties (subject to Local Authority consent)
"Introducing The Birdhouse Collection, Drummond Hill, Inverness; One exceptional place to live. 12 luxury apartments."
Well Proportioned 4 Bedroom Detached Bungalow set within a Corner Plot in Popular Residential Location
This 4 Bedroom Semi Detached House Is Located Close To Inverness City Centre And Is An Ideal Family Home Or Potential B and B.
"Modern three bedroom family home for sale, Croy, Inverness"
"Pend house is a three bedroom mid terrace mews house with open-plan living, kitchen, dining area. Three double bedroom with family bathroom."
The Calder offers a well appointed open plan Ashley Ann kitchen with integrated appliances including fridge freezer. French doors to rear garden. Separate lounge. Downstairs WC. Bedroom 1 boasts en suite shower room. Fitted wardrobes. Vanity units in en suite & bathroom. Turfed gardens.
"Spacious 4-bedroom family home in the popular Milton of Leys area. This property is conveniently situated close to shops, schools, sports facilities and all amenities. Milton of Leys is connected to all the major link roads in and out of Inverness and is close to the trails of Daviot woods."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a beautiful 5-bedroom detached family home with downstairs bedroom with ensuite, upstairs master bedroom with en suite and 3 further good-sized bedrooms.
"
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a beautiful 4 brdroom detached family home with Integral garage and large south facing garden in the sought agter North Kessock
"
"****£6,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION!!!****
This Extended 4 Bed Property Is Located In The Popular, Established Culloden Area And Offers Spacious Rooms And A Good Sized Garden. "
"MOVE WITH EXCITING OFFERS SUCH AS PART EXCHANGE OR A MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION WORTH £12,949! Personalise your home for 2023 and reserve with FREE FLOORING WORTH £2,800! Book an appointment and start your new home journey at Ness Castle, next to the South Loch Ness walking trail. This 3 bed home in I..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this four bedroom cottage just outside of Inverness in the exclusive area of Milton of Culloden. Spacious accommodation with driveway parking, encl garden and dbl garage. This property will appeal to a wide variety of purchasers; viewing is highly recommended. ..."
"Spacious 3 bedroom family home with open plan kitchen / dining area, utility room, family bathroom and en-suite in bedroom 1. This home comes complete with integrated kitchen appliances, fitted wardrobes, turfed gardens and choice of paint colour for each room. "
"This beautifully presented three-bedroom townhouse was built by Robertson Homes approximately 3 years ago. Situated in this historic building on the West side of the city, the townhouse is located within the stunning Great Glen Hall building enjoying contemporary open plan living, high ceilings a..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a thriving 6 bed guest house with excellent reviews in the heart of Inverness.
"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious 3-bedroom/2 bathroom bungalow in immaculate, walk-in condition. Close to all amenities, this character property oozes charm and is finished to a high standard with tasteful interiors."
The Elm features a contemporary open plan kitchen/dining room with French doors opening to patio. Luxury kitchen by Ashley Ann includes a selection of Bosch appliances. Lounge located to the front creates a lovely space to relax and unwind. Bedroom 1 benefits from fitted wardrobe & en suite
"Delighted to bring to market this immaculate 3-bedroom Bungalow in the popular Milton of Leys area of Inverness. With three double bedrooms, two brand new state-of-the-art bathrooms this property is suitable for young families and retirees alike."
"Stunning 2 bedroom 2 bathroom in the much sought after Hedgefield House executive development just under a mile from the city centre, in leafy surroundings In gorgeous walk in condition through out and ready to enjoy from day one as a home, holiday let or a Highland holiday retreat"
"This three-bedroom, detached villa is located in the highly popular Milton of Ley's area of the city, close to excellent facilities and within easy reach of the airport and the City Centre. Constructed by Tulloch Homes to the ?????? design, with the addition of an attractive family room, this pr..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE AND FREE FLOORING WORTH THOUSANDS INCLUDED! This 4 bedroom home in Inverness is great for those looking to join or move up the property ladder. Downstairs, you will find a sizeable lounge, open-plan kitchen with plenty of space for a dining table, and WC. The REAR GARDEN IS SOUT..."
"*****NEW PRICE - £15,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION!****** Early viewing is recommended for this immaculately presented detached family home, situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought-after Westhill district of Inverness. The property which benefits from generous accommodation throughout..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this four bedroom detached family home in ever popular Ness Castle, near Inverness. Accommodation comprises ~
Entrance , off which is a good sized living room decorated in a neutral palette with Amtigo flooring and benefitting from an large under stair storage c..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a three bedroom family home with Integral garage and stunning views over Inverness at the new wester Inshes development Inverness. 
"
"Have a home to sell? We have PART EXCHANGE XTRA AVAILABLE OR YOU COULD CHOOSE A £13,649 DEPOSIT BOOST! This popular 3 bedroom home is just a short cycle from Inverness city centre & offers plenty of space for a growing family. Downstairs, you will find a good-sized lounge and an abundance of stor..."
"Fabulous opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom (one en-suite) detached bungalow with garage and carport, situated on a corner site in a quiet cul-de-sac, in the popular Balloch area on the east side of Inverness."
Modern four bedroom family home for sale in Inverness
"******VIEWINGS SUSPENDED****** This modern and contemporary home enjoys a unique position within the popular Milton of Leys district of Inverness, backing onto open farmland and enjoying open views towards the Moray Firth and beyond. Decorated in neutral tones throughout, this detached family hom..."
"GET £13,249 TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT OR BILLS, or if you have a home to sell, PART EXCHANGE AND GET YOUR LBTT PAID TOO! Just a short drive from Inverness city centre, the Craigend is a fantastic 3 bedroom semi-detached home with a modern open plan kitchen/dining room with family area. There..."
"Get PART EXCHANGE XTRA OR CHOOSE A £13,049 DEPOSIT BOOST when you move into this 3 bedroom home in Inverness. Downstairs there is an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC and utility space with access to the south facing rear garden. Upstairs, the main bedroom features an en suite, 2 further..."
"PART EXCHANGE WITH FREE FLOORING AND LBTT PAID or get a 5% DEPOSIT BOOST on this energy-efficient new home at Culloden West. Just a short drive from Inverness city centre, the Craigend is a fantastic 3 bedroom semi-detached home with parking space and a modern open plan kitchen/dining room with f..."
"This is a stylish 3 bedroom semi-detached home features open-plan living, kitchen, dining area with study and WC. The first floor comprises three bedrooms and family bathroom."
Early viewing is recommended on this immaculate 3-bedroom semi-detached villa. This spacious and bright property is in walk-in condition and has been finished to a high standard both inside and outside.
"The Brasini is a FAMILY HOME, offering 975 SQUARE FEET of living space. The spacious entrance hall gives direct access to a well-lit lounge, a large kitchen/dining area, and a WC. The lounge offers DUAL ASPECT LARGE WINDOWS - allowing light to flood in - the open plan kitchen/diner features a des..."
The Torrin offers an open plan Ashley Ann kitchen/dining room with French doors to patio in turfed garden. Separate lounge. Downstairs WC. En suite shower room to main bedroom. Fitted wardrobes to bedrooms 1 & 2. Located in brand new phase.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious 3 bedroomed detached bungalow that sits on a sizeable corner plot in the popular holm area of Inverness. This property has an open plan lounge/diner/kitchen area overlooking the rear garden. There a 3 spacious bedrooms, the main bedroom has a walk in w..."
Stunning detached bungalow in the popular Scorguie area of Inverness.
Flooring included* The Torrin offers an open plan Ashley Ann kitchen/dining room with French doors to patio in turfed garden. Separate lounge. Downstairs WC. En suite shower room to main bedroom. Fitted wardrobes to bedrooms 1 & 2. Located in brand new phase.
Flooring included* The Torrin offers an open plan Ashley Ann kitchen/dining room with French doors to patio in turfed garden. Separate lounge. Downstairs WC. En suite shower room to main bedroom. Fitted wardrobes to bedrooms 1 & 2. 10 year NHBC warranty. Located in new phase.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended one and a half storey detached villa in the semi rural scattered community of Lentran. On the first side of the property, a modern, country-style kitchen welcomes you into the property and leads onto the central hallway. Council Tax - D"
"Rare opportunity to purchase a Victorian semi detached villa in a popular area of Inverness. With 2 public rooms, large kitchen dining area, 4 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms this property would make an ideal family home. This property has in the past been an Hmo so could with the relevant permission be..."
"Flat 3 forms part of the 200-year-old, B-listed Georgian house on Culduthel Road which has been sympathetically restored to create a charming two bedroom apartment, right in the heart of the city, within walking distance of all the amenities and facilities one would expect from city centre living."
The Corran is lovely new home offering open plan lounge/dining room with French doors opening to rear garden patio. Front facing kitchen by Ashley Ann. Fitted wardrobes to bedrooms 1 & 2. WC on ground floor. Turfed garden. 10 year NHBC warranty.
"The Alexander is a 3 bedroom FAMILY HOME with a WEST FACING GARDEN in a PRIME PLOT POSITION, offering 895 SQUARE FEET of living space. The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan spac..."
"The Alexander is a 3 bedroom FAMILY HOME, offering 895 SQUARE FEET of living space.
The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan space features a designer kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLI..."
"PART EXCHANGE or get a £12,049 DEPOSIT BOOST along with £1,919 LBTT PAID, plus FLOORING INCLUDED. This 3 bedroom end-terraced home with parking spaces in Inverness is great for those looking to join or move up the property ladder. Downstairs, features a lounge, open-plan kitchen/dining, and WC. U..."
"*****REDUCED PRICE! £10,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUATION*****Located in the sought after Ness Castle area of the city close to local amenities, viewing comes recommended for this three bed (master ensuite) semi detached villa built by Barratt Homes to their ""Craigend"" design. Compl..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi -detached home in the sought after modern development of Ness Castle , Inverness. Accommodation comprises ~ Entrance hall, off which is the main living room, next to which is a spacious open plan kitchen/diner with French doors onto the ..."
This impressive 3 bedroomed link detached villa is located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after Castle Heather development.
"The Alexander is a MID-TERRACE FAMILY HOME, offering 877 SQUARE FEET of living space.
The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan space features a designer kitchen with INTEGRATED APP..."
"Fantastic opportunity to buy this spacious 3-bedroom house in the much-sought-after Drakies area of Inverness. In need of some upgrading this property boasts 3 double bedrooms, a large kitchen, a downstairs toilet/wc, generous lounge with dining room, a family snug, garage and south facing garden."
"HUGE SAVINGS WITH LBTT OR FLOORING PAID at this 3 bed home at Culloden West. Make the move into an energy-efficient new home in Inverness, perfect for those looking to join or move up the property ladder. Downstairs, you will find a sizeable lounge, open-plan kitchen with plenty of space for a di..."
"Was 242,000, NOW 230,000! The Alexander is a 3 bedroom FAMILY HOME with SOUTH WEST facing garden, offering 895 SQUARE FEET of living space. The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan..."
"Viewing comes highly recommended on this semi-detached bungalow. Set in the popular Inshes area and close to all amenities, this property is in walk-in condition and provides spacious accommodation with generous lounge and dining room with cosy woodburning stove and 3 double bedrooms."
"GET £11,499 DEPOSIT BOOST AND FREE FLOORING WORTH £2,828! We will also PAY YOUR LBTT. This 3 bedroom home in Inverness is a fantastic home. Downstairs there is a sizeable lounge with an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC.Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroom with an en suite, 2 furth..."
"Located in the popular Lochardil district of Inverness, this detached bungalow enjoys two public rooms and two double bedrooms. This house would be ideal for a variety of buyers and must be viewed to be fully appreciated.
"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a four bed, semi-detached house a short distance from the heart of Inverness. A central hall welcomes you into the property, and a spacious lounge with a large, front aspect window draws you in first. Council Tax - E EPC - D"
"WAS 237,000, NOW 222,000! The Alexander is a MID-TERRACE FAMILY HOME, offering 877 SQUARE FEET of living space. The downstairs area comprises a spacious OPEN PLAN DESIGNER KITCHEN and dining area, with access to the garden via FRENCH DOORS. This large, light, open plan space features a designer k..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a new build 3-bedroom, mid terrace family home in a beautiful new development located just three miles from the centre of the Highland Capital, Inverness."
"This desirable, three-bedroom, semi-detached villa is situated in the new sought-after Leys Green development in Milton of Leys, Inverness, close to excellent facilities and within easy reach of the City Centre, Raigmore Hospital and the UHI campus. "
"A well-proportioned, three bedroomed, semi-detached villa that benefits from extensive rear gardens, gas central heating, double glazing and driveway."
"NEW REDUCED PRICE NOW £10,000 BELOW VALUATION. Fantastic opportunity to purchase this immaculate family home. With modern finishes and tasteful decor throughout this property is sure to appeal to a wide range of potential buyers. This property is available for immediate entry if required."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a beautiful 3 bedroom semi detached house in the sought after Ness Castle area of Inverness
"
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a stunning 2-bedroom executive apartment in Great Glen Place Inverness.
"
"This two bedroom detached bungalow is located in a quiet cul-de-sac and enjoys decetively spacious accommodation. Immaculately presented throughout, this property enjoys off-street driveway parking, a detached garage and would be ideal for a variety of buyers.
"
"Two bedroom, SECOND FLOOR apartment offering 752 SQUARE FEET of living space. The OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING AREA with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES opens out onto a SOUTH WEST FACING BALCONY with VIEWS OVER LOCH NESS. There are two double bedrooms including the primary bedroom with EN-SUITE and FITTED WAR..."
"This well-appointed traditional stone building dating back to 1672, has been renovated throughout and retains many original features including exposed wooden beams, original lintels, bespoke handmade handrail, and window seats. Located in the City Centre, this unique three storey listed building,..."
"A three bedroomed semi-detached villa with off-street parking, a detached garage and has gas central heating."
"Property located in Bishop's Park, Inverness"
Well Proportioned 2 Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment with Superb Views across Moray & Beauly Firths
Well Proportioned 2 Bedroom Semi Detached Villa with Garden Grounds to Front & Rear.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a four bedroom, mid terraced townhouse in the heart of Inverness. An entrance vestibule and central hall welcome you into the property, and the large lounge draws you in first. Council Tax - E EPC - D"
Superb first floor one bedroom retirement apartment within the sought after Oakwood Court development in the Crown area of Inverness with excellent amenities within walking distance. Benefiting from a modern fitted kitchen and a walk-out balcony accessed from the living room.
"This bright, two-bedroom, end terraced property forms part of the new Maples at Ness Side development on the edge of the city, close to an excellent range of facilities and within easy reach of the City Centre."
Well presented two bedroom home situated in the sought after area of Slackbuie. This home is situated to the back of the development with tree boundary behind the gardens. Council Tax Band: D EPC Band: C
Fantastic opportunity to purchase an immaculate semi-detached villa situated in The Parks development near Milton of Leys.
"This three bedroomed detached villa is located just a ten minute walk from Inverness city centre and offers many pleasing features including gas central heating, a detached garage and off-road parking."
"Two bedroom GROUND FLOOR apartment with 718 SQUARE FEET of living space with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING area. SOUTH WEST FACING PRIVATE PATIO. TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, master bedroom with EN-SUITE and FITTED WARDROBES, , the family bathroom with PREMIUM SANITARYWARE and a storage cupboard located off t..."
"A charming 2 bedroom semi detached house, only around a 15 minute walk from Inverness city centre and Railway station. With spacious kitchen, separate utility room and a large bathroom with bath suite and separate shower cubicle. A fantastic home or a very lucrative holiday let investment"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase an extended 3 bedroomed bungalow in the popular Highfield area of Inverness. With a spacious lounge, modern kitchen, stylish family bathroom and 3 bedrooms, one of which has ensuite shower room this property will appeal to a wide range of potential buyers. This p..."
New to the market with Monster Moves this 3/4 bedroom detached cottage in the Merkinch area in the city of Inverness. The property is in need of some renovation and has potential to be a lovely family home with off street parking and private rear garden. Close to all amenities and minutes wa...
"A traditional steading with adjacent land close to Inverness with development potential (subject to planning being obtained), enjoying stunning views north and north west over the Beauly Firth to the Black Isle and Ben Wyvis."
Fabulous Semi-Detached House
"Delighted to bring to market this immaculate 2-Bedroom/2 bathroom contemporary terraced house in a quiet cul-de-sac in Athol Place, Wester Inshes. Close to Inshes parks and woodland walks this lovely home is an ideal first-time buy."
"A two bedroomed, semi-detached bungalow that has double glazing, gas central heating, and a garden with summer house which is located in the Culduthel area of Inverness."
"Situated in the popular Lochardil area of the City, this 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow is conveniently close to local facilities and Inverness City. The bungalow benefits from double glazing, gas fired central heating, off-street parking and generous living accommodation."
"This semi-detached bungalow sits in a quiet residential location and appreciates easily maintained garden grounds to front and rear with driveway parking and garage to the side. The nicely proportioned property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms and shower room and benefits from double..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase an immaculate two bedroom top floor flat in the desirable Culloden West development.  This property is in walk-in condition with neutral decor and bright, spacious rooms. The property would make an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity"
"Are you looking for an immaculate property that is in truly walk in condition? Then look no further, Rothes Place is the property for you. With a welcoming hallway , large lounge, breakfasting kitchen, 2 double bedrooms and family bathroom this property will appeal to a wide range of potential bu..."
"**VIEWINGS SUSPENDED** A deceptively spacious, two bedroomed semi-detached villa located in the popular Crown area that has a garden and off-street parking."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a two bedroomed semi detached bungalow within a popular area of Inverness. With a spacious lounge, modern kitchen, two double bedrooms both with fitted storage, family bathroom and detached garage this property will appeal to a wide range of potential buyers. Con..."
"*****NEW FIXED PRICE - £5,000 BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE!*****"
"This stylish and contemporary ground floor cottage flat is located in the modern development of Fairview. Built only 1 year ago and immaculately presented throughout, this attractive property would be ideal for first time buyers, as a buy to let or as an Air BnB.
"
"A modern three bedroomed, mid-terrace villa located in the popular Scorguie area of the city. It is fully double glazed, has gas central heating, gardens and a garage."
"This 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow is located in the ever popular Scorguie area of Inverness. With well proportioned accommodation, driveway parking and good garden space this property will suit a range of buyers."
"This well presented end-terraced property is located in the popular Milton of Leys area of Inverness. This modern and stylish property enjoys bright and open plan living and would be ideal for a variety of buyers including first time buyers, buy to let investors or use as an Air BnB.
"
"Located in the popular and sought after Milton Leys area of Inverness, this spacious two bed first floor flat is offered for sale, ideal for the first time buyer or as a buy to let investment property. Gas central heating. Double glazed. Own entrance. Parking. Walking distance to local ameniti..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a stunning 2-bedroom flat in the city centre of Inverness, currently ran as a holiday let business this would suit investors or first time buyers alike.
"
"This two-bedroom, end-terraced property is located in the established residential area of Hilton, close to excellent facilities and within easy reach of Inverness City Centre, Raigmore Hospital and the UHI."
"*** SPACIOUS RETIREMENT FLAT *** Well proportioned 2 bedroom first floor flat within Balloan Fields Village. This property is restricted to those aged 55 and over, those who have retired early on medical or those dependent on the health care system."
"Located in the Culduthel area of the city, this second floor, two-bedroom flat is situated in a quiet, convenient location within easy reach of excellent facilities and the city centre. The property which boasts well-proportioned accommodation throughout, would suit a variety of potential purchas..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious two bedroom 2nd floor flat in the sought after Westhill area of Inverness.
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment in the heart of the City Centre. Recently redecorated to an exceptional standard. Property comprises; Keyfob access into the communal entrance with access to the first floor via the stairs or elevator. Upo...
"Beautifully presented 2 bedroom ground floor open plan apartment, situated within a modern four storey block, with views over the harbour, in the South Kessock area of Inverness and within walking distance of the City Centre. The apartment is bright and spacious with quality fittings and fixture..."
"This attractive, two bedroom, ground floor apartment is ideally located in the popular Wester Inshes area of the city, close to local amenities and within easy reach of the city centre, UHI Campus and Raigmore Hospital. "
"Excently opportunity to purchase a fully renovated 2-bedroom apartment, 5 minutes from the City Centre of Inverness
"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this mid terrace three bedroom property in the popular Inverness area of Dalneigh with in walking distance all all local amenities, primary and secondary schools."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom ground floor flat situated within the popular Wester Inshes development of Inverness.
"This two-bedroom, first-floor apartment is located in the heart of Inverness City and represents an ideal purchase for the first-time buyer, young professional looking for a contemporary lifestyle, or someone looking for an investment opportunity."
"This two bedroom, ground-floor apartment is ideally located in the heart of the City Centre of Inverness. In good condition, the property benefits from double glazing and electric heating. Within walking distance to the City Centre, the property represents an ideal purchase for the first-time buy..."
A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a parking space and garden grounds.
"This attractive one bedroom, ground-floor, B listed apartment enjoys a central position in the highly desirable Crown area of Inverness. In immaculate condition throughout, the apartment is close to excellent facilities and is within easy walking distance of the City Centre."
"This charming first floor flat enjoys an abundance of character and is conveniently located within walking distance of the city centre. Very well presented and decorated in neutral tones throughout, this property is in walk-in condition and would be ideal as a first time buy, buy to let or Air..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a 2 bed ground floor flat in the heart of Crown and only minutes from the city centre.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom property located within walking distance of Inverness city centre. Close to all local amenities and public transport links, shops & schools."
"Perfect opportunity to buy a plot of land in a fantastic location. Rarely available, the plot extends to 0.27 of an acre and is well spaced from neighbouring properties. There is full planning permission in place for a large detached bungalow. "
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a well presented three bedroom, end terrace villa is situated close to Inverness City Centre. Council Tax: C EPC: C"
"Plot for sale, Inverness"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bed, semi-detached house in the popular Dalneigh area of Inverness. This property is of non-traditional construction; however, our mortgage partners can advise on mortgage options. Council Tax Band - B EPC - F "
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a plot of land in a lovely, peaceful setting. Rarely available, the plot extends to approximately 0.36 acre and is situated in well-established grounds in Balnafettack, Scorguie, on the west side of Inverness."
"*****GREAT NEW FIXED PRICE BELOW VALUATION*****
This 2 Bedroom First Floor Property Is Located Within Inverness City Centre and Is an Ideal Investment Opportunity. With 2 double bedrooms, the main bedroom having ensuite shower room, spacious lounge, dining kitchen and a family bathroom this prope..."
"A three bedroomed, mid-terrace house located in Dalneigh, which has electric heating and a large rear garden."
"Independent retirement living, with peace of mind, is enjoyed from this 2 bedroom first floor apartment built by McCarthy & Stone and designed for modern retirement. It is contained within a purpose built three storey terraced complex of age restricted apartments, surrounded by well manicured c..."
"Located a short walk from the city centre, viewing comes highly recommended for this immaculate two-bedroom ground floor flat. This property, which is decorated in neutral tones throughout, benefits from a newly fitted kitchen, modern bathroom and new flooring. The property would be ideal for a b..."
"This semi detached bungalow bungalow has been finished to a high standard. The accommodation includes modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge, bedroom with fitted wardrobe and modern fitted bathroom suite. Driveway to side. Enclosed garden to rear. Night storage heating."
"This spacious, first floor apartment is situated in a residential area of the City, close to the City Centre, the Highlands and Islands University campus, Raigmore Hospital and the Airport. In good condition throughout, the property benefits from double glazing and electric heating."
"Great opportunity to purchase a spacious second floor flat in a popular area within Inverness. With 2 double bedrooms both with fitted storage, large lounge, spacious kitchen and family bathroom this property will appeal to a wide range of potential buyers."
"Glashan Court is a new development offering a range of attractive apartments ideally located in the City Centre. The properties are offered for sale through the LIFT Scheme, administered by the Scottish Office, designed to assist first time buyers to get on the property ladder."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a well appointed 2 bedroom first floor flat, in the established Inshes Wood area of Inverness. The rooms are well proportioned and have been freshly painted throughout making an ideal purchase for any first time buyer, or investment opportunity."
Ground Floor 1 Bedroom Flat Located in the Popular Inshes Area of the City.
"Viewing is recommended on this immaculate, quality-finished 1-bed ground floor flat. Set in the Inshes area of Inverness this property is close to all amenities and a short walk from Fairways golf course."
A great two-bedroom apartment with a private entrance and some lovely views.
"This one bedroom, first floor apartment is located within a courtyard development in the Ballifeary area of the City, within easy reach of both the City Centre and local amenities. This deceptively spacious property which benefits from double glazing, gas fired central heating and security entry ..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase an immaculate 3 bedroom flat close to the City Centre.
"
1 Bedroom modern apartment located in the city centre of Inverness. Ideal property purchase for investors and first time buyers alike. Council Tax Band : B EPC Band : C
"Fantastic opportunity for a first-time buyer to purchase a one bedroom home within a one and a half storey fourplex situated in the sought after Lochardil area of Inverness. The home benefits from an enclosed garden to the front and a shared driveway to the side of the property, providing off st..."
"Located in the popular Murray Terrace, this two bed first floor flat offers anyone looking for a property to rent out or ideally for the first time buyer. Benefitting from electric storage heating, the flat is double glazed and has shared parking. "
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a 1 bedroom apartment in excellent condition close to the city centre
"
"If you are looking for something a bit different, a complete get away from it all, this live aboard lifestyle may be just what you are looking for. Practically a floating apartment, Keep it Simple offers the comforts of a traditional two-bedroom property with the experience of canal life close..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £110,000 - £125,000*"
"A one bedroomed, first floor apartment located in the McCarthy & Stone retirement home complex, that is fully double glazed and has electric heating."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase this one bedroom flat in the popular Kinmylies area of Inverness
"An opportunity to purchase a two bedroom ground floor apartment located within walking distance of the city centre. The property comprises of an open plan lounge/kitchen/diner, two bedrooms and a bathroom. The apartment features double glazed windows, electric heating and has communal off road pa..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this one bedroom top floor flat in central location near Inverness. Accommodation comprises, Entrance through a communal hall and stairway. Once in the apartment, there is the main bathroom off to the right which features bath with electric shower overhead and ..."
"This plot enjoys an enviable position within the grounds of the former Hilton House and is conveniently close to local amenities and within easy walking distance of Inverness City Centre. Purchase of the plot provides a unique opportunity for one to construct a home to their own specification, g..."
2 Bedroom 1st Floor Flat
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a good sized 2 bedroomed ground floor flat in a central location. With a good sized lounge that is open the kitchen, 2 double bedrooms, a shower room and 2 storage cupboards this property would make an ideal first home or investment property. This property is on ..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase a modern one bedroom flat in Altan Place Culloden
"
"Located within the McCarthy Stone development, this spacious, one bed first floor flat offers anyone over the age of 60, the opportunity to secure a comfortable flat within a safe secure environment. The property overlooks the canal and communal grounds and viewing comes recommended. "
"Well Proportioned 2 Bedroom, Top Floor Maisonette Enjoying Views to the Moray Firth & Black Isle Beyond"
Top Floor Flat in 3 Storey End Terraced Block
"An opportunity to purchase a ground floor one bedroom apartment located within walking distance of the city centre. The property offers many pleasing features including a fitted kitchen with built in oven, hob and extractor fan, gas radiator heating and a modern shower room. The apartment also fe..."
Closing date for applications - Friday 17th March at 12noon Friday 17th March at 12noon Highland residential are delighted to present this excellent opportunity to purchase a 2 bed level access bungalow via the LIFT New Supply Shared Equity Scheme. Situated in a desirable cul-...
"A pleasant, one bedroomed, first floor flat located in the popular area of Smithton that will suit a variety of potential purchasers. It has electric heating, double glazing and an allocated parking space."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious 2 Bedroom Flat which Is Located In The Popular Hilton Area Of Inverness . This property has spacious rooms throughout and would make an Ideal First Home Or Investment Opportunity. 
"Great opportunity to to purchase a two bedroomed upper maisonette in the popular Hilton area of Inverness . With a modern kitchen, spacious lounge, 2 good sized bedrooms and family bathroom this property will appeal to first time buyers and investors. "
"A two bedroomed ground floor flat located in the established Bught area of the city. It is fully double glazed, has electric heating and communal gardens."
The purchase of this piece of land offers the buyer the unique opportunity to own a strip of land and the foreshore along the Beauly Firth.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom, top floor flat located with single end of terraced garage in a residential area within walking distance of the River Ness and Inverness City Centre. Council Tax: B EPC: E"
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a maisonette in the popular Raigmore area of Inverness. With 2 bedrooms, a spacious lounge with open views, kitchen and family bathroom this property will appeal to a wide range of potential buyers."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase an upper floor flat in a great location, close to the city centre, the river Ness and many local amenities."
"This attractive, one bedroom, ground floor apartment is located in the highly popular Crown area of the City, within easy walking distance of excellent facilities and the City Centre. The apartment is set within a private retirement housing complex which is operated by Hanover Housing Association..."
Fantastic opportunity to purchase a one bedroom property in the popular Culloden area. This ground floor flat has previously been tastefully renovated throughout to a high standard and offers accommodation which would be the perfect first home or a fantastic buy to let property
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this two bedroom top floor flat near the centre of Inverness. Accommodation comprises ~ Spacious Living/dining area, a bright modern kitchen with large window overlooking Bught Park. Family bathroom with bath and over bath shower. A large double bedroom with..."
Fabulous opportunity to purchase a top floor studio flat in the highly desirable Crown area of Inverness. The property is immaculately presented offering neutral decor throughout.
"Perfect opportunity to buy a plot of land in the popular residential area of Scorguie. Rarely available, this plot extends to approx. 0.07 acres (283m sq) and is close to a wide range of amenities. There is planning permission in principle for the erection of a detached dwelling house."
Opportunity to purchase a two bedroom flat near Inverness City Centre. Ideal for investors or first time buyers. Council Tax - C EPC - C
"A first floor, one bedroom apartment located in Hilton which is fully double glazed, has electric heating and communal gardens."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Victoria is a stunning detached family home boasts a CONTEMPORARY, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with an IMPRESSIVE master bedroom to the upper floor. "
"A period country house, secluded amidst distinguished, private grounds to the West of Perth, with 2 cottages, outbuildings, and charismatic gardens."
"A period country house, secluded amidst distinguished private grounds to the West of Perth, with 2 cottages, outbuildings, and charismatic gardens. Summary of Accommodation House Ground Floor: Porch, Hall, Drawing Room, Dining Room, Snug/Library, Study, Conservato..."
"This exceptionally spacious and very versatile 12 bedroom 12 bathroom home would suit a variety of uses – either as a fully modernised guesthouse as it is currently run, a single large family home, multi-family, a children’s nursery with separate living quarters or various other business types th..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this impressive Victorian 5 Bedroom villa offering spacious versatile accommodation over 2 floors. The property is situated within a sizeable plot with large sweeping driveway. There are many charming features including ornate cornicing, high ceilings, curved walls,..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this five bedroom detached villa with separate two bedroom timber lodges situated in a prime Kinnoull Area. This property could not be better located to access all that Kinnoull has to offer including the local primary school, woodland walks and other attraction..."
"The original Bungalow has been completely rebuilt, remodelled and extended to create an outstanding home of merit over three floors. The space has an open, striking, mid-century modern feel about it that is warm and welcoming at the same time. This home is a veritable Tardis. The property compris..."
"Perfectly positioned overlooking scenic parkland in Perth, in the city’s conservation area, this B-listed, Georgian mid-terraced townhouse has been tastefully modernised and offers stylish, contemporary interiors, enhanced by lovingly maintained period features.The flexible accomm..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and exceptionally spacious four bedroom semi-detached villa occupying a convenient location fringing Perth city centre. The property is within walking distance of all amenities Perth has to offer including: shops, restaurants, leisure facilit..."
A rare opportunity to purchase this EXECUTIVE FAMILY 4/5 BEDROOM DETACHED VILLA offering spacious versatile accommodation over 2 floors. The property is located in the highly desirable Kinnoull area of Perth adjacent to Kinnoull hill which is ideal for enjoying countryside walks. The accommodatio...
"We are delighted to bring to market this well presented and spacious 4 bed semi detached villa offering excellent accommodation set within a quiet and sought after area of Perth. The property offers flexible accommodation, off road parking, has a private garden and is within a short walk of Perth..."
A delightful Victorian semi - detached villa in one of Perth's most sought after locations.
"Incredibly rare to the market, this superb 4/5 bedroom detached villa enjoys a most peaceful position on a highly sought-after street within the village of Scone. Boasting notably bright, generous and versatile accommodation throughout, the property also features some stunning views, a wealth of ..."
Unique family home in a respected residential area of Perth. Sitting in mature grounds of over 0.3 acres with commanding views over the city and to the hills beyond.
"This incredibly deceptive 10 bedroom home boasts notably generous accommodation spread across its two floors which includes a separate living quarters to the rear. The size and versatility of the property means it could suit a variety of uses such as a B&B, large family home, a multi-family home ..."
"Located in the sought-after Scone area, this 4 bedroom detached house offers a generous family home, close to all local amenities. The property has a range of benefits, including gas central heating, double glazing, good storage space, and notably generous garden grounds."
A rare opportunity to develop a period town house currently utilised as an office.
"*FINAL HOMES NOW REMAINING AT BERTHA PARK - PART EXCHANGE YOUR CURRENT HOUSE FOR THIS STUNNING HOME. T'S & C'S APPLY * The 4 bedroom MARWOOD is a fantastic home with OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining, STUDY, lounge with BAY WINDOW, master and second bedroom with EN-SUITE, further two bedrooms, FAMILY bath..."
"Armoury Cottage was built around 1900 when the ground was obtained by the Commanding Officer of the Fifth Volunteer Black Watch unit to build a cottage and armoury for the Battalion. It is now a spacious five bedroom detached family house, sympathetically renovated in keeping with its original ch..."
"This highly desirable Detached Bungalow enjoys a prime site in one of Perth's most prestigious residential areas, with views towards both Kinnoull and Moncreiffe Hill. Beautifully presented, it offers great sized family accommodation with the added benefit of a fabulous well tended, child friend..."
Simple Approach are pleased to welcome this eight bedroom semi detached house on Pitcullen Crescent to the Perthshire market. This beautifully presented and well decorated late Victorian house offers great character and charm with stunning original features such as high ceilings and decorative co...
"55 Dundee Road is a stunning semi-detached villa, set over three floors with spectacular views over parkland, the River Tay, and Perth beyond. Approaching the property from the private access road which is spotlessly maintained, you are met by spacious parking for 3-4 vehicles and stunning terrac..."
"A superb, notably spacious four bedroom detached house, 116 Glasgow Road is situated on a prime plot on the outskirts of the city centre. The property has been extended over the years to create a superb family home formed over two levels. The property is entered into a bright and welcoming centr..."
"This highly desirable late Victorian Semi Detached Villa enjoys a prime elevated site in one of Perth's most prestigious residential areas and benefits from wonderful views over the city. The property offers great character and charm with its stunning original features such as the high ceilings, ..."
"PART EXCHANGE & GET £2,849 LBTT PAID OR A MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION WORTH £13,249 and start your exciting new home journey at Huntingtower. This 3 bedroom home on the outskirts of Perth is fantastic for growing families. Downstairs, you will be impressed by the spacious lounge and open-plan kitchen/d..."
"Move TO a new home in Huntingtower with £13,749 CONTRIBUTION TOWARDS MORTGAGE, DEPOSIT, MOVING COSTS OR BILLS AND UPGRADES INCLUDED OR PART EXCHANGE & £3,349 LBTT PAID. The Craigend is a fantastic 3 bedroom semi-detached home in Perth with a modern open plan kitchen/dining room with family area. ..."
"HD Video Tour & 360 Virtual Tour Available - Presented in excellent condition, this attractive 4 bedroom detached villa is located within the highly desirable Oakbank area of Perth. Boasting light and spacious accommodation throughout, the property also features gas central heating, double glazin..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Oakmont is an IMPRESSIVE, detached family home which boasts a CONTEMPORARY, open-plan kitchen and breakfast area, along with four SPACIOUS double bedrooms to the upper floor. "
"Blackadders are pleased to offer this extended detached chalet bungalow pleasantly situated within the popular Oakbank area of Perth conveniently placed for access to local amenities including schooling, shopping and recreational facilities whilst the city centre is within a short travelling dist..."
"80a Fairies Road is a most attractive and very versatile four bedroom detached bungalow and is located on a private and elevated plot boasting open views across the city. The property has been modernised to a high standard throughout and benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and ex..."
"This grand, traditionally-built villa boasts generous accommodation spread across three floors and is nicely positioned within easy reach of excellent travel links and walking distance of Perth city centre. Retaining a high degree of charm and character, the property has been enhanced by the addi..."
"HD Video Tour & 360 Virtual Tour Available - As with many things in life, looks can be deceiving and that’s certainly the case for this fantastic 3 bedroom home located within the heart of the highly desirable Oakbank area. Boasting very generous accommodation spread across its two floors, the pr..."
"A development site extending to about 0.54 acres, centrally located within the popular village of Scone, with Planning Permission for the construction of three detached family homes. "
Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented detached four bedroom detached villa on Frances Gordon Road.
Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to market this four bedroom detached villa set within the popular Charlotte Gate Development on the edge of Perth City.
"A lovely larger style detached villa situated within a sought-after locale. Comprising hall, w/c, lounge, dining kitchen, utility, 4 bedrooms, 2 -En-suite and bathroom. Gas CH. D/Glazing. Garage. Gardens. Viewing A Must."
For sale on 07 December 2022 The Shepherd Commercial Auction will be conducted behind closed doors and broadcast live online with remote bidding only. The auction will commence at 14:30. On behalf of Shepherd Commercial - Ayr
"The open, flexible layout of the kitchen and dining room, with its french doors and convenient self contained laundry space, offers both a relaxed family area and a convivial backdrop to entertaining. The en-suite principal bedroom includes a built-in wardrobe, and the fourth bedroom could become..."
"Simple Approach are pleased to welcome this beautifully presented, five bedroom (four en-suites) house on Dunkeld Road to the Perthshire market. This lovely period property offers great character and charm with its stunning original features such as high ceilings and decorative cornices, all comb..."
Next Home are delighted to bring this newly built 4 bedroom family home situated in the sought-after Bertha Park area of Perth. 
An impressive ground floor apartment.
"** Deadline for Offers - 16 March 2023 ** *** TENANTED INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** tenanted flat in South Street, City of Perth, 6 Bedsits, providing a substantial income of over Â£34000 per year *** HUGE 15% YIELD - MUST SELL AT AUCTION ***."
"AN EXTREMELY WELL PRESENTED BRIGHT AND SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE SET WITHIN A PRIME & PEACEFUL LOCATION, CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES. ACCOMMODATION OVER ABOUT 133 SQ M "
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this very well presented stone-built 3 Bed property on Moncreiffe Terrace to the residential market. This property boasts good sized accommodation, comprising of a tastefully decorated lounge, stunning dining kitchen and convenient WC across the ground flo..."
"This 3 bedroom home in Perth is ideal for a growing family. Downstairs there is a sizeable lounge with an open-plan kitchen/dining with access to the west facing back garden and a separate WC and utility room. Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroom with an en suite, 2 further bedrooms and a f..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to offer this very unique, four bedroom, semi detached family home with immaculate modern interior to the Perthshire residential market. Situated in a highly desirable location, this lovely property could not be better located to take advantage of all local amenities..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this very bright spacious four bedroom Victorian semi-detached villa ideally located in the Perthshire village of Scone. The property offers easy access to all that this pretty Perthshire village has to offer, and the local, reputable RDM primary school is only ..."
"Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to the market this stunning, newly built 3 bed semi-detached villa situated in the Barrat Homes Development by Huntingtower, Perth. This property is well positioned for easy access into the City Centre by car or bus, as well as motorway links leadin..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this immaculately presented semi detached villa situated in one of the most peaceful cul-de-sacs in the ever popular Craigie district. The property lies in the catchment of Craigie Primary School and offers ideal young or growing family accommodation, full of ch..."
"***NEW EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM ADDED*** Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to market this spacious & bright, well proportioned, 4 bedroom detached villa located in the popular, residential area of Oakbank, Perth presented in move in condition."
"Simple Approach are pleased to welcome this bright and spacious, semi-detached family home on Muircroft Terrace to the Perthshire residential market. Set within a highly sought after location, this lovely property comprises; a welcoming entrance hall leading onto a bright and spacious lounge whic..."
"Set in the ever-popular area of Scone, Highfield Road is a fantastic street with many unique and characterful properties. Located off the main Angus Road, you have a quiet side street, but only moments to the main street and only a matter minutes to Perth centre, you have the best of both worlds...."
"Simple Approach are pleased to offer this unique period property that comes to the market in great move in condition. This lovely ground floor, riverside flat boasts picturesque views over the River Tay and further benefits from being close to all local amenities found just a short walk away from..."
"NEW BUILD semi-detached FAMILY HOME with SUNROOM. Spacious lounge with LARGE WINDOW. All INTEGRATED KITCHEN APPLIANCES included, in an OPEN PLAN kitchen dining area with PATIO DOORS to the GARDEN. Downstairs W.C. EN-SUITE off the master bedroom and FITTED WARDROBES included! Bathroom tiling included"
"This incredibly deceptive 3 bedroom 3 reception room detached villa enjoys a very peaceful position, neatly tucked away off Thriepland Wynd. Boasting very generous accommodation across its two floors, the property also features gas central heating, double glazing, good storage space, low maintena..."
"Miller Hendry are delighted to welcome this beautifully presented mid-terraced period home on Priory Place to the residential market. Set in the heart of the ever-desirable area of Craigie, this property is perfectly situated for those looking to be within easy reach of City Centre amenities with..."
"Set in the most sought after and popular area of Burghmuir in Perth, this bright and well proportioned 2 bedroom detached bungalow is sure to be popular with a variety of buyers."
We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious 2/3 bedroom detached bungalow well situated in this convenient residential Perth location. The property is well placed to access local facilities and offers easy access to both the city centre and Glasgow Road giving access to the central belt. 
Next Home are delighted to bring this recently modernised 3 bedrooms semi-detached traditional built villa to the Perth market
"Located within the highly desirable Oakbank area of Perth, this generously proportioned 3 bedroom detached villa is full of potential and boasts a notably private garden to the rear. Enjoying a very peaceful location and extended to the side and rear, the property also features gas central heatin..."
"HD Video Tour & 360 Virtual Tour Available - Located within a rarely available street within the sought-after Craigie area, this incredibly deceptive 2 bedroom 2 reception room boasts very generous accommodation throughout and is full of character. Conveniently located within easy access of vario..."
"7 Ritchie Place is a lovely 4 bedroom home, and boasts sought-after features such as gas central heating, double glazing, a large driveway and notably spacious corner plot.Set in the highly desirable area of Tulloch, this property is ideally placed to take advantage of nearby amenities including ..."
"Get FLOORING WORTH OVER £2,000 & £1,699 LBTT PAID OR £11,499 TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE! This 3 bedroom home in Perth, is ideal for family living. Downstairs there is an open-plan kitchen/dining and a separate WC. Upstairs, there is a spacious main bedroom with an en suite, 2 further bedrooms and a fa..."
"A splendid opportunity to purchase unique ground floor apartment situated in a historic Grade B Listed Building. The Clocktower was formerly the offices of Huntingtower Bleachers Works and was latterly converted into four apartments, circa 1989 by Almondvalley Developments. Number 2 The Clocktowe..."
"Set within an ideal location, close to the city centre and South Inch Parklands, this 3 bedroom first floor apartment would suit a variety of purchasers."
"HD Video Tour & 360 Virtual Tour Available - This superb 3 bedroom detached villa occupies a lovely private position within a sought-after cul-de-sac and is presented in excellent order. Boasting light and spacious accommodation throughout, this very attractive home sits on a generous corner plot..."
Next Home are delighted to bring this 2/3 bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular area of Scone to the market.
"142 Viewlands Road West is a lovely detached villa in the ever popular Oakbank area. The property offers move in condition accommodation over two floors with plentiful storage; bright, airy rooms; and mature planted gardens with lawn and monobloc drive. Oakbank is a friendly, tree lined neig..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this 3 bedroom detached house located within a popular area of Perth and benefiting from en-suite shower room, gas central heating, double glazing and off-street parking. The property offers bright living space throughout."
"Premier Properties Perth are delighted to market this unique first floor, four bedroom maisonette flat situated in a fantastic location within a highly sought after area of Perth. The Clocktower was previously the offices of a former Bleach Works and was latterly converted into four apartments, c..."
"Presented in move in condition, Premier Properties are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented, 3 bedroom, end-terraced cottage."
"Simple Approach are happy to welcome this two double bedroom, detached bungalow to the Perthshire market. This property is set on Feus Road benefitting from a large driveway setting this home back from the main road. All across one accessible floor this home comprises of two double bedrooms, a sp..."
"A bright and spacious, two/three-bedroom, detached house that enjoys an elevated position away from the road in sought-after Perth. The property features two/three reception rooms (including a sunny conservatory) and a well-appointed breakfasting kitchen finished with integrated appliances. It..."
"Presented in superb condition, this generous 2 bedroom (1 en-suite) apartment forms part of the highly desirable Rosslyn House and boasts many attractive features throughout. Positioned on the first floor and enjoying a very convenient and private location, this stunning home also benefits from g..."
"Presented in move-in condition and located within the highly desirable Kinnoull area of Perth, this very attractive 2 bedroom 2 reception room bungalow boasts deceptively spacious accommodation throughout. Boasting lovely high ceilings, it also features gas central heating, double glazing, off-st..."
Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this beautiful bungalow situated on the Crieff Road to the Perthshire residential market. This property comes to the market in move in condition throughout boasting modern and spacious living across one accessible floor. Comprising of two double bedroom wi...
"This attractive three Bedroom two Reception Room Villa is very deceptive and boasts bright and spacious accommodation throughout. Located within the highly desirable Oakbank area, it is positioned within easy reach of a host of amenities, travel links and schools. The property is entered..."
End terrace house with 2 spacious bedrooms. Design your KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Fitted. Turfed front and back gardens. Your choice of paint colours in each room. IT'S ALL INCLUDED! Find out what else is included at SPRINGFIELD.co.uk
"A south-facing, two-bedroom, semi-detached bungalow in the picturesque town of Scone, offering close proximity to open countryside and an easy drive to Perth. It is also within commuting distance of Dundee, and is an ideal home for anyone seeking a semi-rural ambience within reach of the two c..."
Mid terrace house with 2 spacious bedrooms. Design your KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Fitted. Turfed front and back gardens. Your choice of paint colours in each room. IT'S ALL INCLUDED! Find out what else is included at SPRINGFIELD.co.uk
"New build GROUND FLOOR apartment at BERTHA PARK - a new village of homes built by Springfield Properties. With great spec including an EN-SUITE off the master, and OPEN PLAN kitchen with separate UTILITY ROOM and lounge area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. bedrooms one and two have FITTED WARDROBES."
Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this spacious and well-presented family home on Perth Road to the Perthshire residential market. Set in the heart of the ever desirable village of Scone this stunning property is ideally placed for its tranquil location without compromising its close proxi...
"Premier Properties are delighted to bring to the market this tastefully decorated, three bedroom, first floor apartment situated in a popular family area of Perth close to the City Centre, primary and secondary schooling, local amenities and transport links."
Generous large configuration one bedroom retirement apartment boasting a corner position within the popular Conachar Court overlooking the courtyard. Close to local amenities and within walking distance to Perth town centre. Bus stops outside the devevelopment.
"Enjoying all the city has to offer virtually on the doorstep, this two-bedroom, two-bathroom third-floor apartment in the centre of Perth promises a luxurious contemporary home with tasteful neutral interiors, an impressive open-plan living area and a sweeping curved frontage whose windows cap..."
"New build GROUND FLOOR apartment at BERTHA PARK - a new village of homes built by Springfield Properties. With great spec including an EN-SUITE off the master, and OPEN PLAN kitchen and lounge area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. Bedrooms one and have FITTED WARDROBES."
"A bright spacious semi detached villa situated in the ever popular Craigie district. This property would make an ideal young family or first time buyer starter home. It offers easy access to all local Craigie facilities, and has splendid gardens to the rear with an external timber garage. In..."
"Simple Approach are excited to welcome this well presented three bedroom property on Murray Crescent to the Perthshire residential market. Set in the heart of the highly desirable location of Craigie. This great family home consist of a bright and spacious lounge, a fitted kitchen with ample spac..."
"Presented in excellent condition, we are delighted to bring to market this spacious, second floor apartment in the sought after and desirable retirement development of Conachar Court, within easy access of the City of Perth."
"An immaculately presented first floor apartment situated in a beautiful edge of Perth location. The property lies within a peaceful cul-de-sac of a modern and exclusive development, only a few minutes drive from the city centre of Perth, Broxden roundabout and major employers such as SSE or Aviva..."
"Simple Approach are excited to welcome this bright, spacious and very well presented semi-detached house on Unity Crescent to the residential market. Set just off the Crieff Road of Perth just a few minutes from the City Centre, this gorgeous family home is ideally situated for its close proximit..."
"Situated on the outskirts of the city centre, we offer for sale this spacious luxury ground floor apartment. The property is immaculately presented throughout and boasts well appointed accommodation comprising spacious lounge sitting open plan to a modern kitchen, two double bedrooms and a bathro..."
"HD Video Tour & 360 Virtual Tour Available - This superb 3 bedroom maisonette enjoys a very convenient position on the edge of Perth city centre, close to the picturesque South Inch parklands. Presented in fantastic condition and boasting notably light and generous accommodation across two floors..."
"Offering bright and spacious accommodation throughout and presented in fantastic condition is this attractive semi detached villa located within a prime residential area of Perth. Situated on a substantial corner plot and modernised throughout, the property offers generous family living over ..."
We are delighted to bring to the market this 3 bedroom end terraced villa situated within a popular residential area.
Lorraine at Rosie Fraser Real Estate is delighted to welcome this immaculate three bedroom mid terraced house in Potterhill Gardens to the market.
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this very well presented, two bedroom mid terraced house on Malvina Place to the Perthshire residential sales market. Set within a highly desirable location, this property could not be better placed to take advantage of nearby amenities without compromisin..."
** Investment Opportunity ** Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this very well presented and generously proportioned second floor plus attic flat on Balhousie Street to the residential market. This substantial property comes to the market in good condition and offers an exciting op...
"This attractive 3 bedroom villa enjoys a convenient location within the Tulloch area of Perth and is presented in move-in condition. Offering notably light and spacious accommodation throughout, the property also features double glazing, gas central heating, plentiful storage space and private ba..."
We are pleased to offer for sale this spacious and well presented END-TERRACED VILLA set within the popular Potterhill area of Perth. The property offers purchasers the chance to buy a well maintained and spacious family home within walking distance of the City Centre. The property has well pla...
"This impressive 2 bedroom (1 en-suite) first floor apartment boasts exceptionally generous living space throughout which is further complimented by a good amount of storage space too. It also features gas central heating, double glazing, secure entry to the block and allocated off-street parking ..."
"Simple Approach are excited to welcome this beautiful, two bedroom house on Nelson Street to the residential market. Coming to the market fully refurbished throughout this is the perfect property for any first time buyer or small family looking for a move in condition home. Comprising two double ..."
"Located in the sought-after Scone area, this 2 bedroom, semi- detached house offers generous accommodation and is sure to be popular with a range of buyers."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this spacious, two bedroom flat in the ever popular area of Craigie on Priory Place to the residential market. This great property is conveniently placed just a few minutes’ walk away from Perth City Centre, ideal for any buyer looking to be close to all l..."
"Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom mid-terraced villa situated in a popular family area of Perth close to primary schooling, local amenities and transport links."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom maisonette apartment well located on the fringes of Perth City Centre. All facilities are just a short walk away and the location is ideal for commuting access to Perth, Dundee and Edinburgh. The property offer great access to the many ..."
We are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented TWO BEDROOM MID TERRACED VILLA with box room situated in a prime location within the highly sought-after area of North Muirton in Perth. 
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this end terraced house on Strathtay Road to the Perthshire residential sales market. Set on a generous plot in the heart of the ever desirable area of Letham, this property could not be better located for its quick access into Perth City Centre without co..."
"Offering generous accommodation throughout, this 2 bedroom (plus a useful box room) villa is located within the popular North Muirton area of Perth. Presented in move-in condition, it also features good storage space, electric heating, double glazing and a private rear garden with parking availab..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this modern 2 double bedroom second floor apartment located within a popular area of Perth and benefiting from gas central heating, double glazing and allocated parking. The property offers bright living space throughout and would be ideally suited to first tim..."
"Three bedroom mid-terraced house set in the ever desirable area of North Muirton, Perth."
"This very generous 2 bedroom flat is located within the sought-after village of Scone and within easy reach of all the various local amenities and travel links. Boasting deceptively spacious accommodation, it also features its own private entrance, gas central heating, double glazing, a large lou..."
A rare opportunity to purchase this GROUND FLOOR TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT situated within the popular Craigie district of Perth. The property is self contained with the benefit of a front and rear door. The accommodation comprises entrance hall with large storage cupboard; dining kitchen with integr...
"Situated on the third/top floor of a modern development in Perth, this well-presented, bright and airy flat (with lovely views) enjoys two bedrooms (one with built-in wardrobe), a living room, a dining kitchen, an attic, and a bathroom (with a shower-over-bath), plus landscaped shared grounds ..."
"A bright spacious first floor flat situated in a pleasant residential setting fringing the city centre. This property could not be better located to access all that the area has to offer including the South Inch parklands, the bus station and train station which are all near at hand. The city cen..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this spacious and well presented Upper Floor Flat on Carnegie Place to the residential market. Set in the heart of the ever popular area of Muirton this ideal first time purchase comes to the market in great condition throughout, comprising; a warm and wel..."
"This very attractive 2 bedroom first floor flat is incredibly deceptive and boasts generous accommodation throughout which is complimented by a good amount of storage space. Access at the back of the building, it also features gas central heating, double glazing, a stylish dining kitchen, large l..."
"Spacious two bedroom flat centrally located in the city centre of Perth. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, open plan kitchen/ living room, bedroom with en-suite, additional bedroom and bathroom. The flat benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. Presented in genuine move in ..."
"This spacious 2 bedroom first floor flat is located within the sought-after Craigie area of Perth and boasts generous accommodation throughout. It also has the added benefits of electric heating, double glazing, off-street parking and its own private section of garden to the rear plus a shared dr..."
"Simple Approach are excited to welcome to the market this two bedroom third floor flat within walking distance from Perth city centre. This spacious property on Parmelia Court compromises a bright lounge, a modern kitchen with ample space for family dining, two double bedroom one with fitted stor..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this well presented ground floor flat on Victoria Street to the Perthshire residential market. This two bedroom flat is ideally placed to take advantage of the numerous amenities available in the city centre just seconds, away as well as both the train and..."
"Next Home are delighted to bring this 1 bedroom top floor apartment with enviable views over the South Inch Park, Perth. Home report valuation £115,000."
"A bright and well-proportioned 2 bedroom mid terraced villa situated in the popular location of Letham to the north west of the city of Perth.The area of Letham is sought-after for its family-friendly situation nearby to two reputable Primary Schools, as well as other essential amenities such as ..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this bright and neutrally decorated two bedroom, first and attic floor maisonette apartment situated in the perfect location for those wishing to live in the heart of the city.  The property features double glazed windows, electric heating and easy access to th..."
"A notably spacious 1 bedroom apartment located within the sought-after Knights Court retirement complex within Perth city centre. The property also enjoys a highly desirable on the ground floor at the end of the building. Having been freshly painted throughout, this bright and airy home also feat..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this superb ground floor apartment located within the popular McCarthy & Stone, Knights Court Retirement Complex. This development is very popular being well located within easy reach of all local amenities and within walking distance of the North Inch Parkla..."
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR This development was built by McCarthy & Stone plc and comprises 68 self-contained apartments on three floors, served by a lift. It is purpose built for retirement and each apartment has an entryphone and communication to the Re..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this bright and spacious ground floor flat on Tweedsmuir Road to the residential market. Situated in the ever popular area of Letham this well presented two bedroom property is the perfect purchase for first time buyers or small families, offering very wel..."
"Set within the outskirts of Perth City Centre in the sought-after area of Tulloch, this impressive 2 bedroom ground floor flat boasts extensive private garden grounds and bright and spacious accommodation throughout.  Gillespie Place could not be better located to access the local primary school,..."
"Simple Approach are excited to bring to the market this spacious one bedroom retirement apartment, situated on a quiet street on the outskirts of the city centre. Knights Court forms part of the McCarthy & Stone retirement development making it the ideal purchase for a retired person looking for..."
"A bright and neutrally decorated two bed first floor apartment, situated in the perfect location for those wishing to live at the very heart of the city. The property would make an ideal purchase for a first time buyer or buy to let investor. All sash and case windows have recently been replaced."
"A beautifully presented 1 bedroom 2nd floor apartment located within a friendly, sought after McCarthy Stone retirement development.This development is in a particularly advantageous position right in the city centre. Benefitting from being on the communal garden side of the building, this is a p..."
"A beautifully presented 1 bedroom 3rd floor apartment located within a friendly sought after McCarthy Stone retirement development within the centre of Perth. This apartment benefits from being on the communal garden side of the building, with less passing traffic. There is a lift, 2 stairwells t..."
"A spacious ground floor flat situated in a popular and convenient residential area. Kingswell Terrace lies just off a main bus route linking this area to the city centre, and local schools are near at hand. The property would suit a young family, first time buyer, or perhaps a buy to let investor..."
Simple Approach are pleased to bring this spacious one bedroom apartment on St. Johns Street in Perth City Centre to the open market. This modern property is conveniently located within walking distance of all city centre amenities as well as Perth Train & Bus Station but does not compromise its ...
"A bright spacious top floor flat situated in the heart of the city centre of Perth. This property offers easy access to all that the city centre has to offer including local shops, restaurants and other amenities. This property would suit a range of buyers and offers spacious accommodation throug..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this two bedroom flat in the ever popular area of Craigie on Glover Street to the residential market. This great property is conveniently placed just a few minutes’ walk away from Perth City Centre, ideal for any buyer looking to be close to all local amen..."
"Simple Approach are delighted to welcome this fantastic, upper floor flat on Tweedsmuir Road to the Perthshire residential market. Situated in the ever popular area of Letham this well presented two bedroom property is the perfect purchase for first time buyers and buy to let investors, offering..."
This is an exceptionally well appointed first floor flat (first floor right) located in the much sought after Craigie area of Perth. It enjoys a fine residential cul-de-sac setting with views to Kinnoull Hill.
"Simple Approach are pleased to welcome this very well presented two-bedroom flat on Nimmo Place to the Perthshire residential market. Set in the heart of the popular area of Tulloch, this lovely property is ideally placed to take advantage of all amenities found just minutes away and also benefit..."
"A bright and spacious 2 bedroom first floor flat situated in the Letham area of Perth, which would suit a variety of buyers such as first-time buyers and buy to let investors."
"Presented in excellent condition, 63 Moulin Crescent is a bright and spacious two bedroom first floor floor flat benefiting from gas central heating, new double glazing, private entrance and lovely private garden grounds to the rear. Enjoying a convenient location, it lies within walking dist..."
"Presented in excellent condition, this one bedroom, city centre apartment is bright and spacious throughout. The property benefits from gas central heating and a lift for easy access to the upper levels. Enjoying a convenient location, it lies within walking distance of a host of local amenit..."
"Spacious three bedroom maisonette apartment with balcony located on the fourth and fifth floor, with Hill views in the distance. This property is conveniently located close to the A9 for access to th..."
A rare opportunity to purchase this spacious ground floor ONE BEDROOM apartment entered via a secure entry door system close to the city centre. The property offers well proportioned accommodation comprising entrance hall with 2 cupboards; spacious lounge with rear facing window and space for fr...
Next Home are delighted to bring to the market this recently renovated 2 bedroom apartment set within the City of Perth. 
Next Home are delighted to bring to the market this recently renovated 2 bedroom apartment set within the City of Perth.
Located within the heart of Perth city centre and positioned on the top floor is this attractive 2 bedroom flat which also features gas central heating and double glazing. The property is entered into a hallway with doors to all rooms and a storage cupboard. The generous lounge provides...
A fantastic opportunity to buy this 2 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT to the Perth residential sales market. 
"*** HOME REPORT VALUE £90,000 *** A good sized and bright two bedroom ground floor apartment situated close to the city centre of Perth, in sought after area."
"Two bedroom ground floor flat situated in the popular Letham area of Perth, which would suit a variety of buyers."
Premier Properties Perth are delighted to bring to market this immaculately presented first floor 1 bedroom flat.
Entered via a secure entry door system this well presented and recently refurbished FIRST FLOOR TWO BEDROOM FLAT is located with the city centre and is therefore conveniently located for accessing all amenities. The beautiful North and South Inch parklands are also just a short walk away. The ac...
Simple Approach are pleased to welcome this spacious ground floor one bedroom apartment on Crieff Road to the residential market. This property is the perfect purchase for any first time buyer looking to get onto the property ladder and is looking for a generously proportioned property to start o...
We are delighted to bring to the market this very well presented ONE BEDROOM FLAT situated within Perth city centre
"Located a short walk from South Inch Parklands, this one bedroom apartment is presented to the market in excellent condition having been completely refurbished in 2019. Positioned on the fringe of the city centre, a full range of shopping and public transport links can be found within a few hund..."
"Martin Co (Dundee) are delighted to present to the market, this excellent one-bedroomed apartment located in the main street of Scone, with an easy commute to Perth and other surrounding towns and cities. The property comprises a spacious lounge, well-fitted kitchen, good-sized double bedroom an..."
"Simple Approach are excited to welcome this two bedroom, top floor flat, in an ideal location of the City Centre to the residential market. This well presented property is set on Scott Street and comprises a bright and spacious lounge, a good sized kitchen including all white goods, two spacious ..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this spacious, bright and neutrally decorated two double bedrooms, second floor apartment situated in the perfect location for those wishing to live in the heart of the city.  The property features double glazed windows, gas central heating and easy access to t..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this spacious garden apartment located within easy reach of Perth City Centre. The property has fine river views and is within easy reach of all facilities. Accommodation comprises: Open plan lounge/dining/kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom suite with shower an..."
Development Opportunity available on a long ground lease. Approximately 3.00 acres (1.21 hectares) Land zoned for Car Sales and suitable for other commercial uses Fully serviced site Excellent access to the A9
"Enjoying a central location within Perth city centre, this freshly painted 1 bedroom flat would be make an ideal purchase for first-time buyers, buy-to-let investors or as an Airbnb investment. The property is entered into central hallway with a useful storage cupboard. The bright loung..."
"This modern detached home makes great use of space and light.
 
On the ground floor you'll find a large open plan kitchen with a glazed bay featuring French doors to the garden, including a separate utility area. The spacious lounge is a perfect place to relax or welcome friends & family.
 
Upsta..."
"Halliday Homes Collection are delighted to welcome to the market this most impressive, Victorian, B listed, stone-built villa which holds a commanding position in the prestigious Kings Park Conservation Area. Built in 1865 Southwood has an impressive south facing frontage with steps leading to th..."
"Stunning detached 10 bedroom Victorian villa with 2 bedroom garden flat, perfectly located beneath Stirling Castle."
"Harper & Stone are delighted to present to the market Endrick Lodge: an outstanding Edwardian home designed by William Leiper and built in 1900. Period features are plentiful throughout, as many of the original fixtures and fittings have been preserved over the years. The current owners are only ..."
PRIME RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY Approximately 0.52 acres (0.21 hectares) • Detailed planning permission for 14 residential units • Located in one of Scotland’s most desirable towns • Prominent position and within walking distance of local ameniti...
"PRESENTER LED PROPERTY TOUR - Fabulous opportunity to acquire this individually built detached home within one of Bridge of Allan's finest addresses, Claremont Drive. Hillpark house was remodelled in 2012 by the current owners and the highly regarded Bobby Halliday Architects, paying particular a..."
"Built around 1854 in French Renaissance-style this architecturally impressive house is full of character, has substantial grounds, 8 bedrooms and 5 reception rooms. With potential for further enhancement via its adjoining coach house."
"NEW PRICE - Kings Park Farmhouse is a fabulous country home has undoubtably the very best views of Stirling Castle and is set amongst some of Stirlingshire's finest scenery. The property offers spacious and flexible living accommodation, is within walking distance to Stirling's local amenities an..."
"*DETACHED VILLA & DETACHED COTTAGE*
HOME REPORT - £600,000
An outstanding opportunity to purchase a substantial detached villa with separate detached cottage. The main house is finished to an exacting standard and offers quality specifications with a versatile layout. The main house..."
"The Glenbervie is an impressive family home, designed with style and luxury in mind.
 
A light and spacious lounge with French doors provides a great space for all the family, while the stunning open-plan kitchen offers dining and family areas with walk in bay. The separate dining room provides a..."
"The Colville is a flexible family home, designed for modern family living.
 
Discover a bright open-plan kitchen, separate dining and family areas and French doors to the garden. You'll also benefit from a separate utility room. 
 
There's also a stunning lounge providing the perfect space to rel..."
"This is a spacious family home where light and space rule.
 
The generous lounge is bright an airy thanks to the glazed bay which leads out the back garden, while the open plan kitchen has space for all the family with a breakfast bar and family area. 
 
A separate dining room, WC, utility room a..."
"Halliday Homes are delighted to present to the market ""1 Carrat Cottage"". A bespoke, architecturally designed, stone-built villa situated in a beautiful rural location, with open views of the Gargunnock Hills and Ben Ledi, whilst still being within easy reach of the city of Stirling. The property..."
VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE Irresistibly stylish home finished to an exacting standard! B-Spoke Property Sales are delighted to bring to the market 11 Powis Mains Steading which was built in 2018 by the award winning Crammond Select Homes and was shortlisted for Development of the Year at the He...
"Welcomed to the market is Forglen Cottage, a four bedroom detached cottage with separate one bed annexe. Situated in a popular location the property is well placed for all local amenities and offers spacious, flexible living accommodation throughout."
"The Ballater is a delightful four bedroom detached home, perfect for modern family living. On the ground floor, you will find an open-plan kitchen with a utility and breakfast/family area leading to the garden via a beautiful walk-in glazed with French doors – an extended living space in good w..."
New to the Market. HD Video Tour Available! Slater Hogg & Howison are delighted to bring to market this five bedroom house in the sought-after town of Bridge of Allan. This 1960’s bungalow has undergone a comprehensive extension and renovation by the current owner...
"  The Stirling is a flexible and practical home designed for modern living.
 
It features an open-plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors onto the private turfed garden, and a separate utility room.
 
You’ll also find a good-sized double bedroom on the ground floor - adding convenience -..."
"OFF PLAN DETACHED HOME LOCATED IN CASTLE ROAD, CAUSEWAYHEAD Castle Road offers a rare opportunity to purchase a detached home, off plan in a beautiful Stirling setting with uninterrupted views of the Wallace monument. Designed by Rebecchi Architects, and being constructed by Castle Roa..."
"In The Falkland you'll discover a bright and spacious home - designed with family living in mind. 
 
Take inspiration from our well designed homes and plan your favourite design features which would turn the house into your home. 
 
The open plan kitchen offers dining and family areas with French..."
"Harper & Stone are delighted to present to the open market Blair House, which is a Grade C listed property set in the conservation area of Blairlogie."
"The Dalmally is a spacious family home - perfect for modern living.
 
The stylishly fitted kitchen with dining area connects to your fully turfed garden through French doors - there's also a separate utility area - great for storage.
 
As you walk along the open hallway you'll discover the spacio..."
"Homes For You is excited to bring to the market this four bedroom extended detached family home set within the sought after location of Bannockburn. Upon entering the property, the welcoming entrance hallway leads to a bright and spacious lounge with open plan living space incorporati (cont.)"
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this stunning 2 bedroom end-terrace home, offering spacious living accommodation & ideally situated in this highly desirable residential locale. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate all that this impressive home has to offer."
Halliday Homes are delighted to bring to the market this superb four-bedroom detached villa located within a prime residential area in Bridge of Allan. The property sits in well maintained garden grounds with off street parking and is extremely private to the rear.
" A superb, detached family villa by Barratt Homes within the sought-after Highland Gate development in Stirling. Not only are you buying a good quality detached family home, but you are getting a home with outstanding open views to the front as far as Bridge of Allan and the Wallace Mon..."
"Your Move are delighted to present to the market this four bedroom family home in show home condition! Hosting a garage and driveway for parking, as well as a desired south facing rear garden. EPC = C Council Tax Band = F"
This professionally extended four-bedroom detached villa sits on a superb and sizeable plot within the extremely sought after Grampian Road.  Number 83 holds a preferred cul-de-sac position with this well-regarded residential development. The property offers generous and versatile family accom...
"A very rare find is this stunning award-winning apartment by bespoke interior designer Antonio Grano. Fully refurbished, with uncompromising attention to detail, particular attention was paid to lighting, technology, build work and key features, resulting in The Milano Apartment winning the best ..."
**CLOSING DATE - WED 22ND MARCH AT 12 NOON** Corner Plot in Private Cul-de-Sac | Amazing Views across Stirling | Annex with Lounge & En-Suite Bedroom. Gordon Henry & RE/MAX Scotland are delighted to present to the market this superb detached family home which offers flexible living acc...
"Fabulous detached, spacious 4 bedroom villa, within the popular new build development of Orchid Park.
INCENTIVES AVAILABLE"
"The Colville is a superb 4 bedroom new build home, set within the desirable development of Orchid Park, Plean.
INCENTIVES AVAILABLE"
"This substantial detached villa is situated within a sought-after and popular locale. Internally comprising porch, hall, lounge, kitchen, TV room/bed 5, dining room/bed 4, further 3 bedrooms and bathroom. Gas CH. D/glazing. Garage. Driveway. Gardens"
"RARELY AVAILABLE, well presented TRADITIONAL DETACHED COTTAGE located within the semi-rural hamlet of Sauchenford, only 5 miles from Stirling. Built c1920/30's this unique original Smallholding cottage offers a wonderful lifestyle change on a private plot, off the beaten track. VIEWING ESSENTIAL"
"Thoughtfully and sympathetically renovated by local builder Ewan Campbell Homes, Wellington House is an impressive Georgian building within a sought-after area in Stirling city centre. 39b Dumbarton Road is an impressive three-bedroom, duplex apartment accessed via a grand staircase. The prope..."
A totally unique modern detached chalet villa built in the 90's and located in the popular village of Cambusbarron within walking distance to the local highly respected Cambusbarron Primary School. The villa sits opposite the Gillies Hill woods great for those who mountain bike or like walk...
"Presented to the market is this detached villa situated within the popular St Ninians area of Stirling. Offering extensive living accommodation and spread over approximately 200m2, the property will require a degree of renovating/modernisation which early viewing will confirm."
"***NEW PRICE - BELOW HOME REPORT VALUE!!!*** Beautifully presented, two bedroom flat with open-plan living in a historic B-listed Bridge of Allan building with allocated parking and secure entry system."
"***CLOSING DATE WEDNESDAY 15TH MARCH @ 12 NOON *** Fantastic opportunity to acquire this three-bedroom semi-detached home which sits at the end of a leafy cul-de-sac. The property offers flexible living accommodation, is well placed for all local amenities and sits within a prime residential area..."
Yopa are delighted to bring to the open market this stunning 4 bedroom detached villa in pristine condition! Early viewing advised!!
"Fabulous 3 bed detached villa situated in a desirable cul de sac location. The property comprises 3 bedrooms, 2 public rooms, utility area, dining kitchen, sun room, family bathroom and en-suite. Extensive garden grounds and a driveway for several cars. EPC D"
"New to the Market. HD Video Tour Available! Constructed in the late 1990’s, this purpose built two-bedroom apartment located in Kings Park, Stirling is offered to the market in walk in condition. The Accommodation includes – Internally - Entrance Hall..."
"Recently upgraded, this three bedroom traditional home retains its characteristics throughout whilst posing modern décor and spacious living. The private rear garden is a huge benefit to this centrally located property. EPC = E Council Tax Band = E"
"HD Video Tour Available. Set in the shadow of the Wallace Monument, the house sits in the middle of a neat terrace, set back from the road behind an immaculate front garden which is utilised for off street parking for two vehicles. Previously a three-bedroom home, the curr..."
"CHAIN FREE - Welcomed to the market is this attractive, well positioned first floor apartment situated on the periphery of the historical Kings Park area of Stirling. Springwood House, constructed in 1870, is a B listed baronial villa split into seven apartments of which this one will appeal to a..."
UNDER OFFER NEWLY LAUNCHED. VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE Surrounded by trees and walled shared landscaped gardens with uninterrupted views over Beechwood Park is this two-bedroom executive apartment in one of Stirlings most prestigious addresses. Set back from Newhouse...
** Beautiful 2 bedroom Georgian Townhouse apartment **
"O'Malley Property are delighted to present to the market a centrally located 3 bedroom linked terrace house, in St. John Street, Stirling. This property offers generous living space and storage throughout and would be suitable for a range of different buyers. Upon entering the p..."
"Presented to market in excellent condition is this three-bedroom, lift serviced apartment within the sought-after village of Cambusbarron.  Known as Hayford Mill or Cambusbarron Mill, this Grade A listed building was built in 1834 and utilised as Scotland's largest tweed weaving mill. Successf..."
"UNEXPECTEDLY BACK TO THE MARKET 2.3.23, this Beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached villa"
 Property Bureau are delighted to bring to the market this bright and spacious 3 bedroom upper flat  conveniently situated close to Stirling City Centre. The flat was originally built by the highly regarded CALA Homes and sits with a sought after executive development. 
"** CLOSING DATE SET FOR WEDNESDAY 15TH AT 12 NOON ** Ideally located, this three bedroom semi detached house is presented in immaculate condition. Offering residents parking and an enclosed rear garden, this will be a great buy for an array of buyers. EPC = B Council Tax Ban..."
"New to the Market. HD Video Tour Available! A popular three-bedroom semi-detached villa with good sized gardens formed over two levels positioned in a cul-de sac position in Cambusbarron, Stirling. The home requires upgrading but the potential to create a beautiful family h..."
"A superb two reception-room, four-bedroom, semi-detached house in Bannockburn"
"This well presented two bedroom detached bungalow is located in the popular St Ninians area of Stirling. The property comprises a welcoming hallway which provides access to the spacious lounge with ample space for dining furniture, fully fitted kitchen with a modern range of base and wall mounte..."
"Superb three bedroom semi detached villa enjoying a prime position within this popular locale. Offering bright and spacious family living earl viewings are highly recommended. The accommodation itself comprises entrance hallway, spacious lounge, kitchen with wall and floor mounted units with spa..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this 3 bedroom semi-detached family home, which is ideally situated in this popular residential locale."
"** NEW REDUCED PRICE ** Neutrally decorated two bedroom upper flat, situated within the quiet, desirable area of Bridge of Allan with residents parking on hand. EPC - E Council Tax Band - D"
"Situated in a sought-after retirement development in Bridge of Allan, is this most attractive two-bedroom first floor flat with a large, dual aspect lounge. The development, convenient for all local amenities, sits in well-maintained gardens and provides independent living for those aged 55 and o..."
"O'Malley Property are excited to market this appealing land opportunity located in Cleuch Road, Causewayhead. Officially under the title garden ground to the south east of 4 Cleuch Drive, Causewayhead, Stirling. The approximate size of land is 310 sq meters. Stirling council have gr..."
Semi detached bungalow in need of modernisation
A mid terrace villa occupying a cul de sac street in the heart of Bannockburn within walking distance to the town centre and all amenities. This is a good sized home sitting within private gardens to front and rear and offering the buyer a blank canvas for any works that the buyer might want...
"New to the market is this spacious two-bedroom upper flat located in a popular location and convenient for all local amenities. The property, in need of modernising, will appeal to both the first-time buyer and investor."
"A rarely available two-bedroom, end terraced villa with large private gardens, off street parking and detached garage in the popular Hillpark Drive, Bannockburn. Accommodation is formed over two floor levels and in full comprises; reception hallway, front facing sitting room, fully fitted kitche..."
An ex local authority mid terrace villa in a popular pocket of Whins of Milton within walking distance of local shops and schooling. The property would ideally suit a young or growing family and has good sized gardens to front and rear. There is easy access to local facilities and a bus...
"Presented to market in excellent order throughout is this two-bedroom upper apartment, situated within a central location in Stirling’s town centre. Internally the property comprises: entrance vestibule; welcoming entrance hallway with storage cupboard; well-proportioned open plan lounge..."
"Located in the popular village of Cowie is this spacious, three-bedroom mid-terrace villa presented in excellent order throughout.  Accommodation in full comprises: welcoming entrance hallway, spacious front facing lounge, fully fitted kitchen with access to the rear garden, three bedrooms and..."
"A 2 bedroom top floor flat, conveniently situated close to Stirling City Centre & within the sought after Riverside locale."
B-Spoke Property Sales are delighted to bring to the market 12 Grendon Court which is an impressive and rarely available 1st (top) floor retirement flat which is maintained by Bield housing association and includes non-resident management and careline alarm service. New residents are welcome fro...
"MARTIN&CO are delighted to present for sale this, two bedroom property situated in the City Centre of Stirling. This is an ideal investment property or a great property for a first time buyer. Benefits from a fully floored loft space."
Perfect First Time Buy Opportunity | Well Kept 2 Bedroom Flat | Three-Piece Bathroom | Large Rooms | Stirling Town Centre Location - Walking Distance to Amenities
A traditional main door period flat in the heart of the village of Cambusbarron adjacent to the local Post Office and Convenience store. The flat would make an ideal first time buy or buy to let investment. The flat has recently been decorated and new flooring added including carpets.
"A deceptively spacious three-bedroom, end-terraced villa set in a popular residential area with off-street parking and private gardens. The property requires a degree of modernisation throughout and accommodation is formed over two floor levels and comprises on the ground floor; hallway, spaci..."
New to the Market. NO ONWARD CHAIN! This Semi-Detached property located in the village of Fallin enjoys a spacious plot with large gardens to the rear and patio area to the front. The layout and positioning offers bright and airy accommodation formed over two levels. The Acc...
This traditional one bedroom ground floor flat is situated in the heart of Stirling's bustling City Centre and will prove a great purchase for an array of buyers. On street parking is available with a Residents Parking Permit. Council Tax Band - B EPC - C
"** BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT - TENANT IN SITU ** A traditional 1 bedroom top floor flat, which sits in the heart of Stirling City Centre, close to all associated amenities, including excellent transport links with Rail, Bus & Motorway connections situated nearby."
